"BLOOD LEVEL"

The "blood level" of a room is an indicator of the amount of fresh blood that
has been spilled recently in the area.  Each creature that dies in a room
generates one blood level.  This level increases by one for each additional
creature that dies, up to a limit of ten blood levels.  The level of blood
in a room is indicated by a message located at the bottom of the room's
description.

Some spells and skills can also increase the blood level of a room, under
certain conditions.

The blood level of a room recedes by one level per tick as the traces of
violence begin to fade away into macabre memory.

Note: The following types of creatures do not generate blood when killed:
animated, charmed, or mountable creatures.
#
"SECTOR TYPE"

Every "room" in the game has a sector type that defines what kind of
environment makes up the immediate surroundings. For example, if you
are standing on the street in the middle of Midgaard, you would very
likely be in the City sector type.

Each sector type has certain characteristics, such as requiring
different amounts of movement points to travel across the room. In
general, the harsher the environment, the harder it is to move about.
In addition, sector types may influence certain objects, monsters, or
skills/spells.

The possible sector types are: Arctic, City, Desert, Field, Forest,
Hills, Inside, Mountains, and Water.

You can hide the sector type by turning on the sector brief mode.

See Also: "MOVEMENT POINTS" BRIEF
#
SKIN

A skin can be made from a corpse using the SKIN command.  All classes
have this ability.

Some skins may be valuable and be exchanged for cash at the fur
trader just north of Midgaard.

In addition, when skinning a corpse, it is possible to find and
extract some useful items out of the corpse.  This is done
automatically.

Skins are wearable, but do decay after a period of time.
#
BRIBE

For the most part, the lands of Ronin are free of corruption, but
with the recent decline in morality more and more creatures are
becoming susceptible to bribery. It is said that both the
restaurant bouncer and the metaphysician have been known to give
you something for a little cash.
#
CONSTITUTION

Constitution stands for health, physique and stamina.  A high
constitution score increases your regeneration (see REGENERATION)
rate.
 
After reaching 18 constitution (see META), you can gain even more
constitution from your guildmaster with quest points (see AQUEST).
Constitution of 19 and above will increase the number of hit points
you gain at level, reduce the damage taken each hit, and will provide
additional regen per tick.

  ------------------------------------------------------------
  | CON     |  19  |  20  |  21  |  22  |  23  |  24  |  25  |
  | HIT PTS |   4  |   4  |   5  |   5  |   6  |   6  |   7  |
  | DAM %   |   2  |   2  |   2  |   2  |   4  |   4  |   4  |
  | REGEN   |   3  |   3  |   3  |   4  |   4  |   4  |   4  |
  ------------------------------------------------------------

At 25 constitution, the you have a total bonus of 25 hit points
and mana regen per tick and damage taken is reduced by 20% if you
are not affected by the sanctuary spell, and 10% if you are affected
by sanctuary.

See Also: STATS META AQUEST SANCTUARY REGENERATION
          INTELLIGENCE WISDOM STRENGTH DEXTERITY
#
STRENGTH

Strength determines your ability to carry equipment and wield weapons.  Some
weapons require a certain amount of strength to wield.

After you have meta'd your strength to eighteen, you can meta additional
strength, one percent at a time.   If you have meta'd your additional strength
twenty times, your strength percent would be 20, notated as 18/20.

After 18/100 you can gain even more strength from your guildmaster with quest
points (see AQUEST). High levels of strength results in damage and hitroll
bonuses as shown below. At the maximum 25 strength, you can carry 1750 weight.


                    18   18   18   18   18
      16  17   18    1%  51%  76%  91% 100%  19   20   21   22   23   24   25
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
DAM    1   1    2    3    3    4    5    6    7    8    9   10   11   12   14
HIT    0   1    1    1    2    2    2    3    3    3    4    4    5    6    7
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------


When wielding a weapon that requires 2 hands:

                    18   18   18   18   18
      16  17   18   50%  51%  76%  91% 100%  19   20   21   22   23   24   25
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
DAM    1   1    3    4    4    6    7    9   10   12   13   15   16   18   21
HIT    0   1    1    1    3    3    3    4    4    4    6    6    7    9   10
-------------------------------------------------------------------------------


SEE ALSO: STATS META AQUEST WIELD
          INTELLIGENCE WISDOM CONSTITUTION DEXTERITY
#
INTELLIGENCE

Intelligence stands for the ability to reason and learn new
things.  The higher your intelligence the easier it is for your
character to practice.  Intelligence also affects your ability
to cast spells.  A high intelligence would give the spellcaster
an advantage.  When combined with a high wisdom, a cleric or mage
with 25 wisdom and intelligence will almost never lose when
casting (see CONCENTRATION).

After reaching 18 intelligence (see META), you can gain even more
intelligence from your guildmaster with quest points (see AQUEST).

  ------------------------------------------------------------
  | INT     |  19  |  20  |  21  |  22  |  23  |  24  |  25  |
  | CONC %  |   2  |   3  |   2  |   2  |   2  |   2  |   2  |
  ------------------------------------------------------------

See Also: STATS META AQUEST CONCENTRATION
          WISDOM STRENGTH CONSTITUTION DEXTERITY
#
WISDOM

Wisdom represents intuition and insight.  The higher your wisdom
score the more practice sessions you get when you advance in
level.  Wisdom also affects your ability to cast spells.  A high
wisdom will give a spellcaster an advantage.  When combined with
a high intelligence, a cleric or mage with 25 wisdom and
intelligence will virtually never lose concentration when casting
spells (see CONCENTRATION).

After reaching 18 wisdom (see META), you can gain even more
wisdom from your guildmaster with quest points (see AQUEST).

  ------------------------------------------------------------
  | WIS     |  19  |  20  |  21  |  22  |  23  |  24  |  25  |
  | CONC %  |   2  |   3  |   2  |   2  |   2  |   2  |   2  |
  ------------------------------------------------------------

See Also: STATS META AQUEST CONCENTRATION
          INTELLIGENCE STRENGTH CONSTITUTION DEXTERITY
#
STATS

Your stats reflect your character's abilities.  You cannot see
your physical stats until you reach level 6.  Stats can be
increased by buying additional points from the metaphysician (see
META).  After getting the maximum stats in meta, stats can be
increased using quest points (see AQUEST) to buy the increase
from your guildmaster.

Neither gear nor spells can increase stats above 18 but may
decrease them.  As an example, a player with 18 dexterity puts on
equipment with +2 dexterity.  The player's dexterity remains at
18. If the equipment had been -2 dexterity, the player's
dexterity would be 16.

Check the help on each of the stats to see how they benefit you.

See Also: META AQUEST
          STRENGTH INTELLIGENCE WISDOM CONSTITUTION DEXTERITY
#
DEXTERITY

Dexterity represents agility, speed and hand-to-eye coordination.
The higher your dexterity score, the easier it will be for your
character to use skills that depend on agility or quickness, and
the number of items you can carry is larger.  Natural dexterity
also gives you improved armor, making it more difficult to
be hit.

Nearly all physical skills (e.g. bash, pummel, punch) are affected
by your dexterity score.

After reaching 18 dexterity (see META), you can gain even more
dexterity from your guildmaster with quest points (see AQUEST).

  ------------------------------------------------------------
  | DEX     |  19  |  20  |  21  |  22  |  23  |  24  |  25  |
  | ARMOR   |   3  |   3  |   3  |   4  |   4  |   4  |   4  |
  | SKILL%  |   1  |   1  |   1  |   1  |   2  |   2  |   2  |
  ------------------------------------------------------------

At 25 dexterity, you have a total bonus of 40 ac and 10%
skill success.

See Also: STATS META AQUEST
          INTELLIGENCE WISDOM STRENGTH CONSTITUTION
#
"DICE DAMAGE" "DAMAGE DICE"

Dice damage is the range of damage a certain weapon has.  For
example, 3d6 means you roll three six-sided dice and add them
together.  The range of the weapon's damage would be the minimum
possible roll to the maximum possible roll.  In the case of 3d6,
the range would be 3 to 18.

To figure the average damage of a weapon, use the following
formula, where the damage dice is XdY:

(X * (Y + 1)) / 2

If there is additional damage, such as a DAMROLL +2 affect on the
weapon, add that after figuring the average, and that will give
you the total average damage of the weapon.

Example:  2d6+5 = 2(lowest roll) to 12(highest roll) +5 = 7(min dam)
          to 17(max dam) damage
#
"ANTI-ANYTHING" ANTI

Antis are flags on an item that prevent the use of that item by
certain classes or alignments.  Most items have some "anti" flags
on them.  There are a few items that have anti-auction or anti-
rent flags, so you can not rent or auction those items.

SEE ALSO: EQUIPMENT INVENTORY
#
"AUCTION HALL"

The Auction Hall is a place where you can auction off some of
your gear.  The Auctioneer only keeps a small percent of your
profit.  It is located south (s) and up (u) from Market Square.

SEE ALSO: AUCTION
#
AUTO-ASSIST AUTOASSIST

Auto-assist is illegal on RoninMud.

SEE ALSO: BOT
#
CANCEL CANCEL-MEMBERSHIP

You can cancel a membership to one of Ronin's Clubs.  You do this
by typing 'buy cancel' or by buying a membership to another club.
Remember you can only have a membership to one club.

SEE ALSO: CLUBS MEMBERSHIP
#
FAQ

There are a lot of FAQs, so we have posted them on our website.
Check it out!     www.roninmud.org
#
FOUNTAIN

Midgaard has a fountain for all to use.  It is located in Market
Square and can be used to drink from or to fill containers from.
#
GODLIST

For a list of active gods, type 'wizlist' or check out our
website for a more complete list of active and inactive gods.
www.roninmud.org

See also:  IMMORTING
#
SOCIALS

Socials are actions that you can do to yourself or to another
player or mob.  For a complete list of all the socials type 'help
social list'

SEE ALSO: 'SOCIAL LIST'
#
INSTRUCTION

See our web site (www.roninmud.org) and click on links.

SEE ALSO: INFO INFORMATION
#
"KILL FLAG"

A kill flag is a flag you get if you kill another player. Beware
though, the Cityguards will be looking for you if you have one of
these flags.

SEE ALSO: FLAG RULES
#
"BAM"
(BIG ASS MULTI)

This is a special game mode where load rates are increased.  The
multi limit remains at 5.

All regular game rules still apply.

SEE ALSO: MULTI RULES INFO
#
RASHGUGH

Rashgugh is a mob on RoninMud, but he is special.  He always
loads a subclass token, and yells about his location.  This way
everyone has a chance to kill him for his token.  Once you have
this token you can sell it or turn it in for a subclass point,
just be careful not to rent with it!

SEE ALSO: SUBCLASSES, SUBCLASS TOKEN
#
"RESTING ROOM"

Resting Rooms (RR) are clubs in Midgaard.  There are four of them
located a little north and up from Market Square.

SEE ALSO: CLUBS
#
"TRAINING GROUND"

The training ground is a place for lower level players (levels 1
through 5 typically).  It is located three (3) south (s) from
Market Square.
#
"TWO-WEAPONS"

On RoninMud, one class (Ninja) can wield more than one weapon.

SEE ALSO: NINJA
#
ZMUD TINTIN SANETIN TELNET WINTIN

These are programs you can use to connect to muds.  Zmud, Telnet,
Wintin, and SaneTin are windows based, Tintin is unix based.

Wintin and Sanetin are for the most part the same, except our
nice god Sane took Wintin and worked out a few of its bugs so it
works better.  Wintin is available at www.wintin.com, Sanetin is
available on our website www.roninmud.org.  Click on downloads.

Telnet comes with Windows.
#
AUTOQUEST AQUEST AUTOQUESTER "QUEST MACHINE" AQP "QUEST POINTS"

Every class has a guildmaster who can send you on quests for
valuable quest points.  These quest points can be used to buy
various items such as subclass points.

Ronin has several different levels of autoquests, you may
request for whichever level you feel is appropriate.  You
have 60 minutes to complete an autoquest.  Additionally, upon
requesting an autoquest, there is a chance the guildmaster
will offer an autoquest worth double quest points!  Here are
the commands and descriptions for requesting the different
levels:

AQUEST REQUEST SOLO - This will always give the player an
autoquest worth 1 point.

AQUEST REQUEST LOW - These autoquests are harder than the
previous level, and are worth 1 to 3 points.

AQUEST REQUEST MID - These autoquests are even harder, and
worth 2 to 4 points

AQUEST REQUEST HIGH - These autoquests are the hardest, and
can be worth anywhere from 3 to 6 points.

Note: Players level 24 or lower will have easier solo
autoquests than other players.

If you don't like the quest or think it's too hard, you can quit
your quest by typing "AQUEST QUIT".  However you must wait 30
ticks before being able to start a new quest.

Once you complete your quest you must return to the guildmaster
to get credit for it.  At the guildmaster type "AQUEST COMPLETE"
and you'll earn the appropriate number of quest points for the
quest.  After completing a quest, you must wait before starting
another, the amount of time you have to wait is equal to the 20
minus the amount of time it took to complete the quest, to a
minimum of five ticks.

"AQUEST INFO" will give you your current quest status.
"AQUEST LIST" will show you the items you can buy.
"AQUEST BUY" is used to buy an item.

There are other ways to have your quest end.  These include
running out of time, dying, quitting from the mud, renting,
and in the case of killing a mob, someone else killing it before
you can.

If a player is not up to doing a regular AUTOQUEST, there is a
second format for the player to try known as AQCARDS. And as if
that weren't enough options, there is also something known as
an AQORDER.

See Also: AQCARDS AQORDER QCARDS "PLAYER QUEST" "MUD QUEST"
"IMMORTAL QUEST"
#
AQCARDS QCARDS

Every class in ronin has a guildmaster who can send you on
aqcard autoquests in order to earn skill points.  These quest
points can be used to buy subclass points, or even stat
increases beyond 18.

There are several levels of autoquest cards.  However, they
all follow the same format.  When a player requests her
aqcard quest with the appropriate command, 20 cards will be
spread across Ronin.  The player must then find the
appropriate number of cards and return them to his or her
guildmaster for credit.  There is a chance on request that
his or her guildmaster will double the quest point reward.
The appropriate command is follows:

AQUEST CARD <1-5> - The player must choose a number between
1 and 5.  The guildmaster will then spread double that amount
in personalized quest cards.  The player will then come back
to be awarded a number of quest points equal to the number
selected (AQUEST CARD 5 is worth 5 points for 10 quest cards,
AQUEST CARD 2 is worth 2 points for 4 quest cards, etc. etc.).

Locating autoquest cards can be done with the "locate object"
spell.  Each questcard will be personalized for the person
requesting the autoquest.  Therefore a player may locate these
autoquest cards by casting "c 'locate object'<player name>".

If a player is not up to doing a regular AQCARDS, there is a
second format for the player to try known as AUTOQUESTS.

See Also: AUTOQUEST AQUEST AUTOQUESTER "QUEST MACHINE"
"MUD QUEST" "PLAYER QUEST" "IMMORTAL QUEST"
#
AQORDER FRANZ

Ronin's Requisition Officer who goes by the name of Franz,
offers a unique form of autoquest called an aqorder that he
rewards with quest points.  These quest points can be used to
buy subclass points, or even stat increases beyond 18.

There are several levels of AQORDER quests, which determine the
relative difficulty of the order you receive.  There is no time
limit on the autoquest, but quitting the order (by junking the
order) will incur a 2.5 hour penalty that is also cleared after
a MUD reboot.

In order to acquire an aqorder, you must first locate Franz, who
generally wanders around Midgaard, but occasionally ventures
outside of the city.  Once you find him, the appropriate commands
to request an order are as follows:

AQ ORDER NEWBIE - This will always give the player an order that
includes easy to acquire, high load rate items. It is available
as an option only until level 40. (1 point per object)

AQ ORDER LOW - This will give the player an order that contains
items from fairly easy areas, more difficult than NEWBIE orders,
or items with lower load rates, but more aimed at a low-mid level
multi with moderate gear. (2 points per object)

AQ ORDER MID - This will give the player an order that requires
items found in mid-level and average difficulty areas or items
from harder areas but with high load rates.  This level is aimed
at multis with characters in the 45-50 level range that have a
good amount of quality gear. (3 points per object)

AQ ORDER HIGH - This will give the player an order that requires
items with low load rates, or from areas that require both high
levels and good gear, or hard to reach areas. This is recommended
for players that are able to contend with most AQ REQUEST HIGH
mobs. (4 points per object)

AQ ORDER VETERAN - This will give the player an order that needs
items with low load rates from very hard or very hard to reach
areas which requires knowledge of the foe and the size to best
them. This is recommended for players that can cruise AQ REQUEST
HIGH mob content and may just want something challenging to do
on the side. (4-8 points per object)

AQ ORDER UBER - This will give the player an order that requires
items with very low load rates from some of the most challenging
mobs. Only the very burliest of multis could even dream of doing
these alone, even on BAM. It is available as an option only to
characters at or above level 45. (10, 15, 20, or 25 points per
object)

AQ ORDER - This will give the player a random mix of items from
all tiers of aqorder autoquests.

The AQ Order itself is actually a special container meant to
hold the items required to complete the aqorder itself.  Only
the items listed on the order can be put into the order, and
only items obtained after the order was issued can be put
inside.  Once all of the required items have been placed in the
aqorder container, return it to Franz and he will reward you
based on the difficulty of the items present on the order. There
is a 30 minute wait period between completing an order and being
able to get a new one.

There is also a chance that the quest point reward will be
increased upon successful turn-in of the aqorder, at the whim
of Franz. The more difficult the order, the higher the chance.
To quit an order you need only junk the order itself, but keep
in mind that there is a 2.5 hour penalty before you can request
a new one; and Franz might give you a hard time about it.

See Also: AUTOQUEST AQUEST AUTOQUESTER "QUEST MACHINE"
"MUD QUEST" "PLAYER QUEST" "IMMORTAL QUEST"
#
"PLAYER QUEST" "IMMORTAL QUEST" "MUD QUEST"

On Ronin, it is not uncommon for an immortal level or higher
player to run a MUD wide quest.  These quests can cover a wide
variety of formats.  Whether it is a cooperative game, trivia,
find the quest cards, easter eggs, player vs player, item
retrieval, etc.  The rewards for participating in these quests,
or winning these quests is for the most part, completely up to
the person running them.  However, a list of rewards may fall
into one of these categories, but is not restricted to these
categories:

**ANTI-RENTS - Anti-Rents are of the highest category of
equipment in Ronin, however, as their name suggests, a player
cannot rent one of these items out.  Additionally, over time
it will decay into dust.

**Quest Tokens - Quest tokens can be traded in on Ronin for a
variety of things.  The first of which is to add a vanity to an
item that has a special affect on it (spec).

**Quest Gear - Quest gear is high level equipment that is only
available when an immortal player hands them out over quests.
It is highly valuable, and in limited supply.

**Quest Points - It is not uncommon for immortal players to hand
out Quest Points to players who participate and/or win a quest.

**Die Roll - The player could potentially win a random prize to
be determined by a d20 die roll.  Another version of this die
roll is to be granted Quest Points or Subclass points depending
on the roll.

See Also: "DIE ROLL" "QUEST GEAR" "QUEST TOKENS" "ANTI-RENTS"
#
"DIE ROLL"

There are two varieties of die rolls.  The first is a random item
to be won based on a d20 die roll.  The second, is Token and AQ
points that may be won based off a d20 die roll.

The quest reward chart is as follows:

1 - Choice of Potion
2 - Walkin/out
3 - +1 Hitroll to a non-quest item with a spot, makes limited
4 - Free Vanity (no spec gear)
5 - Free HP or Mana Meta
6 - Subclass Token Roll
7 - +10 HP to a non-quest item with a spot, makes limited
8 - AQ Point Roll
9 - Anti-Rent Item - Quest Runner's Choice
10 - Walkin/out
11 - Subclass Token Roll
12 - +1 Damroll to a non-quest item with a spot, makes limited
13 - Free Vanity (Non-spec Item)
14 - Choice of Potion
15 - +10 Mana to a non-quest item with a spot, makes limited
16 - AQ Point Roll
17 - Anti-Rent Item, Quest Runner's Choice
18 - -5 AC to a non-quest item with a spot, makes limited
19 - Free HP or Mana Meta
20 - Subclass Token Roll AND AQ Point Roll

The Token and AQ points to be won are as follows:

1-9 - 2 Tokens / 5 AQ Pts
10-14 - 3 Tokens / 10 AQ Pts
15-19 - 4 Tokens / 15 AQ Pts
20 - 5 Tokens / 20 AQ Pts

SEE ALSO: "MUD QUEST" "PLAYER QUEST" "IMMORTAL QUEST"
#
"QUEST GEAR"

Quest gear is very special on Ronin.  Though not always unique, it is
always in limited supply.  It is rarely handed out, and therefore of
high value.  The stats on these items are usually comparable to the
best loading gear, or in many cases, better than any item that loads in
the game.

See Also: "MUD QUEST" "PLAYER QUEST" "IMMORTAL QUEST"
#
"QUEST TOKENS"

In Ronin, the reward for winning certain quests is a Quest Token.  These
are always of high trade value between players.  They can always be traded
in for a vanity on an item that carries a special affect (spec).  During
certain times on Ronin, they can also be traded in for a wide variety of
quest rewards.

See Also: "MUD QUEST" "PLAYER QUEST" "IMMORTAL QUEST"
#
"ANTI-RENTS"

In Ronin there are three forms of Anti-Rent quest rewards.  The first
form, is to simply hand them out to the players, and let them use them
until they log off or get bored.  The second, are hard recipes.  These
require ingredients which are hard to obtain, as their name indicates.
The third and final form, are easy recipes, which are easy to find items.
The bonus of recipes over the actual items, is the fact that recipes may
be stored in ones vault, or rented out.  However, the recipe will disappear
once the item is crafted.

The stats on Anti-Rents are as follows:

Rusty Spoon: 6D6 +9 +9, Fury Wield

Ubertank Plate: Body 70 AC App 500 HP 100 HP regen Sanc/Dodge

Crash Helmet: Sanc/Invul/Sphere/Prot Good&Evil 30 AC 10 Dam

Regenerator: 10 dam 150 Mana Regen 250 Hp Regen 30 AC

Can of Whoopass Held 30 Dam 30 Hitroll 30 HP 30 AC Dual

Cloak of Caster's Choice: 500 Mana 100 Mana Regen 10 Dam Sphere 30 AC About

Boots of Super Dooper Swiftliness: Imp Invis, 10 dam 10k moves 30 ac Feet

See Also: "RECIPES" "MUD QUEST" "PLAYER QUEST" "IMMORTAL QUEST"
#
"REIMBURSEMENT"

Ronin's reimbursement policy is simple.  Unless there is an
incredibly good reason, we do not reimburse for anything.

Some things we do NOT reimburse for include...

o Dying and just leaving your corpse until reboot, intending to
get reimbursed for it then.

o Losing equipment in rent due to lack of gold.  Use the 1.5x
rent in bank feature, it'll save you a lot of pain.

o Dying just before a reboot at a location where it would be
impossible for anyone to collect the corpse in any reasonable
amount of time.  If you expect to die in a battle, it isn't wise
to attempt that battle 5 minutes before reboot.

o Router lag, although unfortunate, is also out of our control and
will not be reason for reimbursement, at the decision of the
administrators.

o Giving gear to mobs, be they charmed mobs or otherwise, is done
at your own risk.  This is under your own control and will
therefore not be subject to reimbursement.

Please remember that getting equipment reimbursed is not a right.
If the administrators feel you have a justified reason for a
reimbursement, you'll get one.
#
"HASTE"

Usage       : cast 'haste' (self only)
Level       : level 40 cleric, 45 bard
Accumulative: no
Save        : -
Duration    : 5 ticks
Mana cost   : 120

When affected by haste, the player is moving fairly quickly,
allowing him an automatic second attack during the fight. The
chance of its success depends on how well you learn it.
#
"CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS" "POINTS"
Class placement points rank the top ten players in each class.
Points are gained by various means, such as leveling or gaining
mana and/or hit points.  Your base stats such as strength and
intelligence can also influence the number of points you receive.
You can see the top 10 players for each class at that class'
guildmaster.

See Also: -
#
"WEB PAGE"

Our web page link is

http://www.roninmud.org
#
HOSPITAL

For those who are below level 16, there is a Nice new Hospital
located North, west, and up from Market square.

The doctor will gladly exchange your gold for a healing or
protection spell.
#
UNFOLLOW

Usage: unfollow <player>

  This will allow you to stop someone from following you.

See Also: FOLLOW REFOLLOW
#
LOTTERY

The Midgaard lottery is a great way for the lucky to win cash and
equipment.  It is located in the southern section of Midgaard
near the concourse, just a few short moves from the Mayor's
office.  One of the many possible paths to take is 4w,5s,4e,s,e
from Market Square.

Once you get to the lottery machine, look at it for basic
instructions and a list of things that are going to be drawn for.
When you purchase a ticket, that ticket is assigned a ticket
number, a lot number and a color.  To win, both numbers on the
ticket must match during the drawing.

To move your tickets around in your inventory, both the color and
the lot number can be used.  For example, a red ticket with lot
number 4 can be put in a bag with the command "put red bag" or
"put lot4 bag".

If you wanted to move the third ticket in your inventory it would
be "put 3.red bag" or "put 3.lot4 bag".

Players may buy an unlimited number of tickets assuming they have
the cash and storage space to do so.  Remember, the rent limit is
only 200 items, so a large number of tickets would need to be
stored in a vault or on another character.  It is possible to buy
multiple tickets at once and have a range of tickets on one
object.
#
HOME

Usage: home

Until you reach level 10, you can type home and magically appear
in the Temple of Midgaard.  At level 10 and higher, you will need
to buy recall scrolls from the Magic shop, which is located 2
west and 1 north from Market Square.
#
"COMPARISON COMMANDS"

skills/spells/train

We use the command PRACTICE.  Outside your guild, it shows what
you have learned.  Inside your guild, it shows what you can
learn. Find your guild by checking out the map you may have in
inventory.  Examples: practice, practice kick

Note

We use a board system where you type LOOK BOARD to see what
messages there are to read, and READ <number> to read a
particular message.  If you want to write on the board, simply
type WRITE <subject line> and enter your message.

target

We don't have a target system here.  You need to specify the
target of each command.

exp

Type SCORE to see your current experience.  Type LEVELS to see
the experience you need for each level gain.

If the command you tried isn't here, and you can't find something
comparable in these help files, please post a small message to
the board located 3 north and 1 west from Market Square.
#
"INTRODUCTION"

Welcome Adventurer, to the land of Ronin.  You have entered a
world where monsters plague the land, and the town of Midgaard is
in need of some young new adventurers to lend some brawn, book,
or slight of hand.  You have decided on a long journey to
greatness.

For the young adventurer there are many new things to learn.  The
donation room would be a good place to start.  Located just west
of the Temple of Midgaard, you can find some useful weapons and
equipment to aid you in future battles. Keep in mind that near
the Clerics' Guild is a hospital that will cure any wounds you
may receive in battle for a very low price.

Now, you can dare proceed to a small field just south of
Midgaard.  Located a distance south from the Market Square you
can battle some fearsome creatures to sharpen your swordsmanship
or scribe your magic books!  As you advance in your skills, you
may decide to take your adventures to the local zoo.  There are
many animals waiting to test your fighting skills.  This is
located to the southwest of town.

Once you feel very confident in abilities, you can proceed to
killing the fungi that roam the Welmar Sewers.  Located very far
east from town, you can follow the King's Road into the castle,
and down into the sewers.  You can battle the fungi that lurk
there.

Once you finish these grueling tasks, you have started on your
path to becoming a fine young adventurer.  You must converse with
other adventurers, young and old alike.  You can share stories
and learn of new experiences, as well as of different places to
take your fighting skills.  Also, remember when in need of aid,
seek out a deputy, and he will surely help you.  Enjoy your
adventures, friend, and may the Gods be with you.
#
"INFORMATION"

Multis are limited to 5 chars at a time.

HELP PKILL AND PSTEAL, as you will be held responsible for
knowing the info contained therein.  Pkill and Psteal are limited
to those areas marked with a [*].  Corpse looting is always
illegal and will be treated with the harshest punishment.

Character sharing and playing 6 multies is not permitted.
Playing a 6th is defined as any connection of a 6th character for
any reason other than exchanging eq.  Linkdead characters count.
If you take that 6th character out of the reception area, you are
counted as playing that char. See HELP MULTI.

Character trading is illegal.  See HELP TRADE.

Players should know the rent rules.  See HELP RENT

Visit our Homepage at
    http://www.roninmud.org

See Also: HELP INDEX to see what is available in the help files.
          HELP HIGHLIGHTS for a summary of what we have to offer
#
"HIGHLIGHTS"

Some highlights about RoninMUD.
  - Challenging original areas.         (AREAS MAP)
  - 50 levels with 10 classes.          (LEVELS CLASSES)
  - Meta system to improve stats.       (META EXP)
  - Multiplaying to a max of 5 characters.   (MULTI)
  - Many communication channels.             (GOSSIP, AUCTION, CHAOS, QUEST)
  - Helpful friendly players.           (DEPUTY)
  - Extensive help file.                (HELP, HELP INDEX)
  - Configurable ANSI Color system.     (COLOR)
  - Easy way to trade equipment.        (AUCTION TRADE)
  - Storage vaults for equipment.       (VAULTS)
  - Ranking Abilities                   (RANKS)
  - Hospital for low level players      (HOSPITAL)
  - Subclass System                     (SUBCLASSES)

A few rules to remember
  - Character sharing is not permitted.
  - Player killing only allowed in special areas.  (PKILL)
  - Looting another player's corpse is illegal.     (PKILL PSTEAL)
  - Botting is strictly forbidden.                 (BOTTING)
  - Highly offensive language is not permitted on public channels.

Useful information for new players
  - HELP GUIDE, HELP NEWBIE, HELP POLICY, HELP RENT, HELP INDEX

Useful links
  - RoninMUD      http://www.roninmud.org
  - Mud clients   http://www.roninmud.org/downloads.html
  - Tintin help   http://www.roninmud.org/tt-help.html

HELP INDEX will provide you with all the available help topics.
#
CHANNEL

This command will show you which channels you have on, or list the
players on a particular channel.

Usage: channel <gossip/quest/auction/chaos>

See Also: GOSSIP AUCTION QUEST CHAOS
#
CLANS

Clans are usually a group of players that hang out together and decide to
become more organized as a group.  Normally they share equipment and vaults,
and the more established clans have their own clan houses.

The cost of forming an official clan recognized by the game
without a clan hall is 30 million coins.

See Also: CLAN HOUSE
#
"CLAN HALL" "CLAN HOUSE"

A clan has the option to buy its own little clan house.  All the members
need is the money and someone willing to make the house for them.

The prices for a clan house are:

starting two rooms (with board) - 80 million coins
receptionist         - 50M
vault guard          - 50M
each additional room - 20M
club flag            - 50M
metaphysician        - 50M
shopkeeper           - 50M

If you spend over 250M there will be a 10% reduction in overall cost.

Clan hall placement must be near Midgaard and it cannot have any special
exits to far-away areas.

See Also: CLANS
#
PRACTICE

Use practice with your guild to improve your knowledge of skills and spells.

Used outside your guild, practice shows you the skills and spells you know
and how well you know them.
#
AFK BRB BOM ABBREVIATIONS

Common Abbreviations you might hear others using.

afk - Away from keyboard
brb - be right back
bom - Bracelet of Magic
#
NOSHOUT NSHOUT

This is a powerful ability given to the gods.  It allows them to effectively
prevent any mortal from communicating with others.

Noshouts are given to mortals who are verbally abusive or spam frequently.

See Also: POLICY SPAM
#
"TIME ZONES"
  GMT     EST         GMT     EST
 22:00   5:00 pm     10:00   5:00 am
 23:00   6:00 pm     11:00   6:00 am
  0:00   7:00 pm     12:00   7:00 am
  1:00   8:00 pm     13:00   8:00 am
  2:00   9:00 pm     14:00   9:00 am
  3:00  10:00 pm     15:00  10:00 am
  4:00  11:00 pm     16:00  11:00 am
  5:00  12:00 pm     17:00  12:00 am
  6:00   1:00 am     18:00   1:00 pm
  7:00   2:00 am     19:00   2:00 pm
  8:00   3:00 am     20:00   3:00 pm
  9:00   4:00 am     21:00   4:00 pm

For North America Standard Zones are:
NST: EST+1:30 (Newfoundland)
AST: EST+1:00 (Atlantic)
EST:          (Eastern)
CST: EST-1:00 (Central)
MST: EST-2:00 (Mountain)
PST: EST-3:00 (Pacific)
#
BLEED

When your hit points reach a certain level, you get a warning message in
capitals.  This warning message can either occur below 1/5 of your maximum
hit points (default) or at a level you set yourself with the bleed command.

Type: bleed <number> to set your desired level.

See Also: WIMPY
#
HUNGRY HUNGER THIRST THIRSTY

If you are hungry or thirsty, the amount your hit points and mana increase each
tick is lower.  If you're over a certain age, your hit points and mana may
actually decrease.  This decrease gets larger the older you are.

However, it is impossible to starve to death.

See Also: AGE
#
BAN

Helping a banned player connect to Ronin, or helping a banned player while in
the game is highly frowned upon.

Any punishment for the breaking of this policy will be dependent on the level
of aid given.
#
BOTTING

Botting is defined as using scripts and actions to have your characters play
the mud without any input from you.

Botting is illegal on Ronin, and punishment can range from characters being
locked to a full ban.  The level of punishment depends on the level of the
botting activity.

The only legal actions are those for auto-loot, auto-split, auto-eat and auto-
drink.  Auto-assists and auto-pummels fall under the bot category.  Please note
that aliases such as: #al {pum}{#20 pummel} are not actions and are not
considered bots in any way.


To ensure you are not using a bot, or even a semi-bot, do not use actions that
directly affect your characters.  Actions should only send text to your screen
to alert you to a required response.
#
VICIOUS

When in vicious mode, you will automatically kill mortally wounded creatures.
Combat will not stop.

For good aligned players, a small alignment decrease will happen each time you
are vicious.
#
MOTD

This shows the current message of the day for your level.

If you are under level 6, you see the newbie motd. If you are not a god and
above level 6 you see the mortal motd.  If you are a god, you see the god

motd.

You can also view other motds by using the following commands. The god motd is
only available to gods.

'motd newbie' 'motd mortal'
#
POLICY

The commandments of RoninMUD.
-----------------------------

Thou shalt not kill thy fellow player unless he desires to die. (PKILL)

Thou shalt not steal thy fellow player's belongings. (PSTEAL)

Thou shalt not trade or sell thy equipment for monetary reward outside
this realm.  (TRADING)

Thou shall refrain from using abusive or offensive language on the
public channels or face the wrath of thy gods.  (GOSSIP)

Thou shalt not share thy characters with anyone else or give thy
characters away. (TRADE)

Thou shalt not possess more than five bodies at one time.  (MULTI)

Thou shalt not spam thy fellow mortal.

Thou shalt not bot (BOTTING).

Thou shalt not aid banned players. (BAN)

Thou shall have fun and tell all thy friends about this realm.
#
TRADING TRADE

Trading equipment is a great way to improve you characters and this practice is
supported by Ronin.

However, we frown on players selling equipment for real life money or trading
equipment for real life items.  Players caught doing this will be locked.

Trading or selling characters is also illegal.  Any character that has been
traded to another player will be purged.
#
DEPUTY

A Midgaard Deputy is given extra abilities and benefits to aid them
in helping new citizens of Midgaard.  They will show new players the tips
and tricks of mudding at Ronin, and help them gain valuable experience
and equipment.

Currently Deputies have the ability to rescue anyone below level 15,
regardless of the Deputy's class.

See Also: RESCUE
#
GOSSIP

Usage: gossip - turns gossip channel on/off
       gossip <message> - broadcasts your message to the gossip channel

This is a communication channel that is broadcast to everyone who has the
channel turned on, no matter where he is.  This channel is very useful if you
get in trouble or if you just want to ask a question about something but you
aren't sure who would know the answer.  Thus you ask everyone at the same time.
You do not gain the use of this channel until you have reached level 3.  You
also can lose the use of this channel if a god deems it necessary.  Just
remember to keep your language clean and refrain from spamming people.

Out of courtesy for your fellow mudders, please keep all gossips in English.

See Also: GF CHAOS QUEST AUCTION
#
GF

Usage: gf <action>

This is just like typing a social action, except the actions occur on the
gossip channel.  You may also target anyone in the world with your action.

See Also: GOSSIP
#
DEATH DEAD

When you run out of hit points, you will die.  You will get more wounded until
you reach -10 hit points, at which point you actually die - so there is a
chance that you can get healed.  All spells that you were affected by before
death are lost.

It is also possible to lose some of your hit points or mana when you die.  How
much you lose depends on how much your class is over the hit point or mana
limit given below.

   Class            Hp Limit       Mana Limit
   -------------------------------------------
   Magic User         250             500
   Cleric             250             500
   Thief              450             100
   Warrior            500             100
   Ninja              350             350
   Nomad              600             100
   Paladin            350             350
   Anti-Paladin       350             350
   Bard               300             400
   Commando           400             350

You will also lose 1/2 of your accumulated experience when you die.
#
JUMP

Helps you to get over some obstacles.

Jump <object>
jump crack
#
CLIMB

This gets you up and down.  You might want to make sure that you have a firm
grip though.  Climbing can be REAL dangerous.

Climb <object>
Climb ladder
#
CRAWL

This helps you to get under obstacles, or in tight places.  Just make sure
they're not too tight.

Crawl <object>
crawl hole
#
MOVE

This will get stuff out of your way... if you are strong enough, you little
wimp!!

Move <object>
move boulder
#
INDEX

Just a placeholder.
#
GUIDE RULES ETHICS GUIDELINES

There are a few guidelines you should keep in mind while mudding:

1) Don't loot another player's corpse (See PSTEAL)
2) Don't steal from other players unless in an arena (See PSTEAL)
3) Don't attack another player unless in an arena (See PKILL)
4) Abusive language on the gossip channel is frowned upon.  So is spamming
   and whining.
5) Please don't take things from the donation room and put them into auction.
   The stuff in there is intended to start out newbies, not as a quick way
   to earn your rent.
6) Character sharing and trading are not permitted (TRADE).
7) Multis are limited to 5 characters (MULTI)
8) Botting is strictly forbidden. (BOT)
9) Remember we're here to have fun.  The gods too.
#
NEWBIE NEWBIES NEWBIEHELP TIPS HINTS

For the first time player of Ronin here are a few tips:
--------------------------------------------------------
If you're in trouble type HOME, this will bring you back to the temple.
(HELP HOME)

There's a donation room to the west of the Temple where you start.  Go there
and equip yourself for the adventures ahead.  When you can afford it you should
buy a recall scroll from the Magic Shop which is 2 west and 1 north from Market
Square.  Having one will save your life.
(See HELP SCROLL)

There is a free resting room located north of the Grunting Boar Inn.
Thats n,e,e,n from market square.  While in this room, players under
level 16 will get 1.5x the regeneration on all stats.

We also provide a hospital for any player below level 16.  It can be
found n,w,u from market square. (HELP HOSPITAL)

We also have a voting booth located in Midgaard to be used by level 9 and
above. We encourage players to vote on the various issues in discussion, with
one of their multis only, per topic.

For the first 2-3 levels go south from the Market Square to the Training
Grounds and fight some weaker mobs.  Use the 'consider' command to find the
easiest mobs and start with them.

After you've (hopefully) advanced a couple of times you should visit the
beautiful Midgaard Zoo which is located 4 west and 10 south from the Market.
#
"CHAOS NIGHT"

A special competition that takes place on Halloween and is a fight to the death
between all players that are on.  The contest is hosted by Ronin's test site.
A valuable prize is given to the last person alive.

See Also: CHAOS "CHAOS ZONE"
#
ALIGNMENT EVIL-ALIGNMENT GOOD-ALIGNMENT NEUTRAL-ALIGNMENT

Your alignment reflects your behaviour in the world.  By doing heroic deeds and
slaying evil monsters your alignment tends to rise towards good.  Someone who
continually slays innocents and wreaks havoc on the forces of law and order
will gradually turn towards evil.  All characters (Except Anti-Paladin/Paladin)
start out neutral and will only be judged by their actions.
#
TANK BUFFER

The tank or buffer is the character in the group that's being hit by the
monsters.  Usually this is the character with the most hit points.  Aggressive
monsters usually attack the last person in the group.  This position is often
referred to as 'the tank position'.
#
AGE

Age affects your mana and hit point regeneration.  The closer you are to your
prime, the faster you regenerate.  After a certain age your regeneration starts
to go down again.  No one dies of old age on Ronin.  How old you are will also
affect how many hit points or mana points you will lose while hungry or
thirsty.

Age has changed.  Characters not having logged in since Mid July, 1998 will
find themselves about half the age they previously were.  Also, every 4 TICKS
is now 1 mud hour and the meta man also has an option to increase age.

See Also: HUNGRY THIRSTY
#
HITTER HITTERS

A hitter is a character that is wearing as much damage equipment as possible in
order to do more damage.  In a trio of multis there is usually one hitter, a
tank and a healer.
#
MULTI MULTIS

RoninMUD allows a single player to have five characters logged on at the same
time.  Note that a linkdead character counts towards this limit.  More than
five characters may only be logged on when all characters remain in the
reception or vault room for the SOLE purpose of exchanging equipment.  This
means that logging on more than five characters to have one of the chars cast
a spell on your other characters while all are in reception is PROHIBITED.

          1st offense:  1 char locked for 10 days.
          2nd offense:  All chars locked for 10 days.
          3rd offense:  At least one character deleted.
          4th offense:  Full-scale purge of all characters involved,
                        possible siteban.  At this point you obviously
                        are unable to learn and we just plain give up.
#
MANA MAGIC

Mana represents the ability of a character to manipulate the magical forces in
the world.  Mana also represents power.  The more mana your character has the
more powerful your spellcaster is.

High level characters have a chance for their spells to cost less than normal
mana.  This increase has a higher chance and becomes larger for every level
beyond 40 that the caster obtains, with the maximum chance and reduced cost
applied at level 50.
#
HP HPS HITS HIT HITPOINTS

Hit points represent your character's life force.  Damage you receive lowers
the number of hit points you have, and lowering them to -10 will result in your
death.  A character with many hit points, such as a high level nomad, will be
able to withstand a much stronger blow than a character such as a low level
mage.

See also:  WIMPY
#
CLASSES CLASS

There are currently 10 classes available to players on RoninMUD.  Here's a
brief description of each:

Anti-Paladin  A warrior-thief class.  An excellent balance of skills and
              spells makes this the perfect solo class.  Their versatility
              does mean that they are slightly weaker hitters and not
              really suitable for tank duties either.

Bard          A weak class on its own but has group-affecting songs that
              are extremely useful to a party.  Not well suited for solo
              play.

Cleric        The powerhouse healing machine.  A party without a cleric
              is almost crippled.  Clerics have no skills, only spells.
              They are limited to bludgeoning weapons only.

Commando      A warrior-mage class.  A good choice for a hitter if you
              want some extra damage spells in your group.  Solo potential
              is excellent and only hampered by low hit points.

Ninja         Second best solo class after Anti-Paladins.  Not as well
              balanced but has the enormous benefit of being able to wield
              two weapons.  Ninjas are excellent hitters.

Nomad         The best tank in the game.  The Nomad class has reduced cost
              for hit point metas and the fastest way to get a tank with
              tons of hit points is to create a Nomad.  They've got a good
              combination of useful skills as well.

Paladin       A well balanced warrior class with good healing spells.
              The Paladin's 'fury' spell makes it a popular choice as a
              hitter.  Almost as good as a ninja when soloing.

Thief         Excellent solo choice also. Hit points are not as high as
              Nomads or Warriors, but thieves get good HP gain. They are
              excellent hitters and can do the highest non-magical damage
              during combat using the 'Circle' skill. Other skills like
              Backstab, Hide, Sneak, Peek and Pick make the thief very
              versatile. The only disadvantage is that they do not have any
              spells and that they can only use piercing weapons to use their
              skills.

Warrior       The second best tank class in the game.  While they don't get
              the cheap hit points metas and massive hit points of the Nomad
              they are better hitters and are the preferred choice of many
              players for tanks.

Mage          Powerful damage spells are the Mage's forte.  His low hit
              points are his weak side and most mages need a stout tank
              in front of them to stay alive.  His limited choice of weapons
              makes him a poor hitter too.  Not well suited for solo play.
#
"NINJA SPELLS"

    Ninja Spells
----------------------------------------------------------------------
     (1) Detect Invisible               (2) -
     (3) Endure                         (4) Cure Light
     (5) Infravision                    (6) Blindness
     (7) Invisibility                   (9) Cure Blind
    (10) Sense Life                    (11) Control Weather
    (12) Remove Poison                 (14) Locate Object
    (15) -                             (16) Blindness Dust
    (16) Cure Serious                  (17) Poison Smoke
    (19) Word Of Recall                (20) -
    (21) Clairvoyance                  (22) Hypnotize
    (24) Hold Person                   (25) -
    (26) -                             (27) Convergence
    (29) Heal                          (30) Wind Slash
    (40) Divine Wind                   (50) Mystic Swiftness
#
"COMMANDO SPELLS"

    Commando Spells
----------------------------------------------------------------------
     (1) Magic Missile                  (2) Chill Touch
     (3) Burning Hands                  (4) -
     (5) Shocking Grasp                 (6) Earthquake
     (7) Lightning Bolt                 (8) -
     (9) -                             (10) Colour Spray
    (11) -                             (12) Call Lightning
    (14) Harm                          (15) Fireball
    (16) -                             (17) -
    (18) -                             (19) Word Of Recall
    (20) Iceball                       (21) -
    (22) -                             (23) -
    (24) Death Spray                   (25) -
    (27) Lethal Fire                   (28) Disintegrate
    (29) Electric Shock                (32) Vampiric Touch
    (50) Rush
#
"PALADIN SPELLS"

    Paladin Spells
----------------------------------------------------------------------
     (1) Cure Light                     (2) Armor
     (3) Create Food                    (4) Detect Alignment
     (4) Create Water                   (5) Cure Serious
     (5) Detect Invisibility            (6) Bless
     (6) Sense Life                     (7) Cure Blind
     (7) -                              (8) -
     (9) -                             (10) Cure Critic
    (10) Flamestrike                   (11) -
    (11) -                             (12) -
    (14) Vitality, Remove Poison       (15) Lay Hands
    (16) -                             (17) Locate Object
    (18) Summon                        (19) Dispel Evil
    (20) Sanctuary                     (21) Heal
    (21) Fury                          (22) -
    (23) -                             (24) Protection from Evil
    (25) Holy Word                     (26) Hold Person
    (27) -                             (28) -
    (29) -                             (32) Super Harm
#
"ANTI-PALADIN SPELLS"

    Anti-Paladin Spells
----------------------------------------------------------------------
     (1) Magic Missile                  (2) Detect Poison
     (3) Chill Touch                    (4) Detect Alignment
     (5) Detect Invisibility            (6) Poison
     (7) Blindness                      (8) Curse
     (9) Invisibility                  (10) Fear
    (11) Infravision                   (12) Lightning Bolt
    (13) Sense Life                    (14) Forget
    (15) Energy Drain                  (16) Poison Smoke
    (17) Blindness Dust                (18) Protection from Good
    (19) Sleep                         (20) Fireball
    (21) Paralyze                      (22) Dispel Good
    (23) Iceball                       (24) Vampiric Touch
    (25) Spirit Levy                   (26) Evil Word
    (27) Hypnotize                     (28) Hell Fire
    (29) Improved Invisibility         (30) Power Word Kill
         Remove Improved Invisibility
    (40) Perceive                      (45) Blood Lust
    (50) Rage
#
"CLERIC SPELLS"

    Cleric Spells
----------------------------------------------------------------------
     (1) Cure Light Wounds              (1) Armor
     (2) Create Water                   (2) Detect Poison
     (3) Create Food                    (3) Detect Magic
     (4) Cure Blind                     (4) Detect Alignment
     (4) Cure Light Spray
     (5) Bless                          (5) Detect Invisible
     (6) Blindness                      (6) Protection from Evil
     (6) Cure Serious                   (6) Protection from Good
     (7) Earthquake                     (7) Sense Life
     (8) Summon                         (8) Poison
     (9) Cure Critic                    (9) Remove Poison
    (10) Locate Object                 (10) Dispel Evil
    (10) Cure Serious Spray
    (11) Word of Recall                (11) Flamestrike
    (11) Dispel Good
    (12) Call Lightning                (12) Remove Curse
    (13) Control Weather               (13) Sanctuary
    (13) Cure Critic Spray
    (14) Heal                          (14) Remove Paralysis
    (14) Locate Character
    (15) Harm                          (15) Satiate
    (16) Vitality                      (16) Clairvoyance
    (16) Searing Orb
    (17) Dispel Magic
    (18) Total Recall                  (18) Mana Transfer
    (19) Holy Bless
    (20) Recharge                      (20) Evil Bless
    (21) -
    (22) Heal Spray
    (23) Holy Word                     (23) Evil Word
    (24) Animate Dead
    (25) Miracle
    (26) -
    (27) Super Harm
    (28) Invulnerability
    (30) Great Miracle
    (40) Haste                         (50) Divine Intervention
#
"MAGE SPELLS"

    Mage Spells
----------------------------------------------------------------------
     (1) Magic Missile                  (1) Ventriloquate
     (2) Detect Magic                   (2) Detect Invisible
     (3) Chill Touch
     (4) Invisibility                   (4) Detect Alignment
     (4) Detect Poison
     (5) Burning Hands                  (5) Armor
     (5) Infravision
     (6) Locate Object                  (6) Reveal
     (7) Shocking Grasp                 (7) Strength (SPELL STRENGTH)
     (7) Identify
     (8) Blindness                      (8) Teleport with Error
     (8) Vitality
     (9) Lightning Bolt                 (9) Fear
    (10) Control Weather               (10) Fly
    (10) Reappear
    (11) Colour Spray                  (11) Forget
    (11) Locate Character
    (12) Enchant Weapon                (12) Curse
    (13) Energy Drain                  (13) Word of Recall
    (13) Remove Curse
    (14) Sleep                         (14) Charm Person
    (15) Fireball
    (16) -
    (17) Recharge
    (18) Mana Transfer                 (18) Sphere
    (18) Vampiric Touch                (18) Clairvoyance
    (19) Iceball                       (19) Dispel Magic
    (20) Spirit Levy
    (21) Hold Person                   (21) Convergence
    (21) Enchant Armour
    (22) Animate Dead
    (23) Death Spray
    (24) Lethal Fire
    (25) Improved Invisibility         (25) Remove Improved Invisibility
    (26) Electric Shock                (26) Power Word Kill
    (27) Clone                         (27) Disintegrate
    (27) Relocate
    (28) Thunderball                   (28) Firebreath
    (28) Regeneration (SPELL REGENERATION)
    (29) Invulnerability               (29) Paralyze
    (30) Conflagration
    (40) Perceive                      (50) Quick
#
STABLES

The Midgaard stables provide the adventurer with a trustworthy mount.  These
mounts help you save energy and reduce the use of your movement points while
being ridden.  They also accept your orders and will be only too glad to assist
you.

There are many types of mounts for all types of character levels and
alignments.  Just be sure to read the signs on the way in, since all sales
are final.

The Stables can be found west of Common Square.

Various commands for the mounts

RIDE     - Usage: ride <name>
DISMOUNT - Usage: dismount
FREE     - Usage: free - lets mount go
#
AUCTION

Usage: auction <object> <start bid>

This command puts objects in auction.
To get your items, go to the auction hall and type "buy item, or buy all."
To collect your money, go to the auction hall and type "collect."

To see a listing of items available, type "look board."

To identify items in auction see HELP IDENTIFY.

The auctioneer will reduce items over a certain amount if they have been
available for over 2 days.  After the reboot, sold items that have not been
picked up are returned to the board.

After 4 days, the auctioneer takes any unclaimed coin.

Auction is also used for the auction channel, and the command by itself toggles
the auction channel on and off.

SEE ALSO: BID IDENTIFY TRADING GOSSIP CHAOS
#
BID

Usage: bid <lot number> <amount>

To bid on objects auctioned. To raise a bid it must be at least 1000 coins
higher than the last one.

SEE ALSO: AUCTION IDENTIFY
#
IDENTIFY

Usage: identify <lot number>

This command will identify the object in auction.  The cost for
this service is 3500 coins.

Additionally, there are identify scrolls that may be found in
several magic shops across Ronin.  These scrolls may be used
to identify items, players, and monsters.  Identifying a
monster will give detailed information about the monster, and
is a wise tool to be used before attempting a new challenge.

SEE ALSO: BID AUCTION "SPELL IDENTIFY" CONSIDER
#
QUEST

Usage: quest <text message>/<flag>

By itself this command toggles the quest channel on and off.

Using "quest flag", the player toggles his/her quest status on/off.

The quest status is used by IMM+ to run quests.  Many functions are available
to the IMM+ that will affect you if you have your quest status on.  For this
reason, the quest status is automatically turned off during renting or
quitting.

The quest channel will remain on through a rent or quit.
#
COLOR

Color allows you to toggle color on and off as well as set the color attributes
for certain messages. You must have a VT100 or Ansi compatible terminal for
color to work. Usage:
  >Color
  Toggle Color on and off

  > Color list
  List current color settings

  > Color colors
  List available colors

  > Color set <field> <color>
  Set color of field to color

  Example:
  > Color set i 7
  Will set color of "says" to Red

In addition, using the color code `` in front of a color letter
will change the rest of the text you type to that color.

For example ``i`iThis text is red.

SEE ALSO: DISPLAY
#
WARRIOR FIGHTER

Warriors are known to have more strength than the average character.
This makes them better at hand-to-hand-combat, as they possess skills
of violence and fighting unequaled by the members of any other class.
However, they lack the ability to use magic of any sort.  Warriors
also get 5 natural armor points for every 5 levels, and an additional
practice % on parry for every 10 levels.

You can improve your skills by using the practice command.

Skills: bash, block, disarm, dual, kick, knock, parry, punch, rescue,
        spin, throw, triple (level 20), disembowel (level 40), quad (level 50)

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
THIEF
 
Thieves are known to have some special skills that no other class
offers. These skills can come in handy in many situations, such as
picking locks and 'acquiring' things.  Thieves also get 2 natural
armor points for every 5 levels.
 
You can improve your skills by using the practice command.
 
Skills: backstab, circle, dodge, hide, kick, sneak, steal, peek, pick, throw,
        coin toss, scan (level 35), twist (level 45), cunning (level 50)
 
See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
CLERIC

Clerics have an ancient taboo against carrying sharp weapons. Hence, they can
only wield bludgeoning weapons. This class gives you the wisdom of peace,
blessing and healing, though it is possible to learn more violent spells.

You can improve your spells by using the practice command.

Use HELP CLERIC SPELLS to see the spells of the cleric class.

Skills: bash

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
BARD

Bard is a class that can sing useful songs. Bards can be very beneficial to
groups since they can provide song and entertainment for the whole group.
Bards are also able to cast some spells and possess some useful skills.

You can improve your spells and skills by using the practice command.

Use HELP BARD SPELLS to see the spells of the bard class.

Note: In order to sing a song, the bard must be HOLDING an instrument.
      To sing a bard song you just type: song <songname>

Skills: dodge, peek, pick, throw, taunt (level 20), dual (level 25),
          camp (level 35)

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
MAGE

This is the class of powerful and violent magic, but mages do not control
nature and therefore cannot bless or heal.

You can improve your spells by using the practice command.

Use HELP MAGE SPELLS to see the spells of the mage.

Skills: None

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
NINJA

Ninja is a very powerful class with good dex and con. They can cast spells and
have skills like sneak, hide, throw and dodge. They can wield two weapons. They
have good bare-hand damage too.  Ninjas can swim, so they don't need a boat to
cross water.

You can improve your spells and skills by using the practice command.

Use HELP NINJA SPELLS to see the spells of the ninja class.

Skills: assault, bash, dodge, hide, kick, peek, pummel, sneak, spin, throw

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
NOMAD

Nomad is a strongly recommended class with good con, str and dex.  They usually
have very good hit points too. They can't cast spells but they have good
skills.  Nomads also get 5 natural armor points for every 5 levels, and an
additional practice % on dodge for every 10 levels.

You can improve your skills by using the practice command.

Skills: ambush, butcher, disarm, dodge, kick, peek, pick, rescue, spin,
        subdue, throw, trap, disembowel (level 40), evasion (level 50)

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
PALADIN

This class must have a good alignment to cast spells. They have some warrior
skills, and some cleric spells as well as a few unique spells like 'fury' and
'lay hands'.

You can improve your spells and skills by using the practice command.

Use HELP PALADIN SPELLS to see the spells of the paladin.

Skills: bash, block, disarm, kick, parry, pummel, rescue, spin, pray (level 40)

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
ANTI-PALADIN

This class must have an evil alignment to cast spells.  They have some
thief skills and some offensive spells.

You can improve your spells and skills by using the practice command.

Use HELP ANTI-PALADIN SPELLS to see the spells of the anti-paladin.

Skills: backstab, bash, hide, kick, peek, pick, pummel, sneak, steal,
        hidden blade (level 40), assassinate (level 45)

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
COMMANDO

This class represents a warrior-mage.  They have some warrior skills and most
of the offensive spells of the magic-user. Commandos also get 3 natural armor
points for every 5 levels.

You can improve your spells and skills by using the practice command.

Use HELP COMMANDO SPELLS to see the spells of the commando.

Skills: assault, bash, dual, disarm, kick, pummel, throw, rescue,
        triple (level 20)

See also: PRACTICE "CLASS PLACEMENT POINTS"
#
PASSWORD

PASSWORD allows you to change the password for your character.

Example:
     password <old password> <new password>

NOTE: For those people concerned with snooping, all lines that begin with
"pass" do not show up in snoop.
#
SKILLS

SKILL        AP   BA   CL   CO   MU   NI   NO   PA   TH   WA
-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
Ambush                                      Y
Assault                      Y         Y
Backstab      Y                                       Y
Bash          Y         Y    Y         Y         Y         Y
Block                                            Y         Y
Butcher                                     Y
Camp               Y
Circle                                                Y
Coin Toss                                             Y
Cunning                                               Y
Disarm                       Y              Y    Y
Disembowel                                  Y              Y
Dodge              Y                   Y    Y         Y
Dual               Y         Y                             Y
Hide          Y                        Y              Y
Hidden Blade  Y
Kick          Y              Y         Y    Y    Y    Y    Y
Knock                                                      Y
Peek          Y    Y                        Y         Y
Pick          Y    Y                        Y         Y
Parry                                            Y         Y
Pray                                             Y
Pummel        Y              Y         Y         Y
Punch                                                      Y
Rescue                                      Y    Y         Y
Scan                                                  Y
Sneak         Y                        Y              Y
Spin                                   Y    Y    Y         Y
Steal         Y                                       Y
Subdue                                      Y
Taunt              Y
Throw              Y         Y         Y    Y         Y    Y
Trap                                        Y
Triple                       Y                             Y
Twist                                                 Y
Quad                                                       Y

SEE ALSO: CLASS CLASSES

#
CIRCLE

Class: Thief

Usage: circle <target>

A skill similar to Backstab, however it can be used during battle.  Circle
inflicts the highest non-magic combat damage of any class skill.

Circle damage is equal to the thief's normal attack damage, multiplied by:

Level  Multiplier
 1-14  2x
15-19  3x
20-39  4x
40-50  5x

See Also: BACKSTAB
#
"COIN TOSS"

Class: Thief

Usage: coin-toss <wager>

This skill allows the thief to toss coins about him/herself in a
deadly attack, inflicting damage to all enemies in the room on a
success. On a failure, some of the coins are snatched up by any
enemies that are present. If the room was empty of opponents, the
coins are lost as they fly about and roll away.

The amount of damage inflicted by this skill is based on the amount
of coins wagered when using the skill. If no amount of coins are
wagered, or the wager is unintelligible, the minimum number of coins
are automatically wagered. If you wager more than the maximum number
of coins, the wager will not exceed the maximum (the extra coins are
not lost or factored into the wager).

The minimum number of coins that can be wagered is equal to 100 times
the thief's level; the maximum number is equal to 1,000 times the
thief's level.

The damage caused by coin toss is equal to the following formula, with
the minimum amount of damage being 10:

damage = (2 * level) / (wager / max_wager)

For example, a level 30 thief (min_wager = 3,000, max_wager = 30,000)
that wagers 20,000 coins will inflict 40 damage to every opponent in
the room on a success.

Note: Commas are not supported in the amount wagered and will cause
the minimum wager to be used.

This skill causes a 2 round input lag for the thief, regardless of
success or failure.
#
PICK

Class: Thief Bard Nomad Anti-Paladin

For picking locks. Not all locks can be picked. Example:

> pick door
> pick safe

See Also: OPEN, CLOSE, LOCK, UNLOCK
#
PEEK

Class: Anti-Paladin Bard Ninja Nomad Thief

Used to peek into the room next to you.

Examples:
 peek e    - Will look into the room at your east.
#
KNOCK

Class: Warrior

The warrior can use brute force to break the locks on some doors.
Successful use of this skill costs 30 movement points.
#
SPIN

Class: Nomad Ninja Paladin Warrior

A skill which will kick all the mobs in the same room as you. The damage
of your kick is (your level * 2). You must learn how to kick first!
#
AMBUSH

Class: Nomad

AMBUSH will allow you to surprise attack a mob doing extra damage.  This is
similar to BACKSTAB. The chance of a successful AMBUSH depends on how well you
learn it.  This skill will also be affected by the type of terrain you attempt
to create an ambush in.
#
ASSAULT

Class: Commando Ninja

ASSAULT will surprise attack a mob doing extra damage. This is similar to
BACKSTAB. The chance of a successful ASSAULT depends on how well you learn it.
#
BLOCK

Class: Warrior Paladin Nomad (Ranger SC3)

BLOCK will toggle block on and off.  When block is on you will attempt to block
your target and keep it from fleeing.  The chance of its success depends on how
well you learn it, and your Dexterity modifier.
#
DUAL

Class: Warrior Commando Bard

A skill which gives an automatic second attack during the fight. The chance of
its success depends on how well you learn it.

See Also: TRIPLE
#
TRIPLE

Class: Warrior (Level 20), Commando (Level 20)

A skill which gives an automatic third attack the during fight. The chance of its
success depends on how well you learn it.

See Also: DUAL
#
PARRY

Class: Warrior Paladin

A skill which gives an automatic PARRY attempt during a fight.  The
chance of success depends on how well you learn it.
#
DODGE

Class: Bard Ninja Nomad Thief

A skill which gives an automatic DODGE attempt during the fight. The
chance of success depends on how well you learn it.
#
SNEAK

Class: Anti-Paladin Ninja Thief

Used for sneaking (moving in and out of rooms without anyone taking
notice). If you successfully sneak, you'll continue to sneak for a
little while.

Example:

  > sneak

See Also: HIDE
#
HIDE

Class: Anti-Paladin Ninja Thief

When you type hide there is a chance that you will hide in the room.
If hidden you can only be "sensed" by the "sense life" spell. Even if
sensed, your identity will remain hidden.  Hide is broken by pressing
enter/return, regardless of whether you typed a command or not.

Example:

  > hide

  >  (You wait for 5 minutes and remain hidden for 5 minutes.)

  >  (You press enter/return and are no longer hidden.)

See Also: SNEAK
#
THROW

Class: Bard Commando Nomad Ninja Thief Warrior

There are some items (ITEM_MISSILE) which can be thrown. The chance of
success depends on how well you learn this skill. If you miss the victim
with your throw, the object will be lost. If you succeed, the object will
stay in the victim's inventory.
#
KICK

Class: Anti-Paladin Commando Ninja Nomad Paladin Thief Warrior

Kick is a combat skill that inflicts damage equal to two times the attacker's
class level.  The user will experience 3 rounds of skill lag after a successful
kick, and 2 rounds of skill lag on a failure.

The success of this skill is based on how well it is practiced, and
the character's Dexterity.

See Also: PRACTICE DEXTERITY
#
BASH

Class: Anti-Paladin Commando Ninja Paladin Warrior, Cleric (Level 35)

The success of a bash depends upon how well you learned it. To bash someone
is to attempt to 'knock' that person over. If you succeed, you will inflict
fair damage and cause the victim to fall on its rear. The victim will be
unable to issue any commands for 2 rounds of violence.

A bash makes you unable to type commands for 2 rounds of violence. Note
that hitting a person who is resting will inflict 1.5x damage.

Bashing a person who is resting will cause them to become
stunned, receiving 2x damage on the next attack.

Bashing a person who is stunned will cause them to become
incapacitated, receiving 2.33x damage on the next attack.

See Also: RESCUE, KICK, PUMMEL
#
PUMMEL

Class: Anti-Paladin Commando Ninja Paladin

A successful pummel will do minor damage and stun that person for a round,
causing your next hit to do 2x damage.  You must first learn BASH to use this
skill.  The chance of a successful pummel depends on how well you learn it and
how well you learn BASH.

Pummeling a person who is resting or stunned will cause them to become
incapacitated, receiving 2.33x damage on the next attack.

Be forewarned...

If you pummel a mobile that dodges, the mobile will switch from the tank to the
next person to try to hit the mobile.

Perhaps pummeling the Huge Queen Ant isn't such a good idea...

See Also: BASH
#
PUNCH

Class: Warrior

A successful punch can 'knock' that person over. The damage of the punch is
(your level * 2) hit points.

If you miss you lose your balance and fall, you will have to stand up before
you can move or do any other actions, unless you are tanking.
 
A punch makes you unable to type commands for 2 rounds of violence.
#
RESCUE

Class: Nomad Paladin Warrior Commando

A rescue is an attempt to jump in front of your target, causing the monster
to hit you instead.  You can only shield your target from one monster per
attempt. This is very useful when playing in a group.

Any class can automatically succeed at rescuing another player that is level
15 or below.

> rescue <victim>
#
STEAL

Class: Anti-Paladin Thief

Use steal to steal gold or items from people. The chance of not getting
caught depends on how well you have practiced steal, and if the person
is asleep.

Due to misuse of the steal command, stealing from other players is strictly
regulated and requires that you have at least 1,250 XP points (See PSTEAL).
You can still steal from monsters at all levels.

Example:

> steal gold drunk

> steal sword mercenary
  (only possible if he is sleeping)

See Also: PSTEAL
#
BACKSTAB

Class: Anti-Paladin Thief

The Backstab skill is a powerful attack used to engage combat with an
unsuspecting foe.  The effects of placing a pointed weapon into a victim's
exposed back are quite chilling, and often deadly.

Backstab damage is equal to the attacker's normal attack damage, multiplied by:

Level  Multiplier
 1-7    2x
 8-13   3x
14-19   4x
20-23   5x
24-26   6x
27-29   7x
30-39   8x
40-49   9x
   50  10x

The chance of successfully backstabbing a target depends on how well you have
practiced Backstab at your guild.  You can always backstab sleeping victims.

The Anti-Paladin's Assassinate skill also allows a sufficiently hidden, or
invisible, Anti-Paladin to use the Backstab skill against a victim already in
combat.

See Also: ASSASSINATE
#
BUTCHER

Class: Nomad

Butcher turns a corpse into a tasty steak.
#
DISARM

Class: Commando Nomad Paladin

Disarms the victim by kicking his weapon out of his hand. You cannot disarm
a victim who is more than six levels higher than you.
#
TRAP

Class: Nomad

To set a trap in the room.  If a monster (non-pc) enters the room it may fall
into it and cause 1/5 of its hit point damage.
#
SUBDUE

Class: Nomad

Subdue is a Nomad skill. The other classes can still subdue monsters but they
only have a 30% chance to succeed. If Nomad has very good in skill subdue they
will have a 90% chance to subdue a monster.

A subdued monster can be ridden.

See Also: STABLES
#
PRAY

Class: Paladin

This skill gives the Paladin a quick way to fix his alignment.  During prayer,
the Paladin is immobile, gaining 400 alignment points each tick until his
alignment reaches 1000.  If attacked during prayer, the Paladin will stop
praying and fight.  The success of the prayer depends on how well the skill
is practiced.
#
SHOOT

Usage : shoot <victim>

You need a fireweapon that is held to use shoot. The fireweapon also needs
bullets. Use reload to load the bullets into the gun.

See Also: RELOAD
#
SPAM


 SSSSSSSSSSS
SSSSSSSSSSSSS
SSSS
SSSSSSSSSSSS
 SSSSSSSSSSSS
      SSSS
SSSSSSSSSSSSS
 SSSSSSSSSSS

           PPPPPPPPPPPP
           PPPPPPPPPPPPP
           PPP       PPP
           PPPPPPPPPPPPP
           PPPPPPPPPPPP
           PPP
           PPP
           PPP

                    A
                   AAA
                  AA AA
                 AA   AA
                AAAAAAAAA
               AAAAAAAAAAA
              AAA       AAA
              AA         AA

                        MMM       MMM
                        MMMM     MMMM
                        MMMMM   MMMMM
                        MMMMMMMMMMMMM
                        MMMMMMMMMMMMM
                        MMM MMMMM MMM
                        MMM  MMMM MMM
                        MMM   MM  MMM

                                 !!!
                                !!!!!
                                !!!!!
                                 !!!
                                  !

                                 !!!
                                 !!!

The act of repeating a message or phrase over and over again.
Most PCs find it VERY annoying. Don't do it!
#
RELOAD

Usage : reload <gun> bullets

<gun> - the name of your gun.
#
AREAS

Low Level: Levels 1 - 15
Mid Level: Levels 16 - 30
High Level: Levels 31+

NOTE: AREAS MARKED BY A % HAVE ONE OR MORE DEATH TRAPS IN THEM.  LEVEL
DESIGNATIONS REFER TO THE TYPICAL MONSTERS IN THE AREA, NOT ALL OF THEM.
EXPLORE CAREFULLY.  THE LACK OF A % DOES NOT GUARANTEE NO DEATH TRAP.

+.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.+
| Area Name                |Group Level    | Solo Level    |  Map Number  |
+.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.+
| %Abyss%                  |     High      |     High      | South        |
| Ancient Sphinx           |     High      |     High      | Northeast    |
| Battlefield              |     Mid       |     Mid       | East         |
| Beach                    |     Low       |     Mid       | Southwest    |
| Berbalang                |     Mid       |     High      | South        |
| Bluffs                   |   Mid/High    |   Mid/High    | Southwest    |
| Brigand Camp             |     Mid       |     High      | Northeast    |
| Canticle                 |     Low       |     Mid       | West         |
| Castle of Ravenloft      |     High      |     High      | East         |
| Castle of Cantlin        |     Mid       |     High      | Southwest    |
| %Cavern of Lost Souls%   |     High      |     High      | Northeast    |
| Chess Kingdom            |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       | West         |
| %City Of Cornelius%      | Low/Mid/High  | Low/Mid/High  | Northeast    |
| Crystal Tower            |     High      |   Not Recom.  | Northeast    |
| Cthorr                   |     High      |   Not Recom.  | Southwest    |
| Daimyo                   |     High      |   Not Recom.  | South        |
| Death's Playground       |     High      |   Not Recom.  | West         |
| %Demon Invasion%         |     High      |     High      | North        |
| Druids                   |     High      |   Not Recom.  | South        |
| Da'Sharr Prison          |     High      |     High      | East         |
| %Dreadful Swamp%         |   Mid/High    |     High      | West         |
| Dwarven Kingdom          |     Mid       |     Mid       | East         |
| Elemental Canyon         |     Mid       |     Mid       | East         |
| Elemental Caves          |     High      |     High      | South        |
| %El Museo%               |   Very High   |   Not Recom.  | Map          |
| Enchanted Forest         |   Mid/High    |     High      | North        |
| Elven Woods Village      |     High      |     High      | West         |
| Elven Town               |     Mid       |     High      | West         |
| Ershteep Village         |   Low/Mid     |    Low/Mid    | Map          |
| Eryndlyn                 |     High      |   Not Recom.  | Northeast    |
| Evil Outpost             |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       | Map          |
| Ettin Village            |     High      |     High      | West         |
| Fire Newt Caves          |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       | East         |
| Forbidden Maze           |     High      |   Not Recom.  | West         |
| %Galaxy 1st level%       |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       | Map          |
| Galaxy 2nd level         |   Mid/High    |     High      | Map          |
| Griffon Village          |     Low       |     Low       | Map          |
| Goblin Caves             |   Low/Mid     |   Mid/High    | West         |
| Golden Pagoda            |     High      |   Not Recom.  | East         |
| Golden Plaza             |     High      |   Not Recom.  | East         |
| Graveyard                |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       | East         |
| %Graveyard South%        |     Mid       |     High      | Map          |
| %Great Pyramid%          |     Mid       |     Mid       | Northeast    |
| Halfling Village         |     Low       |     Low       | East         |
| Haunted House            |     High      |     High      | West         |
| Hell                     |  Very High    |   Not Recom.  | South        |
| Helventia Mountains      |     High      |     High      | Northeast    |
| %Holy Grail%             |     Mid       |    Mid/High   | West         |
| Ivory Tower              |     Mid       |    Mid/High   | Southwest    |
| Jal-Pur                  |     High      |     High      | Northeast    |
| Jungle                   |   Mid/High    |     High      | West         |
| King Welmar's Castle     |     Mid       |     Mid       | East         |
| Kitzanti Invasion        |     High      |   Not Recom.  | South        |
| Keening                  |     High      |   Not Recom.  | West         |
| La Soudre                |     Mid       |     Mid       | South        |
| Lorien                   |   Mid/High    |     High      | Northeast    |
| Lost World               |   Mid/High    |     High      | West         |
| Monk Monastery           |     Mid       |     High      | West         |
| %Morgoth%                |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       | East         |
| Moria Level 1            |     Mid       |     Mid       | Northeast    |
| Moria Level 2            |   Mid/High    |     High      | Northeast    |
| Moria Level 3            |     High      |   Not Recom.  | Northeast    |
| %Mystic Monastery%       |     High      |   Not Recom.  | Northeast    |
| Ocean                    |   Low/Mid     |   Mid/High    | Map          |
| Olympus Puzzles          |     High      |   Not Recom.  | North        |
| Pirate Ship              |     High      |     High      | South        |
| QuickLand                |     Low       |     Low       | West         |
| Sea Of Love              |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       |West/Southwest|
| Shire                    |     Low       |     Mid       | West         |
| Sewers                   |   Low/Mid     |   Mid/High    | East         |
| Sprite Village           |     Low       |     Low       | Map          |
| Sonicity                 |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       | West         |
| Stone Monkey Island      |     Mid       |   Mid/High    | South        |
| Tarion City              |     High      |   Not Recom.  | Northeast    |
| Tarion Desert            |     Mid       |     Mid       | Northeast    |
| The Lands                |     High      |     High      | East         |
| Theldon's Crypt          |  ***********  |   Mid/High    | Map          |
| Training Ground          |     Low       |     Low       | Map          |
| Troll Village            |     High      |   Not Recom.  | East         |
| Twisted Dwarves          |     Mid       |     Mid       | Southwest    |
| Vermilion's Tower        |     High      |     High      | West         |
| Village of Barovia       |     Mid       |     Mid       | East         |
| Wasteland                |     High      |     High      | Map          |
| Wolf Cave                |   Mid/High    |     High      | South        |
| Wyvern's Spur            |     High      |     High      | East         |
| %Underworld%             |   Low/Mid     |     Mid       | Map          |
| Zoo                      |     Low       |     Low       | Map          |
| Zyca Castle              |   Mid/High    |     High      | West         |
| Zyekia                   |     Low       |     Low       | East         |
+.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.+
| *Labyrinth of Skelos* - (All levels - Player Killing Area)              |
+.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.-.+

See Also: MAP NORTH NORTHEAST WEST SOUTHWEST SOUTH EAST
#
AFFECT

Shows all skills, spells, and enchantments that are affecting you.

Usage : affect <brief|old>

The arguments 'brief' and 'old' are optional. The command 'affect' without
either argument will display the most information and in a newer format.

The command 'affect brief' will show only affects with a duration and will
have a reduced amount of whitespace.

The command 'affect old' will show the older style formatting with less
information.
#
ASSIST

Usage : assist <person>
     ass <person>
You will help a person attack his/her enemy.
#
GTELL GT

This acts as a Tell command but only members of your group can receive the
message.

Format: gtell 'something'
    or: gt 'something'
#
REFOLLOW

Usage : refollow <person>

The person must be following you.
He/She will refollow you and be automatically grouped.

See Also: FOLLOW UNFOLLOW
#
GLANCE

You can see only the physical condition of the target.

Format : glance 'someone'
#
REPORT

You can report your status to all the players in that room.

Format : report
#
LOOK

For studying your surroundings. Examples:

look
look AT the angel
look IN the bag
look to the south   (or just: look south)

Note that if you LOOK AT CORPSE you will not see its inventory.
To see what's inside a container (e.i. Corpse) use LOOK IN <OBJECT>.

See Also: EXAMINE or READ
#
AC "ARMOR CLASS"

Is your armor class.  It is defined roughly as follows:

  100 Naked person
    0 Very Heavily armored (Plate mail, and "two shields")
 -250 Armored battle tank
#
OPEN CLOSE LOCK UNLOCK

Usage (example):
 > open portal
or
 > open portal to the south
   (if there's more than one to choose from)
#
WIMPY

Usage:  wimpy <number>

When your hit points are lower than the number you set, you will automatically
attempt to flee.

See Also: FLEE
#
EAT DRINK SIP TASTE

If you're hungry or thirsty. Example: eat hamburger.

See Also: QUAFF
#
WHO

Lists the people currently in the game.

You can specify a number of switches, listed below, in addition to a minimum
level or a range of levels.

Usage:

who [-c|-s|-p|-r|-t|-f] [min_level][-[max_level]]

Switches:
  -c | --class
  -l | --level      Display player Class and Level data.
  -s | --subclass   Display player Subclass data.
  -p | --prestige   Display player Prestige data.
  -r | --rank       Display player Rank data.
  -t | --title      Display player Title data.
  -f | --flags      Display player Flag data.

Switch Example: who -c -r -f (shows output with Class, Rank, and Flags data).

Filters:

who filter [class/level|subclass|prestige|rank|title|flags]

Filter Example: who filter subclass (toggles Subclass data filter on/off).

See also: WHOIS
#
WHOIS

Usage: whois <name>

Tells you the class, level, subclass, subclass level, and prestige of a player.

This command also will tell you the last time that the character logged in.

If a connected player is idle, that info will also be given.  The idle display
only works on mortals.

See also: WHO
#
GIVE

If you feel generous you may give some stuff to someone in need.
To give gold to someone you need to specify how much.

Example: give 50000 coins beggar
         give bread beggar
#
JUNK TAP

Used to trash items (destroy them permanently).  Tap works on any items
lying on the floor in the room while junk destroys a specific item in
inventory.
#
DONATE DONATION

Used to donate equipment to other players.  The item donated ends up in the
Donation Room.  Note that taking items from there and auctioning them will get
you into trouble with the gods.  You can also donate corpses, which will go to
the morgue instead of the donation room.
#
SAVE

Saves your persona. This includes experience points, strength, gold, and any
equipment you may have gathered.
#
INVENTORY

If you're uncertain about what you're carrying, or simply want to check
that no thieves have gotten to your backpack.

See also: EQUIPMENT
#
EQUIPMENT

When you want to know what armor, weapon, charms etc. you're wearing.

See also: INVENTORY
#
KISS

The ancient art of kissing dates back to the Cro-Magnon man who is
believed to have used it to determine whether a member of the opposite
sex was ready for mating.
#
WEAR

Usage:  wear <item>
        Wear all

Causes you to wear the named item.

See also: REMOVE EQUIPMENT HOLD WIELD
#
WIELD

When you get tired of bashing monsters with your fists you might consider
wielding a weapon.  Weapons vary, some might require great strength to
wield and some even require two hands to wield. When wielding a two-handed
weapon, damage bonuses from 19+ strength are doubled (see STRENGTH).

The Ninja class has the ability to wield two weapons.  One will appear as
being held while the other is wielded normally.

 Example : wield sword

See also: REMOVE EQUIPMENT
#
SCORE

RoninMUD currently offers three different score formats for players to
choose from.

These styles are: Full (0), Old (1) and Brief (2).

You can set your default score style by typing:

score set <style> OR score set <number>

Full: This is the default and recommended style. It will show you the
full score output for your character.

Old: This is the old score style from back in the ancient days of
Ronin's history. Some players may prefer this style for simplicity or for
legacy client triggers.

Brief: This is a variant of the full score style that shows only the
most commonly used information. This can be useful to check your
character at a glance.

To view a score style without setting it as your default, use:

score <style> OR score <number>

Finally, you can view individual score elements using the score query
function:

score query <element>

For example, you can type 'score query gold' to see how many gold
coins you are carrying.

See Also: "SCORE QUERY"
#
"SCORE QUERY"
You can view individual score elements using the score query function:

score query <element>

Score elements:

name, title, level, class, subclass_name, sc_name, subclass_level, sc_level,
rank_name, rank_level, prestige, prestige_level, maximum_hit, max_hit, hit, hp,
maximum_mana, max_mana, mana, maximum_movement, max_movement, movement,
natural_hit, nat_hit, natural_hp, nat_hp, natural_mana, nat_mana,
natural_movement, nat_movement, gain_hit, gain_hp, hit_gain, hp_gain, gain_mana,
mana_gain, gain_movement, movement_gain, move_gain, current_strength,
cur_strength, strength, current_dexterity, cur_dexterity, dexterity,
current_constitution, cur_constitution, constitution, current_intelligence,
cur_intelligence, intelligence, current_wisdom, cur_wisdom, wisdom,
natural_strength, nat_strength, natural_dexterity, nat_dexterity,
natural_constitution, nat_constitution, natural_intelligence, nat_intelligence,
natural_wisdom, nat_wisdom, armor_class, ac, armor, wimpy_limit, bleed_limit,
subclass_points, subclass_pts, scp, quest_points, qp, aqp, class_points, cpp,
deaths, age, practices, average_damage, avg_damage, damroll, hitroll, alignment,
experience, xp, exp_to_level, xp_to_level, remort_exp, remort_xp,
remort_multiplier, death_exp, death_xp, gold, coins, money, bank_gold,
bank_coins, bank_money, quest_timer, club, clan, guild, time_played, played,
weight_carried, carried_weight, toggles, flags, death_limit, position, wizinv,
editing_zone

See Also: SCORE
#
SAY TELL WHISPER SHOUT ASK YELL REPLY

If you consider communicating with other beings, you might be understood
better if you start your sentences with either say, tell, whisper, shout,
yell, gtell or gossip.

The 'SAY' channel is only broadcast to everyone in the same room as the
speaker.

The 'TELL' channel is mainly for private conversations between two people
and cannot be heard by anyone except the target specified. You may not be
able to 'TELL' to someone who is sleeping.

The 'WHISPER' channel is broadcast to only the specified target provided the
target is in the same room as the speaker. No one else in the room will be able
to hear this channel. You may communicate via this channel with people who are
asleep.

The 'SHOUT' and 'YELL' channels are mainly emergency channels. It is not
advisable to abuse the freedom of these channels. Use only in case of dire
emergency.

REPLY allows you to communicate with unseen people that talk to you.

Example : say I'm a jerk
          tell unclesam You're dead meat - sucker!

You can use ' as a shorthand for say, as in:

' hello there.

SEE ALSO: GTELL
#
BOUNCE

If you feel like bouncing round the room this is just the command for you.
#
FRENCH

Don't you know how they kiss in France ?? - try it !
#
SMILE

Whenever you feel like smiling...
#
KILL, HIT

These commands are used to start a fight.
#
CAST

For magic using classes. If you want to throw a spell at someone or
something.

Example : cast 'burning hands' <player>
   Note that the name of the spell must be enclosed by "'"s.

See Also: help on each individual spell, for example:
  > help cure ligh
  > help ventri
  > help energy drain
#
DROP

If you lose interest in a carried item, you can drop it on the ground.

Example: drop bottle

If you feel like getting rid of all your earthly possessions, you may use
"drop all".

See also: GET
#
ORDER

Used to tell any followers what to do.
Usage: order <character> <commands>
   or to order all followers to do something type:
   order followers <commands>
#
BUY SELL

Commands for the shops - very useful too!

You can buy a number of items at once.  Just try
'buy <number> <item>' number is optional.
#
LIST

Lists any items for sale in a shop.

While in the vault room, this command will list the contents of your
currently set vault. Type list by itself at the vaults to get a list of
other options.

See Also: VAULTS
#
WEATHER

If you're uncertain whether the sun is shining or the rain is pouring down.
#
READ

When you want to read something like postcards or signs or the bulletin
boards.

For boards, you type read <#> or read next.  Reading next will
just read the next message number.
#
REMOVE

If you tire of wearing some armor or wielding a weapon you can REMOVE it.

Example : remove sword

'Remove all' will remove all of your gear, and 'Remove head' would remove
whatever you are wearing on your head, and that works for all places for
equipment.
#
SHOPS

Shops are places where the adventurer may purchase equipment for his quests,
and where he may sell his treasure if he should manage to survive the perils
with his life and sanity intact. Many shops trade only in a specific type of
merchandise. Thus, a baker may well refuse to buy your armor, even if it is
of high quality!

To some people, the prospect of obtaining the entire inventory of a shop by
murdering the keeper may appear tempting - but beware: The shopkeepers are
often rugged, capable men; roughened by years of trading and, indeed,
surviving in a world where in the end the only certainty is death.

See also: BUY, SELL, LIST, VALUE
#
PRACTICE PRACTISE PRAC

Practice is the way you improve your spells and skills. You must go to
your guildmaster to let him/her help you improve.

If you type practice, you will see which skills you can improve upon, and
how good you already are at these.

You can then use practice <skill>, to practice the appropriate skill.

You can only practice a certain amount for each level you gain, and you do not
have to save this, it can be accumulated.
#
EXITS

Gives you a list of the obvious exits from your location. Of course, the less
obvious ones won't show up here - you have to THINK in order to locate those.
#
LEAVE

If you feel claustrophobic, typing 'leave' will make you use the nearest
obvious exit to the outside.
#
ENTER

If you type 'enter' while you are outdoors, you'll enter any nearby shelter.
You can also follow 'enter' with an argument; for example, 'enter window'.
#
TIME

Gives you the current 'gametime'. Your initial reaction to the output of this
command may be one of surprise, but you'll get used to it. You'll have to, at
any rate, since certain things in the game depend on this particular notion
of time; the opening hours of some shops for example. It also gives the local
real time.

See Also: DAYS MONTHS
#
DAYS

Ronin has 7 days in a week.  The days are named as follows.

The Day of the Moon
The Day of the Bull
The Day of the Deception
The Day of Thunder
The Day of Freedom
The Day of the Great Gods
The Day of the Sun

See Also: TIME MONTHS
#
MONTHS

Ronin has 17 months in a year.  The months are named as follows.

Month of Winter
Month of the Winter Wolf
Month of the Frost Giant
Month of the Old Forces
Month of the Grand Struggle
Month of the Spring
Month of Nature
Month of Futility
Month of the Dragon
Month of the Sun
Month of the Heat
Month of the Battle
Month of the Dark Shades
Month of the Shadows
Month of the Long Shadows
Month of the Ancient Darkness
Month of the Great Evil

See Also: DAYS TIME
#
BUG TYPO IDEA

For making useful suggestions to the maintainers of the game. Examples:

bug the entire game crashes when I type 'put bag in bag'
idea make a restaurant in Midgaard
typo 'sence' should be spelled 'sense'

However, we prefer the use of the boards at the altar and west of the altar for
these postings.
#
QUIT

When you get tired of playing, you can leave the game by typing 'quit'.  To
leave the game successfully without losing gear, a player must instead RENT.

Note that you cannot quit while carrying any objects.

See also: INN RENT
#
INN INNS RECEPTION

Inns are places where the weary traveler may rest while the innkeeper looks
after his equipment and treasure. Specifically, you may use inns to store
your gathered equipment while you are not playing the game (we all have to
sleep sometimes, there is no shame in that).

See also: OFFER RENT
#
OFFER RENT

For use in the receptions of inns. The command OFFER will make the innkeeper
tell you the cost of storing your carried items for one day. RENT will store
the items and make you leave the game. The next time you enter, you'll start
out in the reception where you left. The inn will store your items as long as
you are carrying enough gold to pay the rent. If your link dies rent money will
be taken from the gold you are carrying at the time, and if you can't afford
your rent when you next log on your equipment will be lost.  If you rent for 1
day (real time) your rent cost will be reduced to the cost of one day.

In case you run out of cash-on-hand at any time, the receptionist will draw
funds from your bank account to pay for your rent. This is done automatically
but costs 1.5 times more than the regular rental charges.

There is a rent limit of 200 items per character.

In SUMMARY:
- You can only rent 200 items.

- The receptionist will only ever charge a MAXIMUM of ONE days rent.

- If you can't afford your rent, the receptionist will check your
  bank account.  If you still don't have enough, you LOSE your
  equipment.

NOTE: The Midgaard Receptionist may be located North, East, and Up from Market
Square.

See also: INN
#
GET TAKE

If you find something interesting on the ground, you may use 'get' to pick it
up. Example: "get greatsword". If you are in a hurry, or if you just feel very
greedy, you may type "get all". You can also use 'get' to extract objects from
containers. Example: "get dagger from bag".

See also: DROP PUT
#
PUT

For putting stuff in containers. Example: "Put the dagger in bag". You
can also put many things in containers. Example: "put all.bread in bag"

See also: GET
#
EXAMINE

May give you some valuable information about an item or allow you to look
inside a container.

See also: LOOK
#
TITLE

Usage: title <new title>

Allows you to change the message that is shown after your name in the 'who'
list and when you type 'look' in a room.

Just typing 'title' will toggle the default title when leveling on and off.
This is useful for those who like to set their own titles and don't want it
changed when they level.

See Also: LEVELS
#
WRITE

In order to write a note, you need a piece of blank paper (or similar), and a
pen of some sort. You can then type something like "write paper pen", whereupon
you'll be asked to type in your note at the keyboard.

You can also write on a bulletin board by typing "write <message>" where
<message> is the title of your post. Whenever writing whether it be on a
bulletin board or paper, the "@" character will terminate that writing.
#
POSTCARD

In order to write on a postcard you must have a pen. You can then type
"write postcard pen" and will be able to write your message on the postcard.
When you are finished with your message, type a "@" to terminate your writing.

See Also: POST MAIL
#
MAIL

You can send mail to other players by sending postcards through the mail.  The
Midgaard Post Office can be found 1 north and 1 up from Market Square.  The
postman will be happy to sell you postcards, pens, and packages. (Type LIST)

To mail a postcard:
  Write your message on a postcard, then
  mail <player1> <player2> <etc>

  The more players listed, the more copies of the postcard will be sent.

See Also: POSTCARD POST PACKAGE
#
POST PACKAGE

At the Midgaard Post Office, you can send items in the mail to other players.
The post office is 1 north and 1 up from Market Square.

To mail an item:
First buy a package (available at the post office - type LIST)
  Put your item in the package.
  Then just 'post <player>', it's that simple.

You can also send money, by first converting it to precious items in the
Midgaard Jeweler's shop and sending the item.

See Also: MAIL POSTCARD JEWELER
#
JEWELER

The Midgaard Jeweler is located 3 west and 1 north from Market Square.
He will convert cash into precious items and visa versa.  This is quite
useful if you want to send money to another player, or store money in
your vault for future use.

See Also: POST VAULT
#
NEWS

To read the news you need to buy a paper from the paperboy.  He's always
hanging around Midgaard somewhere.
#
SLEEPING WAKE REST SIT STAND

For changing your position. If you feel weary, it's probably a good idea to sit
and rest for awhile, or maybe even take a nap. One of the main reasons to sleep
or rest or sit is to regenerate your mana, hit points and moves.

While asleep, you still have the ability to use the channels, but you don't see
their output.
#
POUR

If you want to pour some liquid from one container to another.
#
GRAB HOLD

For getting a good grip on something; a torch, for example.

See also: WEAR, WIELD, REMOVE
#
FOLLOW

If you happen to be going in the same direction as someone else, why not
simply follow that person? For example: "Follow joe". If you are following
someone and you wish to stop doing that, then all you've got to do is follow
yourself:

See Also: UNFOLLOW REFOLLOW

"follow <your name>".
#
FLEE

If you are in a fight and things are beginning to get a little uncomfortable
(maybe you are dying), just type 'flee', and you will run blindly out of
the room in a random direction.  Note that there must be at least one
exit to flee through, and there's always the chance you may panic and be
unable to get away.  It's also rumored that the occasional coward has
fled straight into a death trap, so take care.
#
IMPLEMENTOR IMP

The most powerful beings in existence.
#
GUILD

The Guildhouse is the place where mortals may go to escape the troubles and
perils of a cruel world. Each guild is heavily guarded, so that only members
may enter the building. Guilds are also the places where people come to
learn and practice the skills of their trade.

See also: PRACTICE
#
WHERE

Tells you the location of a monster, a player or an object. Examples:

where torch
where dragon

Mortals can only "where" monsters or players, and only from their own
zone.

Immortals may type 'where' without arguments to see where everybody is.
#
LEVELS

Lists the levels of your class and the amount of experience points needed to
achieve them.
#
BRIEF

Usage: brief normal/super/tagline/fight/list/all

Toggle "brief <mode>" as described below.

Normal:  You don't see the descriptions of the room you are in; only the
         name of the room, and the people and objects there. Unless you
         are very familiar with the area in which you travel it is not
         advisable to use this command. Frequently, you will find small
         but vital hints in the descriptions of the rooms. An extra peek
         at you surroundings could mean the difference between life and
         death!

Sector:  You will not see room sector types then this brief mode is
         turned on.

Super:   You don't see the players/mobs in the room, or players/mobs
         leaving or entering the room.  For obvious reasons, this is only
         useful if you are in a speed walking group.

Tagline: You don't see extra taglines on players/mobs. However, certain
         taglines may be shown if they are deemed important enough. These
         include sanctuary, sphere and invulnerability taglines.

Fight:   This will display verbose hit messages of everyone except
         yourself and the mob hitting you.  So instead of seeing...

  Bob makes the Kraken see stars with a terrific wallop from his slash.

        You see...

  Bob hits the Kraken.

        Very useful for those people who want to limit the amount of text
        sent by the mud over their link.

See also: COMPACT
#
CONSIDER

Usage : consider <monster>

This command will compare your Level with the mob's level. You will then
receive a rough estimate, which is by no means exact. Consider does not take
hit points, special attacks, or damage into account.  However,
player's may buy scrolls of identify for more detailed information
about a particular monster.

Example:
  > consider fido

See Also: IDENTIFY
#
EXPERIENCE XP

Whenever you kill a monster or a player, you earn experience points. When
enough experience points are earned, you gain a level. Things you should know
about experience points:

  * When damaging a monster, you get experience points.

  * If you kill a monster of higher level than yourself, you get bonus
    experience points. If killing a monster of lower level you'll gain
    fewer experience points

About Player Killing:
We STRONGLY discourage you from killing other players.  Usually, a PKILL
(Player KILL) will make you VERY unpopular with other players and will make YOU
the object of other pkillers, city guards, the jail master and the gods.

(see help PKILL)

See Also: GROUP
#
GROUP

Usage : GROUP [player], GROUP ALL, GROUP

If you are a group member, then you will share experience points for killing
monsters equally among the group. Experience points will only be shared among
group members that are in the same location at the time of the killing blow.
Sharing is regardless of whether the group members have been participating in
the fight. 

<GROUP [player}, GROUP ALL>
To make a group, a "leader" must be selected. All members of the group must
then "follow" the leader using the follow command. The leader should NOT follow
anyone at all! The leader can now toggle group membership for each player in
the group, by using "group <player_name>". The leader should remember to
include himself in the group. Also, the leader can use GROUP ALL to make all
players following him, as well as himself, part of a group.

<GROUP>
Group with no argument show a list of people with whom you are grouped.

Example:

Quifael and Redferne wishes to group with Dragon.

Quifael : "follow dragon"
Redferne: "follow dragon"
(Dragon should be following no one but himself)
Dragon  : "group dragon"
Dragon  : "group redferne"
Dragon  : "group quifael"

Later when Dragon get upset at Quifael (because he is sleeping all the time)
he types : "Group Quifael" to kick Quifael out of the group.

See Also: XP EXPERIENCE
#
QUAFF POTION POTIONS

Use : Quaff <Potion>

Quaff is used to "drink" a (magical) potion.  Note that your stomach can
only contain so much liquid.

See Also: DRINK
#
RECITE SCROLL SCROLLS

Use : Recite <Scroll> [Target]
 or : rec <scroll> [Target]

Is used to "read" a magical scroll. Target can be an object, character or
nothing (which may be yourself).
#

USE WAND STAFF STAVE STAVES STAFFS WANDS

Use : Use <Staff>
      Use <Wand> <Target>

Using staffs will automatically target everybody (or everything) in a room
except the caster. Therefore staffs are naturally very powerful, yet may be
very dangerous to use around other players.

Using a wand requires that you point it at a target, which can be either a
character or an object.

Both staffs and wands must be HELD to use! (Use the grab or hold
commands). You must still supply the name of the staff or wand to avoid
confusion.
#
ARMOR

Usage       : cast 'armor' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 5 mage, 1 cleric, 2 paladin
Duration    : 24 ticks
Mana Cost   : 5 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The spellcaster calls upon the powers of the gods to protect the victim.  If
successful, the gods will provide protection improving the victim's AC by 10

See Also: AC SONGS
#
ENDURE

Usage       : cast 'endure' <self/victim>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 3 ninja.
Duration    : 24 ticks
Mana Cost   : 10 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster uses knowledge handed down from the ancients to protect the victim.
If successful, the victim's AC will improve by 15.

See Also: AC
#
TELEPORT

Usage       : cast 'teleport' [self]
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 8 mage.
Duration    : Instant
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster opens a portal to another location in the world. The caster
will then be instantly transfered to this location. The location that
the portal transfers you to is random and thus there will always be a
risk of landing in a fatal location.

See Also: -
#
BLESS

Usage       : cast 'bless' <victim or object>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 5 cleric, 6 paladin.
Duration    : level/5 (6 ticks minimum), permanent for objects.
Mana Cost   : 5 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster calls upon the powers of the gods to give their blessing
on the victim or object. If successful, bless on a victim will improve
the victims saving throw versus spells by 1, and furthermore improve
the hitroll by 1.

Bless on an item currently has no defined action. It is only possible
to bless non-evil items, and the object blessed may weigh no more
than five pounds per level of caster.

See Also: SONGS
#
BLINDNESS

Usage       : cast 'blindness' <victim>
Accumulative: No.
Level       : Level 8 mage, 6 cleric, 6 ninja, 7 anti-paladin
Duration    : 2 ticks.
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Blindness will blind a victim if it fails its saving throw. A blinded person
will have -4 penalty to both hitroll and AC.

See Also: AC SONGS
#
"POWER WORD KILL"

Usage      : cast 'power word kill' <victim>
Level      : Level 26 mage, 30 anti-paladin.
Save       : none
Mana cost  : 100

A powerful and deadly spell using negative energy focused by the caster
to destroy the life energy of weaker victims.  This spell will kill any
victim at one-half of the casters level or lower, and will deal damage
to any victim ten levels lower than the caster, with the damage rising at
lower-level victims.
#
"SPELL REGENERATION"

Usage      : cast 'regeneration' <victim>
Level      : 28 mage.
Mana cost  : 100

Upon casting Regeneration, the caster fills the blood of the victim with
chlorophyll. The victim's skin will turn green and will be affected by
photosynthesis, gaining mana/hit points in relation to the height of the sun.
The maximum amount gained would be 100.
#
"DISPEL MAGIC"

Usage      : cast 'dispel magic' <victim/object>
Level      : level 19 mage, level 17 cleric.
Save       : none
Mana cost  : 20

This spell can be cast either on objects of magical power such as potions,
scrolls and wands, which it will most certainly render powerless. The
spell will also possibly remove some magical benefits or curses from a
normally magical item.  When cast upon a person, it will use its own power
to destroy one of the spell effects already on that person.

Casting of this spell will make the caster weaker for a short period of
time, as he or she is channeling the energy from his or her body to power
the spell.
#
CONFLAGRATION

Usage      : cast 'conflagration' <victim>
Level      : level 30 mage
Save       : none
Mana cost  : 200
Damage done: 1500

With this spell, the caster conjures the essence of elemental fire into
that area. The raging fires will be much more heavily concentrated in the
immediate vicinity of the victim(s), but everyone present will be subject
to the immense heat of the fires. The players in the room shall also be
hit for 200 hitpoints and the caster hit for 300.
#
CONVERGENCE

Usage      : cast 'convergence' <victim>
Level      : level 21 mage, level 27 ninja.
Mana cost  : variable (at least 20)

Uses the target's own mana to heal him or her.
#
"ENCHANT ARMOUR"

Usage      : cast 'enchant armour'
Level      : level 21 mage
Mana cost  : 100

Will enchant non-magical piece of armour with a protective aura, as follows:

   level 21 - 25            +2
   level 26 - 29            +3
   level 30 - 39            +4
   level 40 - 50            +5
   level IMP                +6

The alignment of the armor will be that of the caster.
#
DISINTEGRATE

Usage      : cast 'disintegrate' <victim/object>
Level      : level 27 mage, level 28 commando
Save       : objects none, victims yes
Mana cost  : 150
Damage done: 10-20*(Level of caster)

The caster will use his or her willpower to damage the target completely.
Caution!  All possessions of the victim will also be disintegrated! There is
a possibility that the victim might get a saving throw and survive the spell
completely.
#
"VAMPIRIC TOUCH"

Usage      : cast 'vampiric touch' <victim>
Level      : level 18 mage, level 24 anti-paladin, level 32 commando
Save       : none
Mana cost  : 40 + (2 * level of caster)
Damage     : 9 * level of caster (up to 450 at level 50)

The caster inflicts damage to the victim and drains hit points from
them, transferring these hit points back to themself.

Each cast of this spell against a victim will normally shift the
caster's alignment towards evil; however, the amount of alignment
changed depends on the alignment of both the caster and the target.

If the caster already has a negative alignment, the shift will be 50
points towards evil.  If the caster and the target both have positive
alignments, the alignment shift towards evil will be greater the
closer the caster and target are to saintly (up to 100 total alignment
change per cast).  Finally, a good aligned caster using this spell
against an evil target will have less of an alignment change, up to 0
points if the caster is saintly and the target is prime evil.

This spell is less effective against targets affected by the Sanctuary
or Sphere spells.
#
"SEARING ORB"

Usage      : cast 'searing orb'
Level      : level 16 cleric
Save       : none
Mana cost  : 60

A fairly powerful area effect spell which will destroy almost all flammable
objects in the area of the spell.
#
CLAIRVOYANCE

Usage      : cast 'clairvoyance' <victim>
Level      : level 18 mage, level 16 cleric, level 21 ninja
Save       : none
Mana cost  : 35

This spell will enable the caster to transfer his or her eyes to another
place in the world, and view it for a brief moment.
#
CLONE

Usage       : cast 'clone' <object>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 27 mage.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 100

Clone allows the caster to make a copy of an object. As with genetic
degeneration in living things, the clone is not a perfect copy. Clone has
its limitations.

See Also: -
#
"CONTROL WEATHER"

Usage       : cast 'control weather' ('better' | 'worse')
Accumulative: Yes
Level       : Level 10 mage, 13 cleric, 11 ninja.
Duration    : -
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell gives the caster control over the elements. This spell will change
the "course" of the current weather. Example:

 > cast 'control wea' worse

See Also: -
#
"CREATE FOOD"

Usage       : cast 'create food'
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 3 cleric, 3 paladin.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 5 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell instantly creates an edible magic mushroom. The mushroom
will satiate for the next (5+level) ticks, up to a maximum of 24 ticks.
The mushrooms cannot be rented.

See Also: -
#
"CREATE WATER"

Usage       : cast 'create water' <drink container>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 2 cleric, 4 paladin.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 5 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Expect disastrous results if cast upon a drink container which contains
another liquid than water. Empty or water containers will be filled
depending on the level of the caster.

Double amount of water will be created if it is raining (or worse).

See Also: -
#
"CURE BLIND"

Usage       : cast 'cure blind' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 4 cleric, 9 ninja, 7 paladin.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell will cure a person blinded by the "blindness" spell.  It
can not remove blindness caused by for example cursed items.

See Also: -
#
"CURE CRITIC"

Usage       : cast 'cure critic' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 9 cleric, 10 paladin
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell cures 10+5*level of caster hit points of damage, for a
maximum of 75 hit points.

See Also: SONGS
#
"CURE CRITIC SPRAY"

Usage       : cast 'cure critic spray'
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 13 cleric.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 38 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell heals all in the room for 10+5*level of caster hit
points, for a maximum of 75 hit points.

See Also: Cure Critic
#
"CURE LIGHT"

Usage       : cast 'cure light' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 1 cleric, 4 ninja, 1 paladin
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell cures 10+5*level of caster hit points of damage, for a
maximum of 30 hit points.

See Also: Cure Light Spray
#
"CURE LIGHT SPRAY"

Usage       : cast 'cure light spray'
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 4 cleric.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 23 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell heals all in the room for 10+5*level of caster hit
points, for a maximum of 30 hit points.

See Also: Cure Light
#
"CURE SERIOUS"

Usage       : cast 'cure serious' <victim>
Accumulative:-
Level       : Level 6 cleric, 16 ninja, 5 paladin.
Mana Cost   : 18 (cost will be higher at lower level)

This spell cures 10+5*level of caster hit points of damage, for a
maximum of 45 hit points.

See Also: Cure Serious Spray
#
"CURE SERIOUS SPRAY"

Usage       : cast 'cure serious spray'
Accumulative:-
Level       : Level 10 cleric.
Mana Cost   : 27 (cost will be higher at lower level)

This spell heals all in the room for 10+5*level of caster hit
points, for a maximum of 45 hit points.

See Also: Cure Serious
#
CURSE

Usage       : cast 'curse' (victim | object)
Level       : Level 12 mage, 8 anti-paladin.
Save        : Negates
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 7 Days, permanent on objects.
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Curse, when cast on a person that fails the saving throw, will reduce the
hitroll by one for every ten levels and reduce the saving throw versus
paralysation by one for every ten levels.

See Also: -
#
"DETECT ALIGNMENT"

Usage       : cast 'detect alignment' [self]
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 4 mage, 4 cleric, 4 paladin, 5 anti-paladin.
Duration    : level * 5 ticks.
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Detect alignment will enable you to see the red aura surrounding evil persons
and items or yellow aura surrounding good persons and items.

See Also: -
#
"DETECT INVISIBILITY"

Usage       : cast 'detect invisibility' [self]
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 2 mage, 5 cleric, 1 ninja, 5 paladin, 5 anti-paladin
Duration    : level * 5 ticks.
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell enables you to see invisible items and players.

See Also: SONGS
#
"DETECT MAGIC"

Usage       : cast 'detect magic' [self]
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 2 mage,3 cleric.
Duration    : level * 5 ticks
Mana Cost   : 5 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell will let you see the magical aura surrounding magical objects.

See Also: -
#
"DETECT POISON"

Usage       : cast 'detect poison' (victim | food | drink)
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 4 mage,2 cleric.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 5 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

If cast on food or drinks (drink containers) you will be able to sense if
it is poisoned.  If cast on a person you will be able to see if that
person is poisoned.

See Also: -
#
"ENCHANT WEAPON"

Usage       : cast 'enchant weapon' <weapon>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 12 mage.
Duration    : Permanent
Mana Cost   : 50

This spell will enchant non-magical (non-modifying) weapons only. By
non-modifying weapons we refer to weapons that might alter any ability
such as for example damage. The only way to know if a weapon is suitable
for enchantment is to fully identify it. The weapon will only be usable
by a character with the same alignment of the enchanter.

The enchantment will modify the weapon as:

Level    Hit Roll    Damage

0..17      +1         +1
18..19     +2         +1
20+        +2         +2
25+        +3         +2
28+        +3         +3
40+      random     random
IMM+       +4         +4
IMP        +5         +5

Between levels 40 and 50, there is the possibility of enchanting with all
combinations between +3 +3 and +5 +5.  For example a +4 +3 enchant is possible,
so is a +4 +5, etc.  The closer a character is to level 50, the better the
chance of getting +5 +5.

See Also: -
#
HEAL

Usage       : cast 'heal' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 14 cleric, 29 ninja, 21 paladin
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 50

Heal will heal all the hit points from a person. A maximum of 200 points can be
healed. 

A victim who is blinded or stunned will also be cured by the heal spell.

See Also: "Cure Blindness" "Heal Spray" SONGS
#
"HEAL SPRAY"

Usage       : cast 'heal spray'
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 22 cleric.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 100

Heal will heal all in the room for a maximum of 200 hit points.

Any victim who is blinded or stunned will also be cured by the heal spell.

See Also: "Cure Blindness" "Heal"
#
FORGET

Usage       : cast 'forget' <victim>
Level       : Level 11 mage, 14 anti-paladin
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Some monsters have a good memory and if a person were to leave a fight
and come back later the monster would remember that person and attack.
Forget will cause the monster to...uh...where was I?

See Also: SONGS
#
"HOLD PERSON"

Usage       : cast 'hold' <victim>
Level       : Level 21 mage, 24 ninja, 26 paladin
Save        : SAVE PARALYSIS
Duration    : Level of the caster ticks
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Holds a person.  If the monster is aggressive, it will not attack other
players.  It will not move around the world.  If it gets attacked by the others
it can only retreat at second round.

See Also: SONGS
#
INVISIBILITY

Usage       : cast 'invisibility' <victim | object>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 4 mage, 7 ninja, 9 anti-paladin
Duration    : 24 ticks, permanent on objects.
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Self Explanatory.
Attacking while invisible will immediately break the spell.

See Also: "DETECT INVISIBILITY" SONGS
#
"IMPROVED INVISIBILITY" IMPY

Usage       : cast 'improved invisibility' (self only)
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 25 mage, 29 anti-paladin.
Duration    : Level/10 ticks
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

You will not appear even if you are attacking.  Anyone who is less than level
51 cannot see you.  Only people under the affects of the "sense life" spell
or the "perceive" spell will be able to detect your presence. Improve
Invisibility will also improve your AC by 40.

See Also: INVISIBILITY PERCEIVE
#
"REMOVE IMPROVED INVISIBILITY"

Usage       : cast 'remove improved invisibility' (self only)
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 25 mage, 29 anti-paladin.
Mana Cost   : 20

This removes your improved invisibility and is only castable on yourself.

See Also: IMPROVED INVISIBILITY
#
FEAR

Usage       : cast 'fear' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 9 mage, 10 anti-paladin
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

If you cast this spell on someone then the victim may become scared
and flee. This spell can be cast during battle.

See Also: SONGS
#
"LOCATE OBJECT"

Usage       : cast 'locate object' <keyword>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 6 mage, 10 cleric, 14 ninja, 17 paladin, 10 bard.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 50 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Casting this spell will give you a chance of determining whether any specific
object exists in the world.  The spell will always tell you if it can't find
any at all.  If more than one object by the same name exists you will see them
all, because you're a wizard Harry!

See Also: -
#
"LOCATE CHARACTER"

Usage       : cast 'locate character' <character>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 11 mage, 14 cleric, 13 bard.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell enables the caster to locate where a character is. <character> can
be either a PC or NPC.
#
POISON

Usage       : cast 'poison' <victim | food | drink>
Accumulative: Yes on persons.
Level       : Level 8 cleric, 12 ninja, 6 anti-paladin.
Save        : Negates
Duration    : 2*level ticks, or permanent on food and drinks.
Mana Cost   : 10 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Casting poison on food or drink (containers) will poison it. Eating poisoned
food or drinks will poison the person eating or drinking.

A person who is poisoned will suffer 2 points of damage every hour, and gain
fewer points than usual.

See Also: "detect poison" or "remove poison"
#
"PROTECTION FROM EVIL"

Usage       : cast 'protection from evil' [self]
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 6 cleric, 24 paladin.
Duration    : 12 ticks
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The the monster is evil and you are not, the damage of the
mob will be decreased by: (10 + level self - level mob) with
a maximum decrease of 10. This is an extremely powerful
protection.

See Also: "PROTECTION FROM GOOD"
#
"PROTECTION FROM GOOD"

Usage       : cast 'protection from good' [self]
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 6 cleric, Level 18 anti-paladin.
Duration    : 12 ticks
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

If the monster is good and you are not, the damage of the mob will be
decreased by (10 + level self - level mob) with a maximum decrease of 10.
This is an extremely powerful protection.

See Also: "PROTECTION FROM EVIL"
#
"REMOVE CURSE"

Usage       : cast 'remove curse' <person | object>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 13 mage, 12 cleric.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Will remove a curse on carried objects or any persons in the room.

See Also: -
#
"REMOVE POISON"

Usage       : cast 'remove poison' <victim | food | drink>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 9 cleric, 12 ninja, 14 paladin.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Will remove poison from the target.

See Also: POISON "POISON SMOKE"
#
SANCTUARY

Usage       : cast 'sanctuary' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 13 cleric, 20 paladin
Duration    : Level/5 ticks
Mana Cost   : 50

When protected by sanctuary, all damage afflicted on you by weapons or spells
will be halved.

See Also: SONGS
#
SPHERE

Usage       : cast 'sphere' [self]
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 18 mage.
Duration    : level / 2
Mana Cost   : 50

When protected by sphere, any aggressive monster that is 5 levels lower than
you will not attack you.  No one can steal from you.

If you are magically attacked by something the same level as you, you have
a 50% chance of blocking the attack.  This includes attacks of fire, cold,
electricity, acid, etc. For every level the attacker is above you, your
chance of blocking decreases by 5%.  For every level the attacker is below
you, your chance of blocking increases by 5%. If the attacker is 10 levels
above you, your sphere is useless, and if the attacker is 10 levels below you,
your sphere in impenetrable.

Classes get percentage bonus or percentage penalties against sphere as follows.

   Cleric        -5             Nomad        -10
   Magic User   +10             Paladin       -5
   Warrior      -10             Anti-Paladin  +5
   Thief        -10             Bard           0
   Ninja         -5             Commando      +5

See Also: INVULNERABILITY
#
INVULNERABILITY

Usage       : cast 'invulnerability' [self]
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 29 mage, 28 cleric.
Duration    : level / 2
Mana Cost   : 50

When protected by this sphere no one can steal from you.  Any physical attack
towards you that would cause less than 20 damage will miss.  Any aggressive
monster that is 5 levels lower than you will not attack you.

If you are physically attacked by something the same level as you, you have
a 50% chance of blocking the attack.  This includes all skills such as
bash, pummel, assault, circle, etc. For every level the attacker is above
you, your chance of blocking decreases by 5%.  For every level the attacker
is below you, your chance of blocking increases by 5%. If the attacker is
10 levels above you, your sphere is useless, and if the attacker is 10 levels
below you, your sphere in impenetrable.

Classes get percentage bonus or percentage penalties against invulnerability as
follows:

   Cleric       -10             Nomad         +5
   Magic User   -10             Paladin       +5
   Warrior      +10             Anti-Paladin  +5
   Thief        +10             Bard          +5
   Ninja         +5             Commando      +5

See Also: SPHERE
#
"SPELL SLEEP"

Usage       : cast 'sleep' <person>
Accumulative: Yes (duration)
Level       : Level 14 mage, 19 anti-paladin
Duration    : 4 ticks + one hour per level
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

If the victim fails a saving throw versus spell he or she will fall asleep.
A person who is affected by sleep can only be awakened if attacked.

See Also: SONGS
#
"SPELL STRENGTH"

Usage       : cast 'strength' (self only)
Accumulative: Yes (strength)
Level       : Level 7 mage.
Duration    : Level ticks
Mana Cost   : 10 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

A person will gain 1 strength point per spell (2 points if level of caster is
Level 28 or above). Maximum strength is 18/100.

See Also: -
#
VENTRILOQUATE

Usage       : cast 'ventriloquate' <victim | object> <text>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 1 mage.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 5 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

For all people in the same room as the caster that fail a saving throw,
the spell will make the object or victim appear to say the text written.
People saving will only notice that someone tried to make it sound that
way, not who.

Example:

> cast 'vent' unclesam I've got 921,923 coins, don't even consider killing me.

See Also: -
#
"WORD OF RECALL"

Usage       : cast 'word of recall'
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 13 mage, 11 cleric, 19 ninja, 19 commando
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster will be transferred back to his sanctuary (presently the
Temple of Midgaard).

See Also: SONGS
#
SUMMON

Usage       : cast 'summon' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 8 cleric, 18 paladin.
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 50

Will summon a person of the name spoken. It is possible to summon someone of
higher level than yourself.  However, the higher they are above you, the lower
your chance of succeeding.  If you attempt to summon a monster it will get a
saving throw. It is also not possible to summon anyone into arena zones.

See Also: "GROUP SUMMON"
#
"CHARM PERSON"

Usage       : cast 'charm person' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 14 mage
Duration    : (432/Intelligence points of victim) ticks
Mana Cost   : 50

It is not possible to charm anyone that is already charmed, if you're charmed
yourself, or if the person is higher level than you are. The person will get a
saving throw versus "paralysation". It is also not possible to charm anyone
over level 30.

A charmed person will follow you and not be able to attack you.  You can give
commands to a charmed person using the order command. 

See Also: FOLLOW ORDER SONGS
#
"ANIMATE DEAD"

Usage       : cast 'animate dead' <corpse>
Accumulative: No
Level       : level 22 mage and level 24 cleric
Duration    : (level of the caster) ticks
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 50

The caster invokes the powers of ancient voodoo practices in an attempt to
raise the dead. If successful, the corpse will come back to life with (level of
the monster * 30) hp, and max damage per round will be (level of the monster +
5).  The undead monster will follow the caster in (level of the caster) ticks.

See Also: FOLLOW ORDER CHARM
#
"SENSE LIFE"

Usage       : cast 'sense life' [self]
Accumulative: No
Level       : Level 7 cleric, 10 ninja, 6 paladin, 13 anti-paladin.
Duration    : 5 * level
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell will enable you to sense hidden life forms in a room. Invisible
persons are also considered hidden.

See Also: HIDE
#
"MAGIC MISSILE"

Usage       : cast 'magic missile' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 1 mage, 1 anti-paladin, 1 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 5 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Old Damage done : 10 to 6
New Damage done : level/2 + (5 to 10)

The caster magically conjures a missile and sends it flying at the victim. This
is the least powerful offensive mage spell. This spell does more damage at
lower levels.

See Also:
#
"CHILL TOUCH"

Usage       : cast 'chill touch' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 3 mage, 3 anti-paladin, 2 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Old Damage done : 11 to 16
New Damage done : level/2 + (10 to 40)

Cold hands, warm heart? The caster touches the victim sending an icy chill.
This spell is more powerful than the magic missile spell.  A victim failing
a saving throw will get its strength reduced by one for 6 ticks.

See Also: MAGIC MISSILE
#
"SPELL IDENTIFY"

Usage       : cast 'identify' <item>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 7 mage, level 9 bard
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 10
Damage Done : -

This spell is used to gain knowledge about the targeted item.

Alternatively, scrolls of identify are available at the magic shop.

See Also: IDENTIFY
#
"BURNING HANDS"

Usage       : cast 'burning hands' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 5 mage, 3 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 17 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Old Damage done : 18 to 25
New Damage done : level/2 + (15 to 50)

The caster's hands become aflame and will burn the victim when it is touched.
This spell is more powerful than the chill touch spell.

See Also: CHILL TOUCH
#
"SHOCKING GRASP"

Usage       : cast 'shocking grasp' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 7 mage, 5 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 19 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Old Damage done : 33 to 40
New Damage done : level/2 + (20 to 80)

The caster generates an enormous static charge and imparts a shock to the
victim. This spell is more powerful than the burning hands spell.

See Also: BURNING HANDS
#
"LIGHTNING BOLT"

Usage       : cast 'lightning bolt' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 9 mage, 12 anti-paladin, 7 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Old Damage done : 50 to 60
New Damage done : level/2 + (30 to 120)

The caster calls upon the powers of the Norse god Thor to use his powers to
hurl lightning at the victim. This spell is more powerful than the shocking
grasp spell.

See Also: SHOCKING GRASP
#
"COLOUR SPRAY"

Usage       : cast 'colour spray' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 11 mage, 10 commando
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 23 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Old Damage done : 80
New Damage done : level/2 + (35 to 100)

The caster throws beams of colours at the victim causing damage.

See Also: "LIGHTNING BOLT" SONGS
#
"ENERGY DRAIN"

Usage       : cast 'energy drain' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 13 mage, 15 anti-paladin.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 35 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster uses wraith-like powers to drain the life-force from the victim.
This spell does not do much damage, but victims failing their saving throws
will lose some hit points, mana and exp. You will gain this drained energy.
Beware that this spell is evil and will gradually draw the caster towards the
dark powers.

See Also: -
#
FIREBALL

Usage       : cast 'fireball' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 15 mage, 20 anti-paladin, 15 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Old Damage done : About 100
New Damage done : level/2 + (80 to 140)

The caster conjures up a ball of flame from the elemental plane of fire and
sends it hurtling towards the victim.

See Also: COLOUR SPRAY
#
ICEBALL

Usage       : cast 'iceball' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 19 mage, 23 anti-paladin, 20 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Old Damage done : About 130
New Damage done : level/2 + (100 to 160)

The caster calls upon the elements to conjure a huge ball of ice to freeze the
victim. This spell is more powerful than fireball and it will decrease the
movement points of the victim by 30 each time.
#
REAPPEAR

Usage       : cast 'reappear' <object>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 10 mage.
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Reappear allows the caster to return invisible objects back to the visible
world.
#
REVEAL

Usage       : cast 'reveal' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 6 mage.
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Reveal allows the caster to return invisible people back to the visible world.
#
"LETHAL FIRE"

Usage       : cast 'lethal fire' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 24 mage, 27 commando
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 50
Old Damage done : 180 to 230
New Damage done : level/2 + (180 to 230)

Lethal fire sets the victim afire in burning blue flames.  This spell
is much more powerful than iceball and there will be no saving throw
for the victim.

See also: SONGS
#
"THUNDERBALL"

Usage       : cast 'thunderball' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 28 mage.
Save        : No saving throw.
Mana Cost   : 200
Damage done : 800 to 1100

The caster calls upon the powers of the Norse god Thor to conjure up a ball
of thunder that is sent crashing into the victim. This spell is one of the
most powerful offensive spells and there will be no saving throw for the
victim.
#
"ELECTRIC SHOCK"

Usage       : cast 'electric shock' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 26 mage, 29 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 100
Damage done : 450 to 500

The caster of this spell channels a powerful jolt of electricity through
himself and sends it coursing through the body of the victim.  This spell
is much more powerful than lethal fire.
#
EARTHQUAKE

Usage       : cast 'earthquake'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 7 cleric, 6 commando.
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster sends the earth shaking, causing damage to everyone in the room
except the caster by 1d8+level_of_caster hit points.

See Also: -
#
"TOTAL RECALL"

Usage       : cast 'total recall'
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 18 cleric.
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

Set in the future on the planet Mars, a man has his memory altered in order to
expose a ring of rebels...Oh wait..that was the movie...

This spell will recall everyone in the room back to the temple including the
caster.

See Also: "WORD OF RECALL" SONGS
#
"DEATH SPRAY"

Usage       : cast 'death spray'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : level 23 mage, 24 commando.
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 80

Rays of death will fly forth from the hands of the caster.  This spell will
damage everybody in the room except the caster and PC's by 120 + caster_level/2
hit points.
#
"HOLY WORD"

Usage       : cast 'holy word'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : level 23 cleric, 25 paladin.
Save        : Same as dispel evil
Mana Cost   : 80
Damage Done : 130

The caster invokes the name of the One True God in the angelic tongue of the
Archons.  Any evil beings nearby are burned by the fires of dawn and wracked
with pain.

See Also: Dispel Evil
#
"EVIL WORD"

Usage       : cast 'evil word'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : level 23 cleric, 26 anti-paladin
Save        : Same as dispel good
Mana Cost   : 80
Damage Done : 130

The caster invokes the name of the Dark Unmentionable One, asking the
gates of Hell to be opened in the vicinity.  The corruption of the pits
of hell will stream forth and burn all those who do not acknowledge the
dominance of the powers of darkness.

See Also: "DISPEL GOOD"
#
"LAY HANDS"

Usage       : cast 'lay hands' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 15 paladin
Mana Cost   : 100

Upon touching the victim the caster uses the power of faith to heal
the victim.  The amount healed is 10*level of caster.
#
MIRACLE

Usage       : cast 'miracle' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 25 cleric.
Mana Cost   : 100

The caster calls upon the mercy of the gods for a miracle. If the gods
are merciful the hp of the player will be restored for a maximum of 2000
hit points.
#
"GREAT MIRACLE"

Usage       : cast 'great miracle'
Level       : level 30 cleric.
Mana Cost   : 200

The caster begs the merciful gods for a miracle.  If they deem the caster
worthy the hit points of all PCs in the room will be restored for a
maximum of 2000 hit points.

See Also: MIRACLE
#
VITALITY

Usage       : cast 'vitality' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 8 mage, 16 cleric, 14 paladin
Mana cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster gives a refreshing pick-me-up to the tired victim, restoring
the victim's movement points to full.

See also: SONGS
#
"MANA TRANSFER"

Usage      : cast 'mana transfer' <victim>
Accumulative: yes
Level       : Level 18 mage, 18 cleric.
Mana Cost   : 50

By casting this spell you can attempt to channel your mana into
another player.  The spell is not perfect and some mana will be
lost during the process of transferring.
#
"HOLY BLESS"

Usage      : cast 'holy bless' (self only)
Accumulative: yes
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 19 cleric.
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster asks for the blessing of the One True God to return his/her
soul to the path of righteousness.
#
SATIATE

Usage       : cast 'satiate' <victim>
Level       : Level 15 cleric
Mana Cost   : 10 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell can fill your stomach to full for 24 ticks, and you can cast
this spell on other players too.

See also: SONGS
#
FURY

Usage       : cast 'fury' (self only)
Accumulative: -
Duration    : 2 ticks, 4 ticks at level 50
Level       : Level 21 paladin.
Mana Cost   : 60, 120 at level 50

This spell will fill your soul with fire and rage and will double your
damage roll.  You cannot parry or dodge while under the influence of this
spell and will always be hit when attacked.

At level 50, Paladin class members receive more benefit from fury, depending
on their saintliness.  For alignments 500 or lower, damage is merely doubled.
For every 100 alignment above 500, the multiplier increases by 1/10th up to
a maximum of 2.5.
#
"EVIL BLESS"

Usage      : cast 'evil bless' (self only)
Accumulative: yes
Level       : Level 20 cleric.
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster asks for the blessing of the Dark Unmentionable One to
return his/her soul back to the path of the damned.
#
"DISPEL EVIL"

Usage       : cast 'dispel evil' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 10 cleric, 19 paladin.
Save        : Special
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster calls upon the powers of the One True God to damage the unholy.
This spell will only affect evil creatures. An evil person of level
equal or less than caster will suffer 180 damage points. A victim
greater than level 30 has reduced damage.

If the victim is higher level than caster the spell will inflict
(caster_level)d4 damage points, saving throw versus half damage.

See Also: Holy Word
#
"DISPEL GOOD"

Usage       : cast 'dispel good' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 11 cleric, 22 anti-paladin.
Save        : Special
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster calls upon the powers of the Dark One to damage those who are
pure of heart.  This spell will only affect good creatures. A good person
of level equal to or less than caster will suffer 180 damage points.
A victim greater than level 30 has reduced damage.

If the victim is higher level than caster the spell will inflict
(caster_level)d4 damage points, saving throw versus half damage.

See Also: -
#
"CALL LIGHTNING"

Usage       : cast 'call lightning' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instant
Level       : Level 12 cleric, 12 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell will use the "force of nature" to make a lightning
strike the victim. It is therefore only possible to call lightning
outside and it has to be raining (or worse).

The lightning will inflict (level)d8 points of damage, up to a
maximum of 30d8 damage points.

See Also: WEATHER and CONTROL WEATHER
#
"SPIRIT LEVY"

Usage       : cast 'spirit levy' <corpse>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : level 20 mage, 25 anti-paladin.
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 15 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell can absorb the life energy from a corpse.  The hit points that are
recovered depend on the level of the dead monster.

When cast upon the corpse of a creature with a level of no less than 10 levels
below the caster, this spell will increase the blood level of the room by one.

See Also: "BLOOD LEVEL"
#
HARM

Usage       : cast 'harm' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 15 cleric, 14 commando.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 35 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell causes bruises and small wounds to appear all over the body of
the victim, removing all but 1d4 hitpoints. The maximum number of damage
points are 100 + level/2. It is not possible to kill using this spell (but almost).

See Also: -
#
"SUPER HARM"

Usage       : cast 'super harm' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 27 cleric, 32 paladin.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.
Mana Cost   : 100

This spell causes bleeding wounds to appear all over the body of the victim,
removing all but 1d4 hit points. The maximum number of damage points is 600.
It is not possible to kill using this spell (but almost).

See Also: -
#
"HELL FIRE"

Usage       : cast 'hell fire'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 28 anti-paladin.
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 110
Damage Done : 200 (plus level / 2 damage to non-evil victims)

The caster calls upon the Dark Unmentionable One to open the gates
of hell and send forth the flames of despair to burn all victims in
the room.  Non-evil creatures affected by this spell suffer
additional damage equal to half the caster's level.

See Also: -
#
PERCEIVE

Usage       : cast 'perceive' (self only)
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 2*level
Level       : Level 40 Mage, Level 40 Anti-Paladin
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 40

While affected by this spell, the character is able to see
hidden creatures in the room and impy characters that are
a lower level.
#
FIREBREATH

Usage       : cast 'firebreath'
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 28 mage
Mana Cost   : 100

The caster will receive a severe case of heartburn enabling the caster to
breathe fire at victims. Each breath will do the damage of approximately one
Fireball. The spell will last for six breaths or six rounds.

See Also: FIREBALL
#
"BLINDNESS DUST"

Usage       : cast 'blindness dust'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 16 ninja, 17 anti-paladin.
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster creates a handful of glittering dust and throws it into
the air, blinding everyone in the room except the caster.

See Also: Poison Smoke, Blindness
#
"POISON SMOKE"

Usage       : cast 'poison smoke'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 17 ninja, 16 anti-paladin.
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The caster sends forth a billowing cloud of green smoke that poisons
everyone in the room except the caster.

See Also: Blindness dust, Poison
#
"HYPNOTIZE"

Usage       : cast 'hypnotize' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 22 ninja, 27 anti-paladin.
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 40 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

You are getting sleepy. Your eyelids are getting heavier and heavier.
You are now under my control. This spell will either charm or send the
victim to sleep.

See Also: Sleep and Charm
#
INFRAVISION

Usage       : cast 'infravision' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : 30 + Level of Caster ticks
Level       : Level 5 Mage, 5 Ninja, 11 Anti-Paladin
Mana Cost   : 20 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

The victim of this spell gains the ability to see in the dark without
a light source.

See also: SONGS
#
PARALYZE

Usage       : cast 'paralyze' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Level of the caster
Level       : Level 29 Mage, level 21 anti-paladin
Save        : SAVE PARALYSIS
Mana Cost   : 50

A paralysed person will be affected by +100 ARMOR and -5 HITROLL.
You can paralyze a mob up to 10 levels greater than your level.
#
FLAMESTRIKE

Usage       : cast 'flamestrike' <victim>
Level       : Level 11 cleric, 10 paladin.
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)
Save        : Half damage
Old Damage done : 80
New Damage done : level/2 + (50 to 120)

The caster calls down a column of fire that engulfs the victim.
#
RECHARGE

Usage       : cast 'recharge' <obj>
Level       : Level 17 mage, 20 cleric.
Mana Cost   : 30 (cost will be higher at lower levels)


This spell can recharge any charged magic item back to full.  For
clerics there is a 50% chance that the item will explode and harm
the caster.  For mages, there is only a 40% chance that the item
will explode.
#
FLY

Usage       : cast 'fly' <victim>
Duration    : 12 ticks
Level       : Level 10 mage
Mana Cost   : 25 (cost will be higher at lower levels)

This spell allows players to fly over water and some other obstructions.
Note that the spell doesn't bestow the power of flight upon you but rather
makes you float in the air.

See also: SONGS
#
"REMOVE PARALYSIS"

Usage       : cast 'remove paralysis' <victim>
Duration    : instantaneous
Level       : Level 14 cleric
Mana Cost   : 35

The caster summons the power of the Supreme Being and cleanses the body
of all paralyzing affects.  The armor of the victim will return to normal
as well as the full restoration of the victims hitroll.

See Also: "Paralyze"
#
HELP

Following help is available:

HELP help       - This text.
HELP            - List the available commands.
HELP index      - Complete list of Keywords, for which help is available.

Help searches for a partial match of the entered word, including any
spaces that may follow the word.

Example:
 > 'help magic mis'
    will find the help text for the magic missile spell.

 > 'help mag '
   will not match anything.

 > 'help mag'
   will match 'mage' or 'magic missile' depending on first
   occurrence in the help file.
#
SONG SONGS  "BARD SONGS"

Usage : song 'name of the song'

Songs will affect the whole room including players and monsters.
Songs work in NOMAGIC rooms also.

Level Song's Name                       Mana    Spell
-------------------------------------------------------------------
 (5)  Seal with a Kiss                   5      (armor)
   or Love is a Battlefield
 (7)  I Can See Clearly Now              15     (cure blindness)
 (9)  One Day I will Fly Away            25     (fly)
   or Come Fly With Me
(11)  We Don't Need Another Hero         25     (cure critic)
(12)  Forget You                         15     (forget)
(13)  Smoke Gets In Your Eyes            15     (blindness)
   or Blinded by the Light
(14)  Enter Sandman                      25     (sleep)
(15)  Best Of Me                         10     (satiate)
   or Hungry Like the Wolf
(16)  I'm Taking a Walk                  25     (vitality)
(17)  Dangerous                          25     (colour spray)
   or Purple Rain
(18)  Somebody's Watching Me             25     (detect invisibility)
(19)  We Are the World                   30     (total recall)
   or Mama, I'm Coming Home
(20)  Don't Fear the Reaper              15     (fear)
(21)  Moonlight Shadow                   20     (infravision)
   or I Wear My Sunglasses at Night
(22)  This Charming Man                  50     (charm person)
(23)  Nothing Compares to you            50     (sanctuary)
   or Safety Dance
(25)  Toy Soldier                        50     (animate-dead)
   or Thriller
(26)  Everything I Do I Do It For You    50     (heal)
   or Comfortably Numb
(27)  Hold On                            15     (hold)
(28)  A View to a Kill                   50     (lethal fire)
   or Ring of Fire
(36)  Lifting Shadows of a Dream         25     (remove poison)
   or Every Rose Has Its Thorn
(42)  Canned Heat                        120    (haste)*
(46)  There is No Heart That Won't Heal  80     (rejuvenation)
   or Forever Young
(50)  Come Together                      100    (group summon)

* Haste song has guaranteed effect on clerics and bards, other classes
have a 5% chance to be affected.
#
SPELL SPELLS

See help for:
 ANTI-PALADIN SPELLS       BARD SPELLS
 CLERIC SPELLS             COMMANDO SPELLS
 NINJA SPELLS              PALADIN SPELLS
 MAGE SPELLS               AVATAR SPELLS
#
"BARD SPELLS"

       BARD SPELLS
----------------------------------------------------------
       (5) Ventriloquate
       (9) Identify
      (10) Locate Object
      (13) Locate Character

Use HELP SONGS to see the bard's songs.
#
LINK LINKS

A lot of players have problems with their links to the game. This could be
very dangerous to your health in the middle of a combat. But we have worked
out a solution. There are two cases:

  I.If your link is broken, you will automatically attempt to flee each
    time someone attempts to hit you. If you manage to flee, then you
    will be saved by divine forces, and put in a safe place until you
    reconnect to the game.  Fleeing usually costs you some experience
    points.

 II.If your link jams (freezes) you've got a problem. The only solution we
    can give is that you break your link as quickly as possible. By
    breaking the link you can hope that the above procedure is initiated.
#
COMPACT

If you have a small display you might want to use this command. It turns off
(or on) the extra newline after output to your screen.

See also: BRIEF
#
META

Meta allows you to increase your statistics. You can Meta at the
Metaphysycian. Use list to see a listing of Meta costs for you. All
costs are in experience points. These points will be subtracted from
your accumulated experience points.

Example:
  >buy 2   will meta mana

Meta costs are as follows:
Mana and hp:

Minimum cost            2M

Costs are different for each class. The more hit points or mana you have the
more it costs to meta. For example hit points are cheap for Nomads for a long
time.

Age:                    Exp & Gold cost vary depending on current age.

Movement:               1M

Practice sessions:      300k

Stats:
4-8                     100k
9                       200k
10                      250k
11                      300k
12                      400k
13                      700k
14                      1M
15                      2M
16                      3M
17                      5M
18                      10M

Strength over 18:

1-50                    1M
51-75                   2M
76-90                   4M
91-99                   8M
100                     18M

When you meta you may get lucky.  The metaman
may be generous and cut your meta cost in half.

He'll only consider this after you decide to buy
something.
#
PKILL NOKILL "PLAYER KILLING"

PKILL is the intentional killing of another player or knowingly
summoning a player with the intent of getting that player killed by
aggressive monsters.

***PLAYER KILLING IS ILLEGAL EXCEPT IN ARENA AREAS OR THE CHAOS ZONE.***

Arena areas are marked by a [*] in the room name. All participants in a PKILL
must be AWARE of the nature of arena areas. No one can be led into an arena
area and be killed especially in the case of new players.  PKILLing outside an
arena area will get to a killer flag and the Jail Master will jail you. If you
are jailed you will not be able to rent your equipment nor can you get out
until your time is up. In any case, even if the PKILL is legal corpse robbing
is not legal. There is to be no corpse robbing at any time. Corpse robbing will
be dealt with accordingly by the Gods.

To reiterate, LOOTING ANOTHER PLAYER'S CORPSE WILL NOT BE TOLERATED!!!

NOTE : To guard against accidentally killing other players make sure
your NO_KILL flag is set. NO_KILL can be toggled on and off by typing
nokill.

For you Player Killing pleasure, we now have an area devoted solely to
this activity - The Labyrinth of Skelos. (Chaos Zone)

See Also: CHAOS "CHAOS ZONE"
#
CHAOS

This is a communication channel that is broadcast to everyone who has the
channel turned on, no matter where they are.  This channel is used for players
battling in the Chaos Zone.

See Also: "CHAOS NIGHT" "CHAOS ZONE" GOSSIP
#
"CHAOS ZONE"

This is a place where players can fight to the death without fear of
losing equipment, or experience.  When a player dies, he/she is
instantly transported to the morgue with equipment and stats intact.

For immortal run quests in the Chaos Zone, there is special equipment
that when you die, will remain behind in your corpse.  This is
particularly useful for 'capture the flag' type quests.  This special
equipment is only available to immortals, so you need not worry about
any of your existing equipment staying behind.

The Chaos Zone is located under the town of Midgaard and can be accessed
through a tunnel from the basement of the Midgaard Stables.

To exit the chaos zone, you must either die or quit the battle.

See Also: CHAOS "CHAOS NIGHT"
#
PSTEAL

Stealing from players (PSTEALing) is illegal. First, it conforms to the
rules set under STEAL (see help STEAL). Second, if you are caught
stealing from a player or a cityguard you will get a thief flag and
cityguards will attack you on sight. Furthermore, the Jailmaster will put
you in jail. If you go to jail you will not be able to rent your
equipment, nor can you get out until your time is up. In any case corpse
robbing is ABSOLUTELY ILLEGAL and will be dealt with accordingly by the Gods.

These rules are enforced by the powers that be even with consent of the party
being thieved from.  Hence, don't try it to see what happens, as you'll end up
in jail with a thief flag, unable to rent your equipment.

Disarming a player in an arena or a Chaos Zone and keeping the weapon is
also considered pstealing.
#
SQUIRE

Spell Affects  -  none
Other Affects  -  +5 Block

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 15% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000 experience
points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
SWASHBUCKLER

Spell Affects  -  none
Other Affects  -  +5 Dual
Required Rank  -  SQUIRE

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 7.5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000 experience
points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
KNIGHT

Spell Affects  -  sense life
Other Affects  -  +5 Triple
Required Rank  -  SWASHBUCKLER

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 7.5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000 experience
points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
"FIRST SWORD"

Spell Affects  -  Detect Alignment
Other Affects  -  HITROLL +1

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 10% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000
experience points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
JUSTICIAR

Spell Affects  -  none
Other Affects  -  +5 Block
Required Rank  -  FIRST SWORD

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000
experience points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
LORD LADY

Spell Affects  -  +5 concentration
Other Affects  -  +5 Pummel
Required Rank  -  JUSTICIAR

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000
experience points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
APPRENTICE

Spell Affects  -  Detect Invisible
Other Affects  -  none

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 10% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000
experience points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
WARLOCK

Spell Affects  -  detect magic
Other Affects  -  +1 hitroll
Required Rank  -  APPRENTICE

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000
experience points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
SORCERER

Spell Affects  -  fly
Other Affects  -  +1 damroll
Required Rank  -  WARLOCK

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000
experience points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
PRIVATE

Spell Affects  -  none
Other Affects  -  SKILL_DUAL +5

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 10% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000
experience points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
COMMODORE

Spell Affects  -  none
Other Affects  -  +5 assault
Required Rank  -  PRIVATE

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000
experience points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
COMMANDER

Spell Affects  -  +5 concentration
Other Affects  -  +5 Triple
Required Rank  -  COMMODORE

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000
experience points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
WANDERER

Spell Affects  -  Detect Magic
Other Affects  -  SKILL_AMBUSH +5

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 15% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000 experience
points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
FORESTER

Spell Affects  -  infravision
Other Affects  -  +1 damroll
Required Rank  -  WANDERER

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 7.5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000 experience
points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
TAMER

Spell Affects  -  Detect Invisible
Other Affects  -  +5 disembowel
Required Rank  -  FORESTER

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 7.5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000 experience
points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
TSUME

Spell Affects  -  Infravision
Other Affects  -  none

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 10% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000
experience points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
SHINOBI

Spell Affects  -  sense life
Other Affects  -  +5 Pummel
Required Rank  -  TSUME

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000
experience points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
SHOGUN

Spell Affects  -  +5 concentration
Other Affects  -  +5 assault
Required Rank  -  SHINOBI

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000
experience points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
MINSTREL

Spell Affects  -  none
Other Affects  -  HITROLL +1

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 10% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000
experience points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
POET

Spell Affects  -  sense life
Other Affects  -  +1 damroll
Required Rank  -  MINSTREL

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000
experience points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
CONDUCTOR

Spell Affects  -  infravision
Other Affects  -  +5 taunt
Required Rank  -  POET

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000
experience points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
"EVIL MINION"

Spell Affects  -  none
Other Affects  -  SKILL_BACKSTAB +5

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 10% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000
experience points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
"DARK WARDER"

Spell Affects  -  infravision
Other Affects  -  none
Required Rank  -  EVIL MINION

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000
experience points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
"DARK LORD" "DARK LADY"

Spell Affects  -  +5 concentration
Other Affects  -  +1 damroll
Required Rank  -  DARK WARDER

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000
experience points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
ACOLYTE

Spell Affects  -  Sphere
Other Affects  -  none

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 10% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000
experience points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
BISHOP

Spell Affects  -  detect alignment
Other Affects  -  +1 hitroll
Required Rank  -  ACOLYTE

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000
experience points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
PROPHET

Spell Affects  -  sense life
Other Affects  -  +1 damroll
Required Rank  -  BISHOP

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points, mana, and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000
experience points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these
numbers, you must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote
you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
HIGHWAYMAN

Spell Affects  -  none
Other Affects  -  +5 backstab

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 15% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 5000000 experience
points, and have 1000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
BRIGAND

Spell Affects  -  sense life
Other Affects  -  +1 hitroll
Required Rank  -  HIGHWAYMAN

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 7.5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 10000000 experience
points, and have 5000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
ASSASSIN

Spell Affects  -  infravision
Other Affects  -  +5 circle
Required Rank  -  BRIGAND

With the rank listed above, you will also get a 7.5% regeneration rate bonus on
hit points and movement. To obtain this rank you must earn 15000000 experience
points, and have 10000000 gold coins. When you have obtained these numbers, you
must then approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose your rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: RANKS
#
RANKS

    The following ranks are available:

      Class         1st              2nd              3rd
-------------------------------------------------------------------------
     Warrior       SQUIRE           SWASHBUCKLER     KNIGHT
     Cleric        ACOLYTE          BISHOP           PROPHET
     Mage          APPRENTICE       WARLOCK          SORCERER
     Thief         HIGHWAYMAN       BRIGAND          ASSASSIN
     Ninja         TSUME            SHINOBI          SHOGUN
     Paladin       FIRST SWORD      JUSTICIAR        LORD/LADY
     Anti-Paladin  EVIL MINION      DARK WARDER      DARK LORD/LADY
     Commando      PRIVATE          COMMODORE        COMMANDER
     Nomad         WANDERER         FORESTER         TAMER
     Bard          MINSTREL         POET             CONDUCTOR

Cost: 1st    5M exp   1M coins
      2nd   10M exp   5M coins
      3rd   15M exp  10M coins

All ranks give a 10% regen bonus for the first rank, an additional
5% bonus for the second rank, and an additional 5% bonus for the
third rank. So someone with the third rank will get a total regen
bonus of 20%.

To obtain a rank you approach the Mayor of Midgaard, and ask him
to promote you.

NOTE: You will lose one rank if you die and have to pay the full
      amount to obtain it again.

See Also: The Rank Names
#
AVATAR

Avatars are the most powerful mortals in this realm, unfortunately they no
longer roam among us. Avatars are a combination of the best spells and
skills of Mages, Clerics, Thieves and Warriors and have excellent stats to
complement these spells and skills. As a rule, Avatars are not allowed to
group with other classes and can only do so with other Avatars.
#
"AVATAR SPELLS"


     Avatar Spells
-----------------------------------------------------------------------------
     (1)  Armor, Burning Hands, Cure Light
     (2)  Bless, Detect Invisibility, Detect Alignment, Endure
     (3)  -
     (4)  Blindness, Cure Serious, Infravision
     (5)  Cure Blind, Remove Poison, Reveal
     (6)  Invisibility, Flamestrike, Word of Recall
     (7)  Cure Critic, Fly, Teleport
     (8)  Locate Object, Sense Life
     (9)  Fear, Remove Paralysis, Reappear
     (10) Forget, Identify, Spirit Levy, Vitality
     (11) Sleep, Locate Character
     (12) Charm Person, Sanctuary, Summon
     (13) Total Recall
     (14) Energy Drain
     (15) Fireball, Heal
     (16) Cure Critic Spray, Recharge, Relocation
     (17) Death Spray, Holy Bless, Sphere
     (18) Enchant Weapon, Iceball, Evil Bless
     (19) Blindness Dust, Poison Smoke, Hold
     (20) Animate Dead, Protection From Evil, Lethal Fire
     (21) Remove Curse
     (22) Miracle, Improve Invisibility
     (23) Fury
     (24) Hell Fire
     (25) Electric Shock, Invulnerability
     (26) -
     (27) Heal Spray, Thunderball, Clone
     (28) Paralyse
     (29) -
     (30) Great Miracle
#
DT "DEATH TRAP"

Death Traps are certain rooms or places on the mud that cause the player to die
almost instantly.  Corpses are retrievable from death traps but by entering to
retrieve one, the retriever is sure to die as well.  Careful timing with a
recall or a summon is needed.

Death Traps also take away experience and stats at double the normal
amount.

See Also: REIMB
#
"MOB SWITCH"

Certain mobs have a tendency to 'switch' their targets. If a player other than
the buffer attacks these kinds of mobs with skills like pummel, punch, bash, or
kick during combat, the mob will hit the next person that is fighting.
#
CLUBS MEMBERSHIP

Currently the mud has 5 Clubs located above the Temple of Midgaard. These clubs
give their members extra mana or hit point regeneration per tick. You can be a
member of only one club at a time, by buying membership at the respective Club
entrance. Membership Fees for the Clubs is 500000 gold coins.

Azoun's Fan Club and Caster's Fan Club are for Mana Regeneration, whereas
Noname's Fan Club and DeathAdder's Fan Club are for Hit point Regeneration.
There is also a free Club for players below level 16 called Club Grunting Boar.

See Also: REGENERATION
#
ARENA

Arena areas are those areas marked by an asterisk next to the room name (*).
These are the ONLY areas where it is permissible to kill other players or
PKILL. It is interesting to note that all area affecting spells and songs
will affect all NPCs as well as players when casted in Arena Areas. Please
note that corpse looting is still not allowed even in Arena Areas.
#
JAIL

When a player gets a (Thief) flag for stealing from other players or a
(Killer) flag for killing other players in a non-arena zone, the Jail
Master of Midgaard exercises his authority and puts such players into
Jail as soon as they arrive at the Temple Of Midgaard. It is not possible
to get out of jail without the help of the gods.
#
DISPLAY

The 'DISPLAY' command helps you to personalize the prompt that appears on
your screen. Currently the default display shows the hitpoints, mana and
movement points of the player. You may toggle the addition of the character
name before the stats, by using the command 'DISPLAY NAME'.

At Ronin, we offer a specialized 'combat-only' display which shows the
condition of the buffer and the victim. This is probably the most important
detail that should be monitored by players.
#
VAULTS STORAGE

Location: East of reception.

Buying:  To buy a vault, you go to the vault guard and type 'buy vault'.
         This will allocate you a vault capable of holding 500 items.  As
         the vault owner you have control over the vault and can give
         access to other players.

         To give temporary viewing access, type 'buy view <player>'.
         That player can see the contents of your vault until he/she
         uses another vault.  Cost is free.

Setting: Before accessing any vault, you must set it for access.
         This is done by 'use vault <vault name>'.  If you have access
         to the vault, you can list, store and recover items. Typing
         'use vault' shows the current set vault.

Access:  To give access to other players, first set your vault
         ('use vault <vaultname>') and then 'buy access <player name>'.
         This gives the named player list, store and recover access
         to your vault.

         To list access, use the command 'list access'
         To see what vaults you have access to, type 'list vaults'
         To remove a players access, type 'remove access <player>'

Store:   Just set the vault you want to store items in and type
         'store <item name>'.

Recover: Just set the vault you want to recover items from and type
         'recover <item name>'.

List:    Just set the vault you want to list items in and type
         'list all/keyword or
             finger, neck, body, head, legs, feet, hands, arms,
             shield, about, waist, wrist, wield, hold, throw,
             wizard, cleric, thief, warrior, ninja, nomad,
             paladin, anti-paladin, avatar, bard, commando,
             evil, neutral, good.'

Costs:   You pay a one-time fee of 1.5 times the rent on an item to store an
         item indefinitely.  Items can be recovered or listed at no charge.
         Compare this with having a storage character who must pay rent on
         all items in inventory when logging on to get just one item, or
         even to just see what's on the character.

NOTE: You are responsible for your vault.  If you give someone access
      and they run off with your equipment, then don't expect a reimburse.
      However, we will make an effort to find the stolen equipment and
      return it to its rightful owner.  Also, depending on the severity
      of the vault loot, the thief will be punished.  For this reason,
      all vault transactions are logged by date and player name.

See Also:  STORE LIST RECOVER OFFER RENT
#
RECOVER STORE

These commands are used with the storage vaults located just east
of reception.

Recover
  Usage: recover <item name>
   Cost: free

Store
  Usage: store <item name>
   Cost: 1.5*(item rent cost)
         The cost can be checked by using: offer <item name>

See Also: VAULTS
#
GODS IMMORTALS IMMORTING

In RoninMUD there are different levels of gods.  These players have obtained
immortality and have been granted great powers, therefore they should be
treated with the utmost respect.  There are various levels of Immortality.
The lowest level to the highest level is as follows: Immortal, Deity,
Temporal, Wizard, Eternal, Supreme, and Implementor.

If a player chooses to become a god he/she must reach level 33
on a character, and as well have a really good set of gear.  Then
they can ask a Supreme or Implementor to bless them as an Immortal.

See Also: IMMORTAL DEITY TEMPORAL WIZARD ETERNAL SUPREME IMPLEMENTOR
#
IMMORTAL IMM

The Immortal is the lowest level of godhood.  Immortals are expected to
learn about the mud, answer player questions, and be generally helpful.
These are the gods you should contact first with a question or problem.

See also: DEITY TEMPORAL WIZARD ETERNAL SUPREME IMPLEMENTOR GODS IMMORTING
#
DEITY DEI

The Deity is the second level of godhood.  Deities are expected to be
working actively for the mud, be it building or doing administrative
functions.

See also: IMMORTAL TEMPORAL WIZARD ETERNAL SUPREME IMPLEMENTOR GODS IMMORTING
#
TEMPORAL TEM

The Temporal is the third level of godhood.  They are more experienced in
administrative and building fields.  These gods also know a great deal about the
MUD.

See Also: GODS IMMORTAL DEITY WIZARD ETERNAL SUPREME IMPLEMENTOR IMMORTING
#
WIZARD WIZ

The middle level of the god ranks, Wizards are knowledgable about the
mud, and are skilled in building, administrative tasks, or coding.

See also: IMMORTAL DEITY TEMPORAL ETERNAL SUPREME IMPLEMENTOR GODS IMMORTING
#
ETERNAL ETE

Eternal is the fifth level of the gods.  They are very active in doing
Tasks for the MUD, and are skilled in many aspects such as coding,
building, and administrative functions. These gods are very wise when
dealing with the MUD.

See Also: IMMORTAL DEITY TEMPORAL WIZARD SUPREME IMPLEMENTOR GODS IMMORTING
#
SUPREME SUP

Supremes are the final level before Implementor.  They are highly skilled
in one or more facets of running the mud, and should not be bothered for
minor problems.

See also: IMMORTAL DEITY TEMPORAL WIZARD ETERNAL IMPLEMENTOR GODS IMMORTING
#
TICK

A "tick" is the unit of measurement the MUD runs on.  The actual length
of a tick varies from mud to mud.  In gameplay, four ticks are equivalent to
one mud hour.  The tick at Ronin lasts approximately 60 seconds.
#
DAMAGE

Damage is the number of hit points removed during combat.
#
TINTIN

Tintin is a popular mud client... a program that automates some of the
mechanics of gameplay.  To get more information about tintin, ask any
mudder :)
#
"TOWN MAP"

                        Altar
                                 |  Big Chain
        N         Donation       | /          NoName's
      \ | /       Room - Temple of Midgaard - Shop
   W -- + -- E                   |
      / | \                      |  Post Office
        S                        | /  Grunting Boar   Grunting
            Cleric Guild - Temple Square - Entrance - Boar
                                 |
              Magic              |  Meta  General Weapon Musical
     Jeweler   Shop  Bakery      | /Shop    Store   Shop Shop
         |-------|------|- Market Square ----|------|-----|
      Flower    Mage  Armor      |          Pet  Warrior Bard
     Boutique  Guild  Shop       |         Store  Guild  Guild
                                 | Auction
             Anti-Pal  Ninja     | Hall Nomad  Paladin  Commando
     Wall      Guild   Guild     | /    Guild   Guild    Guild
     Road ------|-------|- Common Square -|------|--------|
     |               Grubby      |      Thief   Levee  Warehouse
     |                 Inn       |      Guild
                                 |
                                Dump
#
SOUTH
12345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
         1         2         3         4         5         6         7         8
                                         See MAP
                                            |
                                           /\
                                          /  \
                                         /    \
                                        /    Ferry To
                                       /     Daimyo
                                       |
                                       |
                            +----------+----------+
                            |                     |
                        Elemental Caves           +----- Wolf Kingdom
                       /                          |
                 Berbalang                        |
           Abyss     \                            |
             \        \_Hell                      |
              \                                   |
            Druids --------------------+----------+
               |                       |
       Kitzanti Invasion           La Soudre
                                       |
                                  +-------------------+
                                 /                     \
                                /                       +--+
                      Pirate Ship                           \
                                                             Stone Monkey
                                                                Island
PLEASE NOTE : NOT TO SCALE

See Also: MAP SOUTHWEST NORTHEAST NORTH EAST WEST AREAS
#
NORTHEAST
12345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
         1         2         3         4         5         6         7         8

            +------+                                            N    N
            |      +-+---Brigand Camp     Tarion City           NN   N
          Jal-Pur     \              \          |               N N  N
                       \              \         |               N  N N
        Cavern of    Helventia         +--Tarion Desert         N   NN
        Lost Souls   Mountains---+              |               N    N
             |        /          |              |                 /\
  City of    |      _/           |              |                 ||
 Cornelius---------+         Eryndlyn          / \                ||
                   |                          /   Ancient         ||
                 Moria                       /     Sphinx         ||
                   |                      Great            W <----------> E
         Mystic    |                     Pyramid                  ||
       Monastery   |                                              ||
           |       |                                              ||
           |       |                                              ||
           |       |                                              ||
  Crystal  |       |                                              \/
   Tower --+-------+-----Lorien
                   |                                              S
                   |
                   |
               See EAST

PLEASE NOTE : NOT TO SCALE

See Also: MAP SOUTHWEST SOUTH NORTH EAST WEST AREAS
#
SOUTHWEST
12345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
         1         2         3         4         5         6         7         8

                          See WEST
                             |
                             |
                             |
                        Sea Of Love
                             |
                             |
          Sandy Shore        |
                    \        |             +---------------+
                     +-+     |             |               |
                        \    |             |               |
        Twisted Dwarves--+--Beach----------Ivory Tower     +- Cthorr
                             |                             |
                             |                             |
                             |                          Bluffs
                          +--+
                          |
                      +---+
     Castle of       /
      Cantlin ------+

PLEASE NOTE : NOT TO SCALE

See Also: MAP NORTHEAST SOUTH NORTH EAST WEST AREAS
#
WEST
12345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
         1         2         3         4         5         6         7         8

                    Death's Playground
                             |
 Vermilion's                 |   Keening--Dreadful---Ettin
  Tower                 Haunted            Swamp    Village    Canticle
  |                       House              |                /
  |                   +------+               |               /
  |                   |       \              |          +---/
  |                 Zyca       \     Monks   |          |
 Lost -+-+ Holy    Castle      |   Monestary |        Shire
 World |   Grail            Goblin      |    |          |
       /    |         Elven Caves       |    |          |
   Jungle   \          Town    |        |    |          |
             +            \    +----+---+----+-+--------+---- See MAP
             -+---Sonicity-----|                \
             /       |          \                \
         Chess       |           \               Quickland
        Kingdom      |            \
                     |         Elven Woods
                     |           Village
                   Sea of          |
                    Love       Forbidden
                     |            Maze
               See SOUTHWEST


PLEASE NOTE : NOT TO SCALE

See Also: MAP NORTHEAST SOUTH NORTH EAST SOUTHWEST AREAS
#
EAST
12345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
         1         2         3         4         5         6         7         8

                   See NORTHEAST
                         |
                         |                 Zyekia                Sewers
            Wyvern's     |               /       \_____          /
              Spur       |              /              \        /
                |        |             /               |       |
                |        |          The                |     King
             Graveyard---+          Lands  Golden      |    Welmar's
                         +--Morgoth   |----Plaza       |     Castle
                         |            |                |       |
See MAP -----------------+---------Halfling Village----+-------|
                        /|                             |       |
        Dwarven Kingdom  |                             |       |
                         |                             |       |
          Da'Sharr       |                             |     Golden
           Prison        |  +--- Battlefield           |     Pagoda
               |         |  |                          \
               \         +--+--- Elemental Canyon    Troll Village
 Castle         \        |  |
 Ravenloft    Village    |   \
     |    +---  of   ----+    \
     |    |   Barovia          Fire Newt
     +----+                      Caves


PLEASE NOTE : NOT TO SCALE

See Also: MAP NORTHEAST SOUTH NORTH WEST SOUTHWEST AREAS
#
NORTH
12345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
         1         2         3         4         5         6         7         8


                              Immortal Village
                                      |
                                      |
                                      |
                               Olympus Puzzles
              Demon Invasion          |
                            \         |
                             +-Enchanted Forest
                                      |
                                      |
                                      |
                                      |
                                      |
                                      |
                                      |

                                    See MAP


PLEASE NOTE : NOT TO SCALE

See Also: MAP NORTHEAST SOUTH EAST WEST SOUTHWEST AREAS
#
MAP
12345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890123456789012345678901234567890
         1         2         3         4         5         6         7         8
                                 See NORTH
                                     |
                                Temple Altar                El Museo
                                     |                          |
                 Sprite    Theldon's |                          |
                 Village      Crypt--+                  Ershteep Village
                    |                |                          |
                    |                |                          |
See WEST -----+-----+-------+----- Market ----------------------+--- See EAST
              |             |      Square
              |             |         |
           Griffon          |         |-------+---+
           Village          |         |       |   |
              |             |         |       |   |            Galaxy Lvl 1 & 2
              |             |      Training   |   |                 /
              +--Evil       |       Ground    | Sailor---Ocean     /
                Outpost     |                 |                   /
                            |              Captain               /
                            +--Underworld     |                 /
                            |        |        +---------------Rift
                            |        |        |
                          Zoo    Wasteland   See
                                             SOUTH

PLEASE NOTE : NOT TO SCALE

See Also: NORTH NORTHEAST SOUTH EAST WEST SOUTHWEST AREAS
#
RELOCATION RELOCATE

Usage       : cast 'relocation' <target>
Accumulative: -
Level       : Level 27 mage
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana Cost   : 50

This will allow the caster to magically teleport directly to the person
of their choice.  You cannot relocate to monsters.

See Also: -
#
REBOOT

On Ronin the is a reboot is on a 22 hour schedule.  To see the time
of the next reboot just type TIME.

An Implementor or Supreme level god may also reboot the game at a given
time for various reasons.

See Also: -
#
MEMBERSHIP CLUB

In the town of Midgaard there are five different clubs a player can join to
gain added bonuses to regeneration of hit points and/or mana.  Club Grunting
Boar is a free club for new players up the 20th level.

There are also 4 other clubs one can join for a 500,000 coins fee.

For extra mana bonuses you can join Caster's Fan Club or Azoun's Fan Club.

For extra hit point bonuses you can join NoName's Fan Club or Deathadder's Fan
Club.

See Also: REGENERATION
#
REGENERATION

At every tick, or once per minute, a player recovers a certain percentage
of his/her hit points, mana points, and move points.  The amount of points
recovered depends on the players age and constitution.  Also, if a player
is hungry or thirsty they will not regen as fast as normal.

The maximum amount of mana points a player is able to regenerate while
fighting is dependent on their class, and is capped as follows:

Mage/Cleric - 120/tick with all 3 ranks
Bard/Commando - 100/tick with all 3 ranks
Ninja/Paladin/Anti-Paladin - 90/tick with all 3 ranks

See also: AGE CONSTITUTION MEMBERSHIP CLUB HUNGER THIRST
#
PROMOTE

Once a player obtains a certain amount of EXP and gold coins, he/she may
wish to obtain a rank from the mayor.  To get this rank the player must
approach the mayor and ask him to "PROMOTE" you.

See Also: MAYOR RANKS
#
MAYOR

The Mayor of Midgaard can usually be found in his office, or somewhere
around the town wandering aimlessly.  Those who wish to obtain a rank
from the Mayor, must approach him and ask him to promote them.

See Also: RANKS PROMOTE
#
EMOTE

Usage: emote <action>

Emotes allow you to create various phrases that allows you to express your
player's actions, feelings etc.

See Also: SAY TELL WHISPER SHOUT ASK YELL REPLY
#
BOARDS

The town of Midgaard has various boards for its people.  They include:

A Main Bulletin Board (where various mud functions, ideas, etc are placed)

Adventurer's Boards (where players can talk to each other asking for
assistance, etc)

A Quest Board (where gods post upcoming quest announcements etc.)

An Idea Board (where players can post ideas and suggestions for RoninMUD)

There is also a voting machine, where players can vote for ideas posted
there by other players.

See Also: -
#
"MOVEMENT POINTS"

Movement points are used as the number of places a character can move at
a given time. Usually to move once in any direction takes up one movement
point.  However, if the player is encumbered by being over weight he/she
will lose more points depending on how overweight the character is.

See Also: MANA HP
#
SOLO

There is no official way on Ronin to become a Solo character.  If you
decide to use just one player then you will be considered solo.  Solo
characters get no additional benefits over other players.

See Also: MULTI-PLAY
#
MULTI-PLAY

A person can use up to five characters at one time on Ronin.  Though
there is no limit on the amount of characters you own, you can only play
a maximum of three at one time.  If a sixth character is logged on, it
can only be for a limited time and that person must stay in the
Reception/Vault area, and must only be used for the exchange of
gear and cannot be played.

See Also: SOLO RULES
#
NOMESS DEAF

A character can chose to go "deaf" by typing the command "nomessage".
If a player does this than he/she can no longer receive tells/whispers/asks
from mortal players, nor can they send tells/whispers/asks to other characters.
.
See Also: SAY TELL WHISPER SHOUT ASK YELL REPLY
#
BANK DEPOSIT WITHDRAW BALANCE TELLER AUTOTELLER

Ronin is complete with an Auto Teller Banking system.  A player can
use this to store extra money the player might have and protect his/her
gear from getting lost in rent.

You can put money in your account by using the DEPOSIT <amt>/all command.
To retrieve money from your account you can use the WITHDRAW <amt>/all command.
To see the amount of money in a players account use the BALANCE command.

See Also: MONEY RENT
#
MONEY GOLD COINS

A character can obtain money from killing various monsters in the game.
Some may have money and others may not.  Money can be used to purchase
items from various shopkeepers or from the auction hall.  Players must
have money to "RENT" their equipment.

See Also: RENT AUCTION
#
REAPER

When a character dies the Reaper will appear to escort your soul back to
the land of the living. If a character has natural hit points or mana
points about the 400 mark, then the Reaper may take a toll of this mana
or hit points for returning you back to the land of the living.

See Also: DEATH
#
HUNGER HUNGRY

During certain intervals throughout a day, your character will become
hungry.  It is essential to get some food to eat.  When a player is
hungry he/she will not regenerate as fast as normal, and depending
on age they may actually lose hitpoints, though they will
never die due to hunger.

See Also: THIRST REGENERATION
#
THIRSTY

During certain intervals throughout a day, your character will become
thirsty.   It is essential to get something to drink.  When a player is
thirsty he/she will  not regenerate as fast as normal, and depending on age
they may actually  regenerate backwards, though they will never die due to
thirst.

See Also: HUNGER REGENERATION
#
MIDGAARD TOWN

The town of Midgaard is the place in which every adventurer starts out in and
usually stays.  The town contains an auction hall where equipment is sold,
there are Clubs to join for added regeneration, and there is a donation room to
the west of the temple.  There are various shops where useful items can be
purchased, and there are also various other things in town such as the guild
masters for each class.

See Also: GUILD AUCTION SHOPS CLUBS DONATE
#
PETS

There is a shop located in town that will sell you a pet.  Pets can be grouped
and used as companions to adventure with you.  You can order your pets to do
things for you and they usually prove quite reliable.

See Also: ORDER
#
PETRIFY STONE STATUE

There are certain monsters in the game that may turn a character to stone,
either by will or if the player looks at the monster.  When a player is turned
to stone, his statue will be left in that room and will contain all of the
character's equipment and gold.  Players will not lose stats or exp for being
stoned.

See Also: -
#
REROLL

When a new character reaches level 6, he/she can see their statistics by
typing "SCORE".  If their total statistics are below 55, then they may be
considered for a reroll.  You must ask an ETERNAL, SUPREME or IMPLEMENTOR
to get a reroll.  NOTE: Rerolls are on a case by case basis and may be
refused even if the total amount of statistics is below 55.

See Also: -
#
MOUNT RIDE

At the Midgaard stables, players may purchase a mount of their choice
depending on their alignment and level.  These mounts are useful creatures
that can aid you in fighting monsters.  NOTE: Mounts will take a small amount
of the experience points of the monster killed.

See Also: STABLES
#
USE

Usage: use <item> / use <item> <target>

Use is normally only needed for staff and wands, however in some cases it may
be used by other special items.

See Also: -
#
VANITY CUSTOM-GEAR

If you wish "vanitize" or get custom equipment, it will cost you 50 million
coins per object you wish to get vanitized.  To get a piece of equipment
vanitized you must look for a SUPREME or an IMPLEMENTOR and supply them with
the 50 million coins and the object you wish vanitized and they will be happy
to vanitize it to your person liking.

Items with special procedures may be vanitized for an additional quest token.

Note: renaming an object after it's already been customized is free for two
weeks, and after that costs 10 million coins.

See Also: -
#
RONINMUD

RoninMUD is an exciting MUD with beautifully crafted areas and a lot of fun
things to do.  We are always in the process of improving the MUD, so always
expect new and great things.  To learn more about the MUD, ask an Immortal or
Deputy for assistance, or even ask our friendly players, They would be sure
to help.

See Also: INDEX
#
CORPSE

When a player dies his corpse is left in the room in which the character dies.
All the player's equipment and gold is left in the corpse, therefore someone
must return to the site of death and get the corpse.  If a corpse is donated it
will turn up in the morgue, which is located a couple west from the Temple of
Midgaard.

If a player is under level 10 when he dies, his corpse will automatically go to
the morgue.

See Also: MORGUE DEATH
#
MORGUE

When a corpse is donated, the corpse will go to the morgue.  The morgue is
located two west from the Temple of Midgaard.

See Also: DEATH CORPSE DONATION
#
WEAPONS

A weapon is a very useful thing in RoninMUD.  Weapons usually give good damage
to characters that they don't get with their bare hands.  Therefore weapons are
an excellent addition to fighting the monsters of the land.

See Also: STAFF WAND SCROLL
#
STAFF

Staffs are used usually for room effect spells, the spell depends what charge
the staff has.

Usage: use <staff>

See Also: WAND USE
#
WAND

Wands are normally used to cast the spell that wand has charged into it.  It
can usually be done on other players as well as the person using the wand.

Usage: use <wand> <victim>

See Also: STAFF USE
#
CONCENTRATION

Concentration is determined by how well a player can cast his/her spells without
losing his/her patience and breaking his/her determination.  When concentration
is lost you will lose half of the mana it normally takes to use the spell that
you tried to cast.  Concentration is naturally better for certain classes,
however the higher your intelligence and wisdom, the better you can cast spells.

See Also: INTELLIGENCE WISDOM
#
MOBILES MONSTERS

Mobiles is another name used for monsters.  On the MUD there are many different
mobiles, or mobs, that a player can kill.  Some monsters are good to kill for
experience, or money, or equipment.  To find out where there are good monsters
to kill based on your level, ask an Immortal or a Deputy, and they will be
happy to tell you some good places to look for stuff to kill.

See Also: COMBAT EXPERIENCE MONEY
#
COMBAT BATTLE ATTACK FIGHTING

Combat is one of the most important things on RoninMUD.  Players must learn
that there are various skills depending on classes that can help you out in
battle, as well as various pieces of equipment that will give you an edge in
battle.  Combat is how you earn experience points, gold, and equipment,
depending on what you kill.

See Also: MONSTERS KILL EXP MONEY
#
RECALL

One of the most important things to remember is to always carry a scroll of
recall.  When these scrolls are recited they will magically teleport the player
back to the Temple of Midgaard saving them from death or being lost.  Scrolls
of recall can be purchased at the Wizard's Shop in Midgaard or at other places
throughout the MUD.

See Also: SCROLL RECITE
#
SCROLL

Scrolls are used by being recited.  When the scroll is recited it casts the
spell written on it on the target.  Reciting a scroll can be done on yourself
or on another person.

Self:   recite <scroll>
Other: recite <scroll> <target>

See Also: RECITE
#
SPLIT

Split is a command used with in a group to equally split up a particular
amount of gold to each person in the group.

Usage: split <amount of gold>
       split all.coins

See Also: -
#
SEX

There are two different sexes to choose from on RoninMUD.  There are no
attribute penalties for choosing different sexes, however some items in the
game may be ANTI-MALE or ANTI-FEMALE, meaning one of the sexes may not be able
to wear it.

See Also: MALE, FEMALE
#
MALE

Male is one of the two sexes you can choose a character to become while
creating that character.  There will be no attribute bonus or loss for choosing
a male character, however some items in the game may be ANTI-MALE meaning a
male character cannot use it.

See Also: SEX, FEMALE
#
FEMALE

Female is one of the two sexes you can choose a character to become while
creating that character.  There will be no attribute bonus or loss for choosing
a female character, however some items in the game may be ANTI-FEMALE meaning a
female character cannot use it.

See Also: SEX, MALE
#
FLAGS KILLER THIEF

If a character has a (killer) or (thief) flag in their title, this means that
the character has violated a rule of the MUD and is now being watched over by
the valiant cityguards, and the Jail Master of Midgaard will ensure that he
stays out of town.  It is probably a good idea to stay away from these people.

See Also: RULES
#
TOWN MIDGAARD

Midgaard is a legendary town filled with warm hearty folks.  It is the
Main place of activity on RoninMUD, and is where the various guilds are
Located, as well as the reception, vaults, and Temple.

See Also: RECEPTION, VAULTS
#
HAZARD

If a character enters a HAZARD room, then they have a 50% chance of dying
there.  They may then attempt to retrieve their corpse, however, it is a
Dangerous task.

See Also: "DEATH TRAP", DT
#
DOCTOR HOSPITAL

There is a friendly hospital for low level characters located north, west,
up, from the Market Square in Midgaard. Doctor Naikrovek offers a wide
variety of spells to aid an adventurer for a very small cost.
#
CONTAINER

Container items are a good way to keep your own items organized by placing
them within the container item itself.  These are a good way to keep your
inventory clean!
#
Q-CHANNEL "QUEST CHANNEL"

This is the channel used for those characters who are playing a quest to
communicate with each other, and the person running the quest. This
channel should not be used to other reasons than questing, and please
refrain from using vulgar language on ANY other public channel.

See Also: CHAOS QUEST AUCTION
#
CHANNEL CHANNELS

There are various public channels on RoninMUD to communicate with
Other people.  These include the auction channel, quest channel,
and chaos channel.  For more private conversations use say, tell,
reply, ask, or whisper.  Also, Yell and shout can be used as emergency
channels.

See:  CHAOS, AUCTION, GOSSIP, SAY, TELL, WHISPER, SHOUT, ASK, YELL, REPLY
#
AFK

This is simply a way of telling people you will be "Away from Keyboard".
#
POSE POSES

These are advanced emotes that are randomly shown from a large list.  As your
level increases, the number of poses you can do also increases.

See Also: SOCIAL LIST, EMOTE
#
DRUNK

If a character consumes too much of an alcoholic beverage, he/she will
become drunk.  There are no major affects to being drunk other than
slurred speech, so its not a good idea to drink and chat.
#
CLAN "CLAN LIST" "CLAN ADD" "CLAN STATUS"

For the clans who own a CLAN HALL, they have various commands allowing
Them to keep up-to-date on clan information.

To see a list of members in your clan:
Clan list

To add someone to your clan (can only be done by a clan leader):
Clan add <name>

To remove someone from your clan (can only be done by a clan leader):
Clan add <name> remove

To see some brief information on your clan:
Clan status

See Also: "CLAN HALL" CLANS
#
SAFE

Certain room in RoninMUD are "safe".  This means that no one can hurt
you or steal from you, and vice versa.  These rooms make sure that
nothing is bothered, monsters included.
#
DESCRIPTION

If you wish to write a brief description of your character, simply
type in "description" and you will see a message prompting you to
enter any information you like.  End your message with an @@ sign
and then when people look at you they will see the message.
#
NEWSPAPER

The Ronin newspaper will inform keep you informed on any MUD related
activities, simply locate the paperboy around Midgaard and he will
sell you a paper for a very small fee.
#
ACTIONS

Actions or Triggers are commonly used by players, however, they are not to be
abused.

See: BOTTING
#
SWIM

Ninjas have the unique ability to swim in water under most conditions,
therefore they do not need a boat to cross bodies of water like other
characters.

See Also: NINJA
#
FOOD DRINK

Players must find or purchase food or drink at certain intervals during the
RoninMUD day.  If they do not eat or drink they will suffer minor penalties.

See Also: HUNGER, THIRST
#
TUNNEL

Certain rooms on RoninMUD are tunnels, therefore only one player
character can fit in there at a given time.  It is necessary to
walk one player at a time through these tunnels.
#
SING

Bards have the special ability to sing and entertain their friends
and those around them.  The songs a bard can sing have special
abilities that tend to affect the whole room.

See Also:  BARD SONG
#
FERRY CAPTAIN BOAT

Midgaard runs a very popular ferry service, transporting characters
to many dangerous and intriguing parts of the land.  The captain of
the ship will gladly take you to its various destinations for no
cost at all.  You can wait for the ferry at the Levee in Midgaard
located south, east, east, south from the Market Square.
#
HITROLL

Hitroll will affect a characters ability to hit a monster.  The
higher a characters hitroll is the more often he/she can hit
something, the lower it is, the less chance of hitting.

See Also: DAMROLL
#
DAMROLL

Damroll affects the amount of damage a character can do to a monster upon
successfully landing a hit.  The higher the damroll, the harder the person will
hit the mob, and the lower it is, the less damage he will do.

See Also: HITROLL
#
LIMITED

Items with a LIMITED flag means that this item has certain limitations
such as it cannot be cloned.
#
WALKIN WALKOUT

Certain players have been awarded with a "Walkin/Walkout".  This means
that when they enter or leave a room a certain text will be displayed
about that player.  A Walkin/Walkout is usually given as a quest prize.
#
SCRAPYARD DUMP

The Midgaard Scrapyard is located 2 north and one east from the Temple of
Midgaard.  If you have any old items you want to get rid of simply drop them off
here and they will be disposed of.  Just make sure you only drop the things you
don't want here!  If you drop a corpse in the dump, the corpse (and everything
in it) will be destroyed, and cannot be recovered.
#
ADMINISTRATION ADMIN

These are the gods that are involved in the main functions of RoninMUD.
#
IDLE

The idle time of a player can be seen by using the "whois" command.  This is
the amount of time since the player last sent a command to The MUD.

NOTE: Mortals cannot find out the idle time of gods.
#
VOTE "VOTING MACHINE"

The Voting Machine is located in the Hall of Democracy, which is north, north,
west, and north of Market Square.   Here players can post new ideas that they
would like to see on the MUD, as well as vote for or against ideas that other
players have submitted.
#
SUBCLASS "SUBCLASSES"

Subclasses allow players to specialize in particular
areas for their class.  Depending on the subclass
chosen, extra skills and spells become available to
practice.  All subclass skills/spells must be practiced
in the presence of the appropriate subclass master.

The subclass for each class are as follows.  Type
HELP <subclass name> for further information.

Cleric            DRUID           TEMPLAR
Magic User        ENCHANTER       ARCHMAGE
Thief             ROGUE           BANDIT
Warrior           WARLORD         GLADIATOR
Ninja             RONIN           MYSTIC
Nomad             TRAPPER         RANGER
Paladin           CAVALIER        CRUSADER
Anti-Paladin      DEFILER         INFIDEL
Bard              BLADESINGER     CHANTER
Commando          LEGIONNAIRE     MERCENARY

Each subclass is broken up into 5 levels.  To gain these levels, players must
redeem subclass points.  These points are obtained by various means, and the
number required per level are as follows.

Level       Points
-----       ------
  1            70
  2           140
  3           210
  4           280
  5           350

There is also a main level restriction on the ability to gain subclasses.  A
character must be at least level 30 to obtain the first 2 subclasses, level 40
to obtain the second 2, and level 45 to obtain the last.

To gain a subclass go to your subclass master and
say "choose <subclass name>".

Subclasses are not yet fully implemented and are subject to possible change.
As a result, when there is a major change to a subclass, for a limited time
players will be given the opportunity to switch to or from that subclass
without loss of level.

See Also: "SUBCLASS POINTS" "SUBCLASS MASTERS"
#
"SUBCLASS POINTS"

Subclass points are needed to advance to new subclass levels.  They can be
obtained in a number of ways, and cannot be traded.  The number of points per
level are as follows:

Level       Points
-----       ------
  1            70
  2           140
  3           210
  4           280
  5           350

One way to obtain subclass points is to trade in subclass tokens.

See Also: SUBCLASSES "SUBCLASS TOKENS"
#
"SUBCLASS TOKENS" TOKENS

Subclass tokens can be given to the appropriate subclass master in return for
subclass points.  Tokens can be given away and traded but cannot be rented or
stored.  You must make use of the token before you rent or before there is a
reboot.

Tokens are normally randomly distributed on creatures at the beginning of every
reboot, and redistributed 5 times every 22 hours.  These tokens are unable to
be located by magic or gods. They are found by pure luck.

Every now and then, a creature will be given a token, and the creature will
yell that it has one.  The first character to kill the creature owns the token.

To reimburse a token for subclass points, go to your subclass master and type
one of the following:

give token master / <name of master>
give all.token master / <name of master>
give 5 token master / <name of master>

See Also: SUBCLASSES "SUBCLASS POINTS" "SUBCLASS MASTERS"
#
"SUBCLASS MASTERS" MASTERS

To advance into the subclass specialty and to practice
newly aquired subclass skills and spells, the player must
seek out the appropriate subclass master.

The subclass master for each player class is as follows:

  Class           Master
  ------------    ------------------
  Mage            Sadyra
  Cleric          Felnor
  Thief           Kulzaren
  Warrior         Elven Champion
  Ninja           Brother Kenji
  Nomad           Thrag the Beastman
  Paladin         The Retired Knight
  Anti-Paladin    The Dark Knight
  Bard            The master-singer
  Commando        The Warrior Mage

See Also: SUBCLASSES
#
SCAN
 
Class: Thief (Level 35)
 
This skill allows the character to see who may be in surrounding
rooms.
#
"AWARENESS"

Subclass Warlord: Level 1 (Warrior)
Subclass Ranger: Level 1 (Nomad)

Usage: awareness (toggles on/off)

A competent warrior is always keenly aware of every movement on the battlefield,
taking in every threat and measuring a tactical response.  This constant
alertness heightens the senses of the fighter and drives the rush of adrenaline
pulsing through their veins.

The active component of this subclass level is the Awareness skill, which allows
the Warlord to always get the first hit against an opponent, even if the
attacking creature targets another player.  This action will place the Warlord
in the tank position automatically.  Awareness will only trigger if the Warlord
is not already engaged in combat.  If multiple Warlords are active in the same
room with the Awareness skill enabled, the last Warlord to enter the room will
be the one to take action.  This ability can be toggled on/off.

The success of this skill is increased by the user's Wisdom modifier.

In addition, the Warlord gains a passive boost to their hit point regeneration
rate, which is active at all times.  This increase is equal to two hit points
per warrior class level, adding up to +100 hit point regeneration at level 50.

Warlord subclass level 1 grants the warrior the capability of reaching -260
Armor Class (AC), exceeding the normal limit of -250.

Note: Ranger only gains access to the first component of this subclass level.

See Also: SUBCLASSES WARLORD TANK REGENERATION AC RANGER
#
"PROTECT"

Subclass Warlord: Level 2 (Warrior)
Subclass Ranger: Level 2 (Nomad)

Usage: protect <target/self>

The Warlord gains the Protect skill, which allows them to protect one member
of their group from receiving damage, taking the damage themselves instead.  To
stop protecting someone, choose a different target by using this skill again, or
target yourself to cease protecting anyone.

Additionally, the Warlord can never fail when using the Rescue skill.

Finally, the Warlord receives a bonus Armor Class (AC) multiplier from the
shield equipment slot, increasing it from a normal 2x multiplier to 3x.

Warlord subclass level 2 grants the warrior the capability of reaching -270
Armor Class (AC), exceeding the normal limit of -250.

Note: Ranger and only gains access to the first component of this subclass
level.

See Also: SUBCLASSES WARLORD RESCUE DEXTERITY AC RANGER CRUSADER
#
"IRON FIST"

Subclass Warlord: Level 3 (Warrior)

Years of combat training, and resorting to punching things to resolve most
issues, has transformed the Warlord's fists to an iron hardness.

The Warlord has a 33% chance of inflicting a critical hit upon landing a
successful Punch against an opponent.  This devastating blow will deal double
damage and will send the victim reeling, setting them to the Stunned position.

Additionally, the Warlord gains a +1 bonus to their Block skill for every 5
warrior class levels, up to a +10 bonus at level 50.  The minimum success rate
for a Warlord with Iron Fist is 90%.  This advantage makes it highly unlikely
that a Warlord's opponent can flee from them in combat.

Warlord subclass level 3 grants the warrior the capability of reaching -280
Armor Class (AC), exceeding the normal limit of -250.

See Also: SUBCLASSES WARLORD PUNCH BLOCK AC
#
"JUGGERNAUT"

Subclass Warlord: Level 4 (Warrior)

The Warlord is a force to be reckoned with on the battlefield, a veritable
juggernaut of whirling blades and thick, tank-like armor.

As a passive bonus, the Warlord has their number of successful dual, triple,
and quad attacks increased by up to 15%, based on the Warlord's skill and
Dexterity modifier(s).

Additionally, as a right of initiation into the ranks of the Juggernauts, the
Warlord adorns their armor with jagged spikes, occasionally harming those that
dare get too close.  This passive bonus is active so long as the warrior is
wearing armor.  Damage is dealt whether an attack hits or misses, and the rate
of success of this benefit is increased by the Warlord's Dexterity modifier.

Finally, the Warlord's success rate when using the Kick and Spin Kick skills is
improved, and the input lag from using either skill is reduced to two rounds,
regardless of success or failure.

Warlord subclass level 4 grants the warrior the capability of reaching -290
Armor Class (AC), exceeding the normal limit of -250.

See Also: SUBCLASSES WARLORD DUAL TRIPLE QUAD DEXTERITY SPIN AC
#
"BULWARK"

Subclass Warlord: Level 5 (Warrior)

The weak blows of inferior combatants crash against the Warlord's nearly
impenetrable defenses, glancing off their grand armor and deflected away by
their mighty weapons.

The Warlord gains 1% physical damage reduction for every 3 Armor Class (AC)
point (rounded up) beyond -250, to a maximum of 16.66% at -300.

In addition, the Warlord gains a 1% bonus to their Parry skill for every 5 Armor
Class (AC) point beyond -250, to a maximum of 8.33% at -300.

Warlord subclass level 5 grants the warrior the capability of reaching -300
Armor Class (AC), exceeding the normal limit of -250.

See Also: SUBCLASSES WARLORD PARRY AC
#
BERSERK

Subclass Ranger: Level 4 (Nomad)

While in berserker mode, the Ranger works him/herself into a state
of mind where he/she is completely focused on the fight.  The
Ranger isn't able to flee, protect or rescue but does retain the
ability to dodge.  The greatest benefit is the ability to dual.
The dual success is dependent on how well the skill is practiced.

See Also: SUBCLASSES RANGER
#
DEFEND

Subclass Ranger: Level 5 (Nomad)

While in complete defensive mode, the Ranger or Warlord completely focuses his
mind on the movements of the creatures attacking him. This prevents the
Ranger/Warlord from doing anything but weak hits against the opponent, but
gives him an extra -100 armor and the ability to dodge or parry attacks with
more success.  With defend, the Ranger/Warlord can get up to -300 armor. This
is the ultimate tanking ability.  While fighting, the tank cannot change this
mode.

See Also: SUBCLASSES RANGER WARLORD
#
CAMP

Class: Bard (Level 35)
Subclass Trapper: Level 2 (Nomad)

The Bard and Trapper have the ability to set up a camp with the same
regeneration properties of a resting room.  Characters will still need to
become members of a resting room to receive the benefits of resting in a camp.

A camp cannot be set up in a room with a potentially deadly monster.

See Also: BARD SUBCLASSES TRAPPER
#
BATTER

Subclass Trapper: Level 3 (Nomad)

Usage: batter <victim>

The Trapper can use his/her fists in rapid succession
to pound on the victim.  This skill can deal upwards
of 2*Trapper level in damage.  After using this skill,
the Trapper has to wait two rounds of violence.

See Also: SUBCLASSES TRAPPER
#
FRENZY

Subclass Trapper: Level 5 (Nomad)

The Trapper can work him/herself into a frenzy, focusing all
efforts on hitting the creature over and over as hard and
as fast as possible.  Of course, while in this state of
mind, the Trapper cannot possibly rescue, dodge, flee, or
do other defensive skills and may miss a little more often.

The inability to dodge makes this skill much less defensive
than the comparable Ranger subclass skill of berserk.  However,
the benefits of getting 1.5x damage for every hit, and the
possibility of a dual now and then make up for the reduction
in defense.

See Also: SUBCLASSES TRAPPER BERSERK
#
TRAPPER

Trapper is one of the Nomad subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the Trapper receives a
new or improved skill.  For help on each skill, just type
HELP <name of skill>

Level         Skill
  1           SCAN
  2           CAMP
  3           BATTER
  4           TROPHY
  5           FRENZY

See Also: SUBCLASSES RANGER NOMAD
#
RANGER

Ranger is one of the Nomad subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the Ranger receives a
new or improved skill.  For help on each skill, just type
HELP <name of skill>

Level         Skill
  1           AWARENESS
  2           PROTECT
  3           BLOCK
  4           BERSERK
  5           DEFEND

See Also: SUBCLASSES TRAPPER NOMAD
#
"HIDDEN BLADE"

Class: Anti-Paladin (Level 40)

On a successful Pummel, the Anti-Paladin has a chance to stab the target with a
hidden blade.  This automatic action inflicts damage equal to twice the
Anti-Paladin's level (up to 100 at level 50).

The success of Hidden Blade is dependent on how well the skill is practiced and
is affected by the character's dexterity modifier.  The maximum success rate
before the dexterity modifier is applied is 25%.

See Also: ANTI-PALADIN PUMMEL DEXTERITY
#
ASSASSINATE

Class: Anti-Paladin (Level 45)

Usage: assassinate <victim> <direction>

This attack is used to quickly sneak into a room and perform a backstab attack
on an unsuspecting victim.  An aggressive victim doesn't have a chance to
attack first.

The Anti-Paladin must be sneaking, or invisible, to use this attack and the
success is dependent on how well the skill is practiced and the character's
dexterity.

This skill also allows a sufficiently hidden, or invisible, Anti-Paladin to use
the Backstab skill against a victim already in combat.

See Also: BACKSTAB DEXTERITY
#
RAGE

Usage       : cast 'rage' (self only)
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 5
Level       : Level 50 Anti-Paladin
Mana Cost   : 130

This spell is similar to the Paladin's Fury spell.  It grants the Anti-Paladin a
damage multiplier on every hit.  However, while Fury gives a 2x multiplier, Rage
gives a multiplier of 1.5x.  Also, unlike Fury, there is only a 50% chance that
an attack against a creature or player affected by Rage will be automatically
hit.

Rage also automatically applies the effects of the Blood Lust spell when
successfully cast by Anti-Paladin characters.

See Also: SUBCLASSES INFIDEL FURY "BLOOD LUST"
#
DEFILER

Defiler is one of the Anti-Paladin subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the Defiler receives a
new or improved skill or spell.  For help on each skill
or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           DESECRATE
  2           BLACKMANTLE
  3           FEINT
  4           SHADOWSTEP
  5           BATHED IN BLOOD

See Also: SUBCLASSES INFIDEL ANTI-PALADIN
#
DESECRATE

Subclass Defiler: Level 1 (Anti-Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'desecrate' <corpse>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 7
Save        : None
Mana Cost   : 70

With this spell, the Defiler does the vilest thing imaginable with the corpse,
desecrating it in horrific ways.

This spell grants the Defiler a hit point regeneration bonus equal the level of
the creature the corpse came from, and an armor bonus equal to half of its
level.

While affected by Desecrate, the Defiler's Vampiric Touch spell will inflict and
drain 10% more damage.  Additionally, the damage and drains inflicted by the
Blood Lust spell is also increased by 10%.

As an added bonus, the Defiler's Spirit Levy spell will restore up to 50% more
hit points per cast.  This effect is active even when Desecrate is not.

This spell will destroy the corpse and anything within it.

When cast upon the corpse of a creature with a level of no less than 10 levels
below the caster, this spell will increase the blood level of the room by one.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DEFILER "VAMPIRIC TOUCH" "BLOOD LUST" "SPIRIT LEVY"
          "BLOOD LEVEL"
#
BLACKMANTLE

Subclass Defiler: Level 2 (Anti-Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'blackmantle' (self only)
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 9
Mana Cost   : 70

While affected by this spell, up to 10% of all physical attack damage
is reflected back to the attacker.  The Defiler cannot reflect more
damage per attack reflected than he/she could inflict in one hit.

Additionally, the Defiler's chance to automatically be hit while
affected by the Rage spell is reduced from 50% to 20%.

A Defiler that has learned the Assassinate skill can Backstab a
victim already in combat, as if he/she could not be seen, when
surrounded by this mantle of darkness.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DEFILER RAGE ASSASSINATE BACKSTAB
#
FEINT

Subclass Defiler: Level 3 (Anti-Paladin)

This passive ability will allow the Defiler to occasionally perform a
fake attack against an opponent. This will prevent the opponent from
landing an attack against the Defiler. In addition, the Defiler will
make a doubled attack back against his/her opponent, exploiting the
opponent's miss.

When not tanking, the Defiler will have a chance of triggering an extra
doubled hit when their normal attack is avoided.

The success of this skill is based on how well it is practiced, and
the character's dexterity.

This is an automatic skill and is always in effect.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DEFILER
#
SHADOWSTEP

Subclass Defiler: Level 4 (Anti-Paladin)

Usage: shadowstep (toggles on/off)

The Defiler will occasionally step into the shadows during combat, only to
re-appear behind his/her victim.  The Defiler will attempt to stab the victim in
the back for increased damage.  The success and damage output of the skill
varies depending on a number of factors.

A Defiler that cannot be seen by his/her victim receives a benefit, as does one
affected by the Blackmantle spell.  A Defiler fighting in a dark room, or during
the night time will have an increased chance of success, and the skill will
inflict more damage.  Likewise, a Defiler attacking a victim outside during the
day, or in a lit room will have a reduced chance of success, and the skill will
inflict less damage.  Defilers with a non-evil alignment have a slightly lower
chance of triggering these automatic attacks.

The amount of damage inflicted ranges from 1.0x a normal hit for the least
favorable conditions, to 2.5x a normal hit for the most favorable.

The success of this skill is based on how well it is practiced, and the
character's dexterity.

The use of this skill is automatic and can be toggled on or off.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DEFILER BLACKMANTLE
#
"BATHED IN BLOOD"

Subclass Defiler: Level 5 (Anti-Paladin)

The Defiler's sinister powers surge in the presence of fresh blood, making
them stronger and granting them supernatural powers.

The blood level of the room will increase by one under the following conditions:

- When the spells Spirit Levy and Desecrate are cast upon the corpse of a
creature with a level of no less than 10 levels below the caster; 100% chance.
- When a victim is bitten by a character affected by Blood Lust; 20% chance.
- When a Defiler with the Bathed in Blood subclass ability uses the Backstab
skill against an opponent successfully; 20% chance.

The Defiler gains a health and mana regeneration bonus of 20% for each level of
blood in the room.  This bonus has a maximum of 100% additional regeneration.

Additionally, when the Defiler is affected by the Blood Lust spell, its effects
will trigger 5% more frequently.  For each level of blood in the room above
zero, this bonus increases by 1%, up to 15% total at the maximum blood level of
ten.

Also, the Defiler's Backstab skill has a 10% chance on success to trigger a
Vampiric Touch cast automatically at the target, with zero mana cost, with a 1%
chance increase for each blood level in the room, to a maximum of 20% chance.

Finally, the damage inflicted by Shadowstep attacks is increased to a minumum of
1.5x a normal hit for the least favorable conditions, to 3.0x a normal hit for
the most favorable.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DEFILER BACKSTAB "BLOOD LEVEL" "BLOOD LUST"
          "VAMPIRIC TOUCH" SHADOWSTEP
#
INFIDEL

Infidel is one of the Anti-Paladin subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the Infidel receives a
new or improved skill or spell.  For help on each skill
or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           DARK PACT
  2           VICTIMIZE
  3           SHADOW WRAITH (1st and 2nd Shadow Wraith)
  4           DUSK REQUIEM  (3rd Shadow Wraith)
  5           WITHER        (4th Shadow Wraith)

See Also: SUBCLASSES DEFILER ANTI-PALADIN
#
"DARK PACT"

Subclass Infidel: Level 1 (Anti-Paladin)

The Infidel makes a deal with some dark entity, trading a portion of their soul
in exchange for supernatural powers.

After making this pact, the Infidel no longer requires food or drink to sustain
themselves.  Additionally, he/she always regenerates hit points, mana, and
movement points at an optimal rate, regardless of age.  Finally, the Infidel's
regeneration rates are increased at all times, and are further increased during
the night, or in a dark room.

This weakening of the Infidel's soul makes them even more vicious and
remorseless than before the pact was made.  They will more willingly (and
successfully) backstab their victims, and will carry out assassination attacks
with particular cunning and cruelty.

This is an automatic skill and is always in effect.

See Also: SUBCLASSES INFIDEL FOOD DRINK HUNGER THIRST AGE REGENERATION
#
VICTIMIZE

Subclass Infidel: Level 2 (Anti-Paladin)

Usage: victimize (toggles on/off)

During combat, the Infidel will randomly assault his/her victim with cruel
attacks and depraved remarks.  This victimization will take its toll on the
target, inflicting random status ailments, such as penalties to armor class,
hitroll and damroll.

The armor class penalty shall be 1/4 the Infidel's level.  The hitroll penalty
shall be a random number between 3 and 5.  The damroll penalty shall be a random
percentage of the victim's damroll, between 5% and 10%; however, the damroll
penalty will never decrease a victim's base bare-hand or weapon-based damage.
If the target has no bonus damroll, the hitroll penalty option shall be used
instead.

The duration of these effects, and the subsequent re-application of another
random effect is 1 tick (re-application is attempted every combat round, but
will only succeed if the target is not already affected by Victimize).  The
effects are non-cumulative.  Multiple Infidels can apply penalties, but only
penalties of different types, as penalty types do not stack.

An Infidel that has a good alignment is unable to utilize this skill.

The use of this skill is automatic and can be toggled on or off.

See Also: SUBCLASSES INFIDEL "ARMOR CLASS" HITROLL DAMROLL TICK
#
"SHADOW WRAITH"

Subclass Infidel: Level 3 (Anti-Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'shadow wraith' (self only)
Accumulative: Yes (up to 4 shadows at Subclass Level 5)
Duration    : 10 / shadow
Mana Cost   : 100 (1st Shadow) / 120 (2nd) / 140 (3rd) / 160 (4th)

The Infidel can manifest shadow wraiths by harnessing their own dark energy.

These wraiths attack the Infidel's target automatically, dealing a variable
amount of damage, based on that of the caster's normal attack damage, expressed
here as [damage].  The amount dealt varies from [damage / 6] to [damage / 2].
Shadow damage is improved by either Rage or Fury, with the most effective spell
being applied.

Up to 2 shadows may be created at Infidel subclass level 3.  A 3rd shadow may be
created at subclass level 4, and a 4th at subclass level 5.

The mana cost of casting Shadow Wraith increases by 20 mana for each shadow that
is created.  That is, the 1st shadow costs 100 mana, the 2nd costs 120 mana, the
3rd costs 140 mana, and the 4th costs 160 mana.

See Also: SUBCLASSES INFIDEL RAGE FURY
#
"DUSK REQUIEM"

Subclass Infidel: Level 4 (Anti-Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'dusk requiem' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : None
Mana Cost   : 20

The Infidel may "collapse" a shadow wraith, expending its existence to inflict
massive damage against a foe.

Casting Dusk Requiem immediately destroys the most recently cast Shadow Wraith,
inflicting damage equal to 350 x the number of shadows the Infidel controls when
this spell is cast.  For example, if the Infidel controls four shadows, this
spell will inflict 1400 damage to the target.

Additionally, if a shadow's duration expires while the Infidel is engaged in
combat, this spell is automatically cast with zero mana cost, inflicting double
damage.

Finally, if a shadow's duration expires outside of combat, the Infidel gains hit
points and mana equal to half the mana cost of the shadow that is expiring.  For
example, if the Infidel controls four shadows, this effect will grant 80 hit
points and 80 mana when the 4th shadow's duration expires.

See Also: SUBCLASSES INFIDEL "SHADOW WRAITH"
#
WITHER

Subclass Infidel: Level 5 (Anti-Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'wither' <victim>
Accumulative: Yes
Duration    : Instantaneous / ~ 40 seconds (DoT) / Special (Negative Effects)
Save        : None vs. Damage / Negates (Negative Effects)
Mana Cost   : 75
Damage Done : 350 / Special

Wither is a spell that desiccates the victim, inflicting harm, and weakening it.

This powerful spell deals damage to the target instantly, applies a damage
over time (DoT) effect, and has a chance to affect the target with lasting
afflictions.

The damage over time effect is 75 damage inflicted approximately every 10
seconds, for a duration of 40 seconds.  Multiple casts of Wither will refresh
the damage over time effect to its maximum duration.

This spell also applies a random effect to the target from the following list of
negative conditions: blindness, chill touch, curse, paralysis or poison.

Each effect is subject to its own saving throw.  There is a 25% chance that a
second effect will be applied, or the same effect will be attempted again if the
target made its saving throw.  Blindness has a duration of 2, chill touch has a
duration of 6, and curse, paralysis and poison each have a duration equal to the
level of the caster.

If the target is immune to the chosen effect, the spell deals an additional 50
damage instead.  Similarly, if all of the effects are already present on the
target, Wither deals an additional 100 damage instead of applying a negative
effect.

See Also: SUBCLASSES INFIDEL BLINDNESS "CHILL TOUCH" CURSE PARALYSIS POISON
#
"DEMONIC THUNDER"

Usage       : cast 'demonic thunder' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous (Damage) / 7 days (Curse)
Save        : None (Damage) / Versus spell negates (Curse)
Mana Cost   : 100

The this spell summons the sounds of the souls of the damned and focuses them on
the victim.  The result is a huge thunder of sound that cannot be resisted,
dealing a full 500 damage to the victim.

This spell also will curse the victim on a failed saving throw vs. spell.

See Also: CURSE
#
"BLADE BARRIER"

Subclass Enchanter: Level 1 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'blade barrier' (self only)
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 5
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 50

The Enchanter produces a magic shield which has the ability to reflect up to
25% of all hit type damage.  The Enchanter cannot reflect more damage than
he/she could do in one hit.  This can be an extremely powerful protection
as well as a useful offensive ability.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ENCHANTER
#
METEOR

Subclass Archmage: Level 1 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'meteor' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 5

While this spell does only gives 60 damage to the
victim, its low mana cost makes it the largest
damage/mana ratio spells in existence.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ARCHMAGE
#
"WRATH OF ANCIENTS"

Subclass Archmage: Level 4 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'wrath of ancients' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 250

This powerhouse spell delivers an enormous amount of
damage in one cast.  Anywhere from 1800 to 2000 damage
can be expected making this the perfect spell that
helps to quickly dispatch creatures.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ARCHMAGE
#
DISTORTION

Subclass Archmage: Level 5 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'distortion' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 2
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 100

This spell weakens the victim's magic sphere allowing at least 1/2 of all spell
damage to get through.  When used in conjunction with high damage spells, most
creatures don't live long.

NOTE: Distortion can be cast regardless of the victim's level.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ARCHMAGE
#
"ORB OF PROTECTION"

Subclass Archmage: Level 2 (Mage)
Subclass Templar: Level 4 (Cleric)

Usage       : cast 'orb of protection' (self only)
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 10
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 50

This is the ultimate spell to prevent an Archmage's or Templar's untimely death
due to low hit points.  While protected by this spell and taking damage, the
Archmage's/Templar's hit points will only be able to go as low as 200.  Then,
instead of removing hit points for damage, the Archmage's/Templar's mana will
be removed at a rate of 1 mana point for every 2 damage taken.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ARCHMAGE TEMPLAR
#
"FROST BOLT"

Subclass Archmage: Level 3 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'frost bolt' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 50
Damage      : 350

This spell is similar to iceball, but the damage to casting cost ratio is much
higher, making it a very mana-efficient attack spell.  A victim hit with Frost
Bolt has their movement points reduced by 100.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ARCHMAGE
#
ENGAGE

Subclass Enchanter: Level 3 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'engage' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 40

This battle-starting spell causes the Enchanter to deal 5x his hit damage in
the first hit.  The Enchanter's weapon will also have a better chance of
specing.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ENCHANTER
#
"DISRUPT SANCTUARY"

Subclass Enchanter: Level 5 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'disrupt sanctuary' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 0-57 seconds (depends on timing)
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 250

This spell temporarily removes the victim's sanctuary, allowing the entire
group to deal full damage for the duration.  It can be cast on any victim but
has a certain degree of failure.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ENCHANTER
#
"ETHEREAL NATURE"

Subclass Enchanter: Level 4 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'ethereal nature' (self only)
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 30 ticks (only 1st tick is effective)
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 100

While affected by this spell, the Enchanter is not completely within the
physical plane of existence and therefore can not receive any physical damage.
However, the Enchanter can be damaged by spells and other special attacks.
Conversely, the Enchanter can not inflict any physical damage while in this
state and must depend on attack spells to kill.  It takes the Enchanter great
effort to maintain this form and as a result can only cast ethereal nature once
every 30 ticks.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ENCHANTER
#
ENCHANTER

Enchanter is one of the Mage subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At
each level, the Enchanter receives a new or improved spell.  For help on each
spell, just type HELP <spell name>

Level         Spell
  1           BLADE BARRIER
  2           PASSDOOR
  3           ENGAGE
  4           ETHEREAL NATURE
  5           DISRUPT SANCTUARY

See Also: SUBCLASSES ARCHMAGE MAGE
#
ARCHMAGE

Archmage is one of the Mage subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At each
level, the Archmage receives a new or improved spell.  For help on each spell,
just type HELP <spell name>

Level         Spell
  1           METEOR
  2           ORB OF PROTECTION
  3           FROST BOLT
  4           WRATH OF ANCIENTS
  5           DISTORTION

See Also: SUBCLASSES ENCHANTER MAGE
#
PASSDOOR

Subclass Enchanter: Level 2 (Mage)

Usage       : cast 'passdoor' <direction>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 50

This spell allows the Enchanter to pass through any closed
door, regardless of its locked state.  Passing through a
physical barrier does however weaken the Enchanter, leaving
him/her stunned for 2 rounds.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ENCHANTER
#
ROGUE

Rogue is one of the Thief subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the rogue receives a
new or improved skill.  For help on each skill, just type
HELP <name of skill>

Level         Skill
  1           DIRTY TRICKS
  2           TROPHY
  3           VEHEMENCE
  4           TRIP
  5           QUICK RECOVERY

See Also: SUBCLASSES BANDIT THIEF
#
"DIRTY TRICKS"

Subclass Rogue: Level 1 (Thief)

Usage: dirty-tricks (toggles on/off)

When active, this skill is used automatically during combat.  Randomly
throught out each fight, the Rogue does things like throwing dirt in
the victim's eyes for blindness, kicking in sensitive areas to knock
them to the ground, and inflicting grievous wounds that cause them to
bleed profusely, causing damage over time.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ROGUE BLINDNESS
#
TROPHY

Subclass Rogue: Level 2 (Thief)
Subclass Trapper: Level 4 (Nomad)

Trophy is a group buff skill.  Creating a trophy inspires the group at a cost of
10 mana per character that will receive a benefit.  If the Rogue or Trapper does
not have enough mana, players will receive the benefit from the "top down" of
the party list, with the Rogue or Trapper always first until their mana is below
10.  The benefits gained from the trophy effect are +2 hitroll and +2 damroll,
and the duration of the effect is 10 ticks.  This skill causes a 1 round skill
lag when used.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ROGUE TRAPPER HITROLL DAMROLL
#
VEHEMENCE

Subclass Rogue: Level 3 (Thief)

Usage: vehemence (toggles on/off)

When affected by Vehemence, the Rogue gains a skill bonus of (5 + 1/2 dexterity
modifier) to all of their skill checks.  When in this state, the Rogue suffers
from an increase of 10% damage received, due to their reckless abandon.  If the
Rogue is in combat, this skill cannot be toggled on or off.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ROGUE DODGE
#
TRIP

Subclass Rogue: Level 4 (Thief)

Usage: trip (toggles on/off)

When active and using Circle against an opponent, the Rogue has a chance to
follow up their attack by tripping the victim, knocking them to the ground into
a stunned position.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ROGUE
#
"QUICK RECOVERY"

Subclass Rogue: Level 5 (Thief)

Once the Rogue reaches this subclass level, they have a chance of
being affected by 1 less round of lag on all skills.  The chance of
receiving the reduction varies from 50% to 75%, and is not modified by
any skill or attribute.

This is an automatic skill and is always in effect.

See Also: SUBCLASSES ROGUE
#
BANDIT

Bandit is one of the Thief subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the bandit receives a
new or improved skill.  For help on each skill, just type
HELP <name of skill>

Level         Skill
  1           IMPAIR
  2           FADE
  3           ADRENALINE RUSH
  4           CLOSE COMBAT
  5           EVASION

See Also: SUBCLASSES ROGUE THIEF
#
IMPAIR

Subclass Bandit: Level 1 (Thief)

This skill gives the Bandit a chance to automatically apply a debuff to their
target when using the Backstab and Circle skills.

When using Backstab, there is a chance that the target will be paralyzed and
unable to move for a duration of 2 ticks.  When using Circle, there is a chance
that the target will be dazed, causing them to receive a 30 point penalty to
their AC and -2 penalty to their hitroll.

This is an automatic skill and is always in effect.

See also: SUBCLASSES BANDIT AC HITROLL
#
FADE

Subclass Bandit: Level 2 (Thief)

Fade allows the Bandit to blend in with their surroundings, making their actions
more difficult to predict.  Fade grants a bonus to Dodge equal to (level * 1.5)
at all times.  When not being attacked directly the Bandit gains +10 bonus to
their Circle skill check.

Fade is an automatic skill and is always active.

See also: SUBCLASSES BANDIT DODGE CIRCLE
#
"ADRENALINE RUSH"

Subclass Bandit: Level 3 (Thief)

When affected by healing magic, the Bandit will have the amount of healing
received increased by 10% to 15%.

In addition, the Bandit has an increased health and mana regeneration rate when
engaged in combat.  The regeneration rate is equal to (level / 5) for hit
points and (level / 15) for mana points, and these points are gained every 10
seconds.

See Also: SUBCLASSES BANDIT
#
"CLOSE COMBAT"

Subclass Bandit: Level 4 (Thief)

The Bandit benefits from an increased combat awareness, granting them a passive
bonus of +2 hitroll and +2 damroll.  After a successful Backstab or Circle
attack, the Bandit has a 50% + dexterity modifier chance of increasing this
bonus to a total +5 hitroll and +5 damroll for a duration of 3 combat rounds.

After the Bandit successfully dodges an attack, they are granted a bonus of -10
AC for a duration of 3 combat rounds.  This AC benefit can stack twice to a
maximum of -20 AC.  This benefit allows the Bandit's AC to temporarily exceed
the normal maximum of -250 AC, to a limit of -270 AC with two stacks.

This is an automatic skill and is always in effect.

See Also: SUBCLASSES BANDIT
#
EVASION

Subclass Bandit: Level 5 (Thief)
Class: Nomad (Level 50)

Usage: evasion (toggles on/off)

When the Bandit/Nomad is in this protective postion, all damage inflicted by
physical attacks (bare hand attacks, weapon attacks, and skills) will be
reduced by 25%.

Unfortunately, since the Bandit/Nomad is so intent on protecting themselves,
they will miss more often.  If the Bandit is in combat, this skill cannot be
toggled on or off.

See Also: SUBCLASSES BANDIT NOMAD
#
GLADIATOR

Gladiator is one of the Warrior subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At
each level, the gladiator receives a new or improved skill.  For help on each
skill, just type HELP <name of skill>

Level         Skill
  1           FLANK
  2           TACTICIAN
  3           MAIM
  4           HEADBUTT
  5           HOSTILE

See Also: SUBCLASSES WARLORD WARRIOR
#
WARLORD

Warlord is one of the Warrior subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At
each level, the warlord receives a new or improved skill.  For help on each
skill, just type HELP <name of skill>

Level         Skill
  1           AWARENESS
  2           PROTECT
  3           IRON FIST
  4           JUGGERNAUT
  5           BULWARK

See Also: SUBCLASSES GLADIATOR WARRIOR
#
FLANK

Subclass Gladiator: Level 1 (Warrior)

Usage: flank <victim>

Gladiators are trained in the Arena, their battle skills honed through countless
battles against overwhelming odds.  This training has given the Gladiator the
insight to pick the right moment to attack their opponents, giving them an edge
in combat.

The Gladiator can attempt to flank their opponent when engaging in battle.  This
skill can be used to initiate or join combat.  Flank grants a damage multiplier
on the Gladiator's first hit equal to (level / 10).  For example, a level 50
Gladiator would gain a multiplier of 5x on their first hit.  This ability also
allows for dual/triple/quad hits, as would normally be attempted during a melee
attack.  A weapon is required.

Flank can also be used to switch targets during combat, allowing the Gladiator
to redirect their attacks at a new opponent.  While this allows them to attack
a new target, they will continue to be attacked by anything that was attacking
them previously.  When used in such a way, Flank does not deal increased damage
(no additional multiplier is applied).

The Gladiator will experience 2 rounds of input lag after using Flank,
regardless of success or failure.

The success of this skill is based on how well it is practiced, and the user's
Dexterity modifier.

See Also: SUBCLASSES GLADIATOR DUAL TRIPLE QUAD PRACTICE DEXTERITY
#
DISEMBOWEL

Class: Warrior (Level 40) Nomad (Level 40)

Usage: disembowel <victim>

Disembowel is a vicious attack that deals a single melee hit against the target,
multiplied by between the user's level divided by 10, up to to their level
divided by 5 (between a 5x to a 10x multiplier at level 50).

This attack can only be successful when performed against a target that is
close to death (30% hit points remaining, or less), or if the damage would cause
the victim to die in one strike.  This ability is similar to Backstab, but is
used at the end of combat, instead of the beginning.

The user will experience 3 rounds of input lag after using Disembowel,
regardless of success or failure.

The success of this skill is based on how well it is practiced, and the user's
Dexterity modifier.

See Also: NOMAD PRACTICE DEXTERITY
#
TACTICIAN

Subclass Gladiator: Level 2 (Warrior)

A measured tactical response is often the key factor separating victory and
defeat, even among warriors of disparate physical abilities.  A seasoned
Gladiator observes their opponent, waiting for the right moment to dodge out
of the way, or to strike back after a reckless blow.

This ability makes the Gladiator immune to disarm attempts made by all players,
and by all but the most cunning of creatures.

Additionally, the Gladiator has a chance to avoid the following "mob attacks"
entirely when they would otherwise hit: Kick, Pummel, Punch, Bite, Claw, Bash,
Tailslam, Disarm, and Trample.  After avoiding such an attack, the Gladiator has
a chance to strike back at their opponent with a free melee attack.

Finally, when a Gladiator fails to avoid such an attack, the input lag inflicted
by the impending blow is reduced by one round, to a minimum of zero.

See Also: SUBCLASSES GLADIATOR DISARM
#
MAIM

Subclass Gladiator: Level 3 (Warrior)

Maim applies a debuff to the target of the Gladiator's Flank attack.  This
debuff will cause the target to take extra damage equal to 1/4 the Gladiator's
class level, rounded down, (12 damage at lvl 48+) after being hit by a
successful physical attack skill (pummel, punch, etc.).  This bonus damage is
applied separately from the damage inflicted by the triggering skill and
cannot be increased (such as by position, spell effects like Fury, etc.).
Smite and Zeal will also trigger this bonus damage.  Other bonus attacks that
are triggered by skills (such as Hidden Blade and Trusty Steed, etc.) do not
cause extra damage from the Maim effect (e.g. they do not "double dip").  This
damage is subject to normal physical damage resistance or immunity.  The Maim
effect lasts until the affected creature dies.

See Also: SUBCLASSES GLADIATOR
#
HEADBUTT

Subclass Gladiator: Level 4 (Warrior)

Usage: headbutt <victim>

Nobody would accuse a Gladiator of being overly cerebral, but it is often said
that they use their heads to solve problems.  Nothing could be more true when it
comes to the technique utilized by the Headbutt skill.  By slamming their thick
skulls into their opponents, they can deal a significant amount of damage.

This attack will deal 200 damage to the victim in a single motion and will also
place them into the Stunned position.

The Gladiator will experience 2 rounds of input lag after an attempted Headbutt,
their vision left spinning from the effort.

The success of this skill is based on how well it is practiced, and the user's
Dexterity modifier.

See Also: SUBCLASSES GLADIATOR PRACTICE DEXTERITY
#
HOSTILE

Subclass Gladiator: Level 5 (Warrior)

Usage: hostile (toggles on/off)

Once a Gladiator has set them selves into motion, they are driven with a single
thought in mind: to win.  This devotion to success at any cost makes them a
dangerous, but sometimes reckless foe upon the battlefield.

When affected by the Hostile skill, the Gladiator has their number of successful
dual, triple, and quad attacks increased by up to 40%, based on the Gladiator's
skill and Dexterity modifier(s).

Because the Gladiator is so intent on hitting their opponent, they forgo their
normal defensive capabilities.  This will cause their opponent to never miss a
melee attack, regardless of the Gladiator's Armor Class (AC) or their Parry
skill.

Hostile prevents the Gladiator from using the Rescue skill when it is enabled.

Hostile can be toggled on/off, but cannot be toggled during combat.

See Also: SUBCLASSES GLADIATOR DUAL TRIPLE QUAD DEXTERITY AC RESCUE
#
MERCENARY

Mercenary is one of the Commando subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the Mercenary receives a
new or improved skill or spell.  For help on each skill
or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           TREMOR
  2           CLOUD OF CONFUSION
  3           RIPOSTE
  4           INCENDIARY CLOUD
  5           SIDEARM

See Also: SUBCLASSES LEGIONNAIRE COMMANDO
#
LEGIONNAIRE

Legionnaire is one of the Commando subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the Legionnaire receives a
new or improved skill or spell.  For help on each skill
or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           LUNGE
  2           RIMEFANG
  3           CLOBBER
  4           DEVASTATION
  5           SNIPE

See Also: SUBCLASSES MERCENARY COMMANDO
#
LUNGE

Subclass Legionnaire: Level 1 (Commando)

Usage: lunge <target>

With this skill, the Legionnaire can lunge at their target to start
or join a fight, dealing 25% more damage than an Assault.  The user
will experience 2 rounds of lag, and the success of the lunge is
dependent on how well the skill is practiced.

The success of this skill is based on how well it is practiced, and
the character's Dexterity.

Note: A weapon is required.

See Also: SUBCLASSES LEGIONNAIRE
#
RIMEFANG

Subclass Legionnaire: Level 2 (Commando)

Usage       : cast 'rimefang'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : -
Save        : Save vs. Paralysis: Negates Paralysis
Mana Cost   : 115
Damage      : (5 to 7) * (caster level) (up to 350 at level 50)

This extremely powerful room attack spell can cause serious damage to anything
in the immediate vicinity.  This spell also has a higher than normal chance to
paralyze those hit by it, as compared to the Paralyze spell.

Rimefang deals (level / 2 to level) additional damage at night or during the
winter, and (level to level * 2) damage on a cold winter's eve.  After a
creature has been damaged by Rimefang, it gains a 10 point penalty to its saving
throws vs. spells for a duration of 20 rounds (60 seconds, or 1 tick); this
penalty can be refreshed by additional casts of Rimefang, but does not stack
with itself.

See Also: SUBCLASSES LEGIONNAIRE
#
CLOBBER

Subclass Legionnaire: Level 3 (Commando)

Usage: clobber <target>

The Legionnaire will attempt to strike an opponent with a devastating blow.  The
damage dealt by this skill is equal to one to four times the user's level.

Additionally, this skill will stun, incapacitate, or even mortally wound a
target, making the next attack made against the target much more effective.
The chance for each position is 50%, 30%, and 20% respectively. The user will
experience two rounds of lag after use.

Clobber pierces through the powerful shielding granted by Invulnerability.

The success of this skill is based on how well it is practiced, and the
character's Dexterity modifier.

Note: The 'stun' effect of this skill will not bring the opponent down below 0
hit points if it knocks them to mortally wounded, it will merely put them in the
mortally wounded position, making them temporarily rather defenseless.

See Also: SUBCLASSES LEGIONNAIRE
#
DEVASTATION

Subclass Legionnaire: Level 4 (Commando)

Usage       : cast 'devastation' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 150
Damage      : 1000

This powerful spell is nearly as mana efficient as Frost Bolt, while being
more time efficient.

See Also: SUBCLASSES LEGIONNAIRE
#
SNIPE

Subclass Legionnaire: Level 5 (Commando)

Usage: snipe (toggles on/off)

The Legionnaire has honed their combat skills to near perfection.  When engaged
in combat with an enemy that is in a weakened state (near death), the commando
will automatically attempt to snipe their opponent with a deadly attack.  This
attack inflicts 15 to 25 times the commando's class level, for a minimum of 750
damage, and a maximum of 1250 damage at level 50.  This attack is automatic and
is attempted approximately every 10 seconds.  Its chance of success is based on
the target's remaining hit points, with a more wounded target being more prone
to being sniped.  Snipe can only trigger once per 10 combat rounds on the same
creature.  Multiple Legionnaires can Snipe the same creature, but only one time
each within the 10 round window.

See Also: SUBCLASSES LEGIONNAIRE
#
TREMOR

Subclass Mercenary: Level 1 (Commando)

Usage       : cast 'tremor'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 130
Damage      : 400

With this spell, the Mercenary causes the ground to shake and heave violently,
inflicting 400 damage to every opponent in the room, and knocking them into the
resting position.  Opponents affected by Tremor have a 95% chance of failing to
flee from combat for a duration of 10 rounds (30 seconds).  This effect can be
refreshed or re-applied by casting Tremor again.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MERCENARY
#
"CLOUD OF CONFUSION"

Subclass Mercenary: Level 2 (Commando)

Usage       : cast 'cloud of confusion'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 1d5 + 1
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 100

Cloud of confusion makes it hard for targets to focus, resulting in more misses
when fighting, and missteps when feeling.

This spell affects everyone in the room not grouped with the Mercenary.  All
victims will have their Hitroll reduced by 5 to 8 during the day, or 6 to 9 at
night.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MERCENARY
#
RIPOSTE

Subclass Mercenary: Level 3 (Commando)

With this skill, the Mercenary has a chance to partially deflect incoming
attacks made against them; the damage deflected is equal to 40% of the deflected
attack.  Additionally, the Mercenary will strike back at their opponent,
performing an attack with a normal chance of a Dual or Triple hit.

When not tanking, the Mercenary has a chance of triggering an extra hit when
their attack is avoided.

The success of this skill is dependent on how well it is practiced, and the
character's Dexterity modifier.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MERCENARY
#
"INCENDIARY CLOUD"

Subclass Mercenary: Level 4 (Commando)

Usage       : cast 'incendiary cloud' <target>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : Instantaneous / 60 seconds (damage over time)
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 200
Damage      : 500 + 75 per combat round for 20 rounds

This powerful spell will inflict a large amount of up-front damage instantly,
plus a smaller, but still potent burst, every combat round.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MERCENARY
#
SIDEARM

Subclass Mercenary: Level 5 (Commando)

This ability allows the Mercenary to wield a second weapon in their off-hand.

However, unlike the more disciplined Ninja, the Mercenary cannot attack with
this second weapon every round.  Instead, this weapon will be automatically
drawn and used every 4 to 6 rounds, causing a standard melee attack; this
attack can result in a dual or triple hit, as usual.

This ability also allows the Mercenary to wield a two-handed weapon in the main
hand, though the normal 50% bonus to hitroll and damroll from strength is not
applied when doing so.  The sidearm must be a one-handed weapon.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MERCENARY
#
CAVALIER

Cavalier is one of the Paladin subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At
each level, the Cavalier receives a new or improved skill or spell.  For help
on each skill or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           MIGHT
  2           TRUSTY STEED
  3           WRATH OF GOD
  4           POWER OF DEVOTION
  5           SMITE

See Also: SUBCLASSES CRUSADER PALADIN
#
CRUSADER

Crusader is one of the Paladin subclasses and is broken up in to 5 levels.  At
each level, the Crusader receives a new or improved skill or spell.  For help
on each skill or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           RIGHTEOUSNESS
  2           FOCUS
  3           PANACEA
  4           ZEAL
  5           POWER OF FAITH

See Also: SUBCLASSES CAVALIER PALADIN
#
MIGHT

Subclass Cavalier: Level 1 (Paladin)
Subclass Templar: Level 2 (Cleric)

Usage       : cast 'might' (self only)
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 20
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 50

The Cavalier or Templar draws strength from his/her faith, granting them +1
hitroll and +3 damroll on all melee attacks.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CAVALIER TEMPLAR
#
"TRUSTY STEED"

Subclass Cavalier: Level 2 (Paladin)

Usage: trusty-steed (toggles on/off)

When using Pummel or Smite against an enemy, the Crusader has a chance to
follow up their attack by summoning an ethereal steed that charges into
their target dealing 1.5 times the Cavalier's level in damage and
knocking them to the ground.

Charging a target who is sitting or resting will cause them to become
stunned, receiving 2x damage on the next attack.

Charging a target who is stunned will cause them to become incapacitated,
receiving 2.33x damage on the next attack.

Cavaliers with Wisdom greater than 18 will receive a bonus to the chance
to summon their magical steed.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CAVALIER SMITE
#
"WRATH OF GOD"

Subclass Cavalier: Level 3 (Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'wrath of god' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 100

The Cavalier calls down the power of his/her god to smite
the victim with its wrath.  600 damage is dealt to the
victim and the targets DAMROLL is reduced by 10 and HITROLL
is reduced by 1 for a duration of 2 ticks. This reduction
can be stacked up to five times on a single target.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CAVALIER
#
"POWER OF DEVOTION"

Subclass Cavalier: Level 4 (Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'power of devotion' <victim> <victim2> ... <victimN>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level / 4
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 100

This is a multipurpose spell designed to protect the victim with a wide range
of affects.  First and foremost is sanctuary which is identical to the
sanctuary spell. In addition the target receives an additional -15 ARMOR, +1 to
all saving throws, +3 DAMROLL, +25 HP_REGEN and +5 MANA_REGEN. Being able to
cast this spell on others makes the Cavalier a great addition to any group.

Power of devotion accepts more than one character as a target.  The spell is
cast once and is applied to each character in the order specified, one at a
time. The spell consumes the full mana cost for each additional target beyond
the first until the spell has been applied to each target, or the Cavalier's
mana falls below the casting cost of the spell.
See Also: SUBCLASSES CAVALIER
#
SMITE

Subclass Cavalier: Level 5 (Paladin)

Usage: smite <victim>

This skill allows the Cavalier to channel their righteous fury against an
enemy. In doing so, the Cavalier switches their target and performs a
single attack against their enemy that consumes their current position
before knocking them down into a stunned position.

When smiting an enemy the Cavalier also has a chance to summon their
trusty steed against the target of their attack.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CAVALIER "TRUSTY STEED"
#
RIGHTEOUSNESS

Subclass Crusader: Level 1 (Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'righteousness' (self only)
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 10
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 30

This spell grants the Crusader a 1d2 bonus damroll to all weapon attacks.  This
bonus increases to 1d4 damage when targetting a neutral opponent, and 1d6 damage
when targetting an evil opponent.

Additionally, each standard melee attack will recover 1d3 points of the
Crusader's mana points.  Melee hits caused by skills (such as Zeal) do not
trigger the mana recovery effect.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CRUSADER DAMROLL HITROLL
#
FOCUS

Subclass Crusader: Level 2 (Paladin)

The Crusader has mastered the ability to concentrate and focus on casting magic.

This passive ability increases the Crusader's concentration rate by 5%.

Additionally, when casting a sufficiently powerful healing spell, the Crusader
will earn a small amount of positive alignment change.

Finally, the Crusader has an increased chance for all spells to have reduced
mana cost at sufficiently high caster level.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CRUSADER MANA
#
PANACEA

Subclass Crusader: Level 3 (Paladin)

The healing touch of a devout Crusader is a panacea to injury and ailments
sustained by the target.  As such, the Crusader's Lay Hands spell heals for 50%
more hit points (up to 750 at level 50).

Additionally, when Lay Hands is cast on a target, it will grant the effects of
the Bless spell to the target and will also remove up to two of the following
negative effects per cast, in the following order of priority: blindness,
paralysis, poison, curse, chill touch, sleep.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CRUSADER "LAY HANDS"
#
ZEAL

Subclass Crusader: Level 4 (Paladin)

This skill allows the Crusader to channel divine fury into an attack that
targets all mobs in the same room with a single hit.  The Crusader is affected
by a two-round skill input lag after using Zeal.  All creatures hit by this
skill also require a two-round recovery time.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CRUSADER
#
"POWER OF FAITH"

Subclass Crusader: Level 5 (Paladin)

Usage       : cast 'power of faith' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : varies

The Crusader uses his power of divine faith to cure the most serious wounds of
the victim.  The cost of this spell varies depending on the amount of hit
points healed, starting at 360 hit points for 50 mana. However, even the most
devote Crusaders have limits and thus the maximum amount of healing power they
can do is 1200 hit points for 120 mana.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CRUSADER
#
DRUID

Druid is one of the Cleric subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At each
level, the Druid receives a new or improved skill or spell.  For help on each
skill or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           MEDITATE
  2           CLARITY
  3           WALL OF THORNS
  4           MAGIC ARMAMENT
  5           DEGENERATE

See Also: SUBCLASSES TEMPLAR CLERIC
#
TEMPLAR

Templar is one of the Cleric subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At
each level, the Templar receives a new or improved skill or spell.  For help on
each skill or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           MEDITATE
  2           MIGHT
  3           SANCTIFY
  4           ORB OF PROTECTION
  5           FORTIFICATION

See Also: SUBCLASSES DRUID CLERIC
#
MEDITATE

Subclass Druid: Level 1 (Cleric)
Subclass Templar: Level 1 (Cleric)

During meditation, the Druid or Templar look inward and focus on healing.
This prevents any commands from being processed for a duration of 2 ticks,
but will give an additional 60 hit points and 60 mana per tick for those 2
ticks.  Once meditation is complete, it cannot be achieved for another 30
ticks.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DRUID TEMPLAR
#
SANCTIFY

Subclass Templar: Level 3 (Cleric)

Usage       : cast 'sanctify'
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 10
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 100

If there are no ungrouped creatures in the same
room as the Templar, this spell will make the room
safe for resting.

See Also: SUBCLASSES TEMPLAR
#
FORTIFICATION

Subclass Templar: Level 5 (Cleric)

Usage       : cast 'fortification' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 10
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 100

This affect works in conjunction with sanctuary to give the victim even more
protection from damage. If affected by both sanctuary and fortification, the
victim will receive a damage reduction of 65%.

See Also: SUBCLASSES TEMPLAR SANCTUARY
#
CLARITY

Subclass Druid: Level 2 (Cleric)

Usage       : cast 'clarity' (self only)
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 10
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 50

The Druid is able to focus his/her thoughts and concentrate
completely on spell casting.  This gives the Druid perfect
concentration on anything they would normally be able to cast
(no sanct while fighting) and a reduction in mana cost of 10%.
However, this inward concentration comes at a cost.  The Druid
cannot hit anything during combat, their physical attacks will
always miss.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DRUID
#
"WALL OF THORNS"

Subclass Druid: Level 3 (Cleric)

Usage       : cast 'wall of thorns'
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 5
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 80

The Druid conjures up a handful of seeds which quickly grow to block all
exits.  Any creatures in the room will be trapped, unable to flee. The wall
isn't permanent and will dissolve in a short span of time.

If cast while an existing wall is in the room, the Druid will use their
powers of botanical pursuasion to encourage the wall to recede and dissolve
immediately.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DRUID
#
"MAGIC ARMAMENT"

Subclass Druid: Level 4 (Cleric)

Usage       : cast 'magic armament' (self only)
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 3
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 60

Where as Clarity prevents the Druid from landing any
physical attacks, this spell will enhance the Druid's
damage by 2d5.  This gives a maximum possible damage
bonus of 10.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DRUID
#
DEGENERATE

Subclass Druid: Level 5 (Cleric)

Usage       : cast 'degenerate' (self only)
Accumulative: no
Duration    : -
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 0

The Druid is able to sacrifice his/her health by absorbing hitpoints
and converting them to mana at a 1-2 ratio.  All but 10 hitpoints
may be converted depending on how much mana the Druid needs restored.
However, the Druid is unable to be healed by any means for a duration
of 2 ticks after the cast and cannot use degenerate again for 30
ticks. While this spell can give the Druid much more available
mana, there is a large risk of death.

See Also: SUBCLASSES DRUID
#
BLADESINGER

Bladesinger is one of the Bard subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the Bladesinger receives a
new or improved skill or song.  For help on each skill
or song, just type HELP <skill/song>

Level  Song/Skill                          Mana
  1    "brightest flame burns quickest"     50     (RALLY)
         or "bulls on parade"
  2    SHOWMANSHIP
  3    BLADESINGING
  4    "ballroom blitz"                     80     (BLADE DANCE)
  5    MIMICRY

See Also: SUBCLASSES CHANTER SONGS BARD
#
CHANTER

Chanter is one of the Bard subclasses and is broken up
into 5 levels.  At each level, the Chanter receives a
new or improved song.  For help on each song, just
type HELP <song>

Level  Song                              Mana
  1    "bridge over troubled water"       40         (RESPITE)
  2    "something takes a part of me"     60         (WAR CHANT)
         or "war"
  3    "if I could change the world"     100         (LUCK)
         or "lucky"
  4    "hero of the day"                 150         (AID)
         or "power of love"
  5    "we are family"                   150         (CAMARADERIE)

See Also: SUBCLASSES BLADESINGER SONGS BARD
#
TAUNT

Class: Bard
Level: 20

A bard often uses lulls in conversation or adventures to entertain
and amuse, buoying the spirits of their fellows.  Unfortunately, at
times this amusement comes at the expense of others, as is the case
with their taunt skill.
Taunt is an automatic skill which has a chance of triggering every
round in combat.  The bard will distract the enemy with embarassing
stories, mischaracterizations, and general depravity, causing them
to lose their focus.  A taunted enemy will experience a 10% reduction
in their DAMROLL for 3 rounds.  The taunt effect does not stack, but
the duration resets whenever a taunt is applied.

The success rate of this skill is based on practice level, and is
increased by the bard's Constitution.

See Also: BARD
#
BLADESINGING

Subclass Bladesinger: Level 3 (Bard)

The Bladesinger has honed their voice to the highest tier, and
their vocals have gained a degree of lethality. Their songs will
imbue their blades with the powerful magic of music.
When the Bladesinger sings a song, a "Bladesinging" enchantment
is applied, granting them a bonus to their damage roll equal to
half the mana cost of the song.  If another song is sung before
the enchantment expires, it will overwrite the current one and
apply a new one based on the latest song's mana cost.

This is a passive ability, but the damage bonus enchantment lasts
10 rounds.

See Also: SUBCLASSES BLADESINGER SONGS BARD
#
"BLADE DANCE"

Usage       : song 'ballroom blitz'
Level       : Bladesinger SC4
Duration    : Instantaneous
Damage      : 350
Mana        : 80

An accomplished Bladesinger weaves songs and combat together in one
fluid assault of musicality and physicality.  This song does damage
to the room, in addition the Bladesinger will perform a hit against
each target.

See Also: SUBCLASSES BLADESINGER SONGS BARD
#
MIMICRY

Subclass Bladesinger: Level 5 (Bard)

The Bladesinger is a master of impersonations and mocking mimicry,
and periodically demonstrates this prowess in combat with powerful
results.  This is a passive skill that is always active, and the
frequency of the bard's Mimicry is based on Dexterity.

Mimicked actions:
- Cleric: miracle (opponent of target)
- Mage: perceive (self) + thunderball (ignores sphere/shield)
- Warrior: punch + quad, or disembowel (target HP dependent)
- Thief: circle + twist
- Paladin: pummel + fury (self 0 ticks)
- Anti-Paladin: pummel w/ hidden-blade + rage/bloodlust (self 0 tick)
- Ninja: dual + divine wind + kick
- Bard: taunt + dual + heal song
- Commando: triple + eshock + disarm

See Also: SUBCLASSES BLADESINGER BARD
#
RESPITE

Usage       : song 'bridge over troubled water'
Level       : Chanter SC1
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana        : 40

This song is the ultimate in party status protection. With it the
Chanter will remove one negative status ailment from each player
character in the room from the following list:
- cloud of confusion
- incendiary cloud
- paralyze
- poison
- charm person
- blindness
- chill touch
- curse
- wither
- sleep

If the PC is affected by none of these, it will set their wait
(skill/spell lag etc.) to zero, though this wait reset does not
apply to the Chanter.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CHANTER SONGS BARD
#
"GROUP SUMMON"

Usage       : song 'come together'
Level       : 50
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana        : 100

This song will summon all PC group members to the bards location,
with the same limitations regarding whether someone can be summoned
as the summon spell.

See Also: SUMMON SONGS BARD
#
RALLY

Usage       : song 'brightest flame burns quickest'
              song 'bulls on parade'
Level       : Bladesinger SC1
Duration    : 5
Mana        : 50

This song increases the hitroll of all characters in the room by 5.
Mana cost is 50 and duration is 5 ticks.

See Also: SUBCLASSES BLADESINGER HITROLL
#
SHOWMANSHIP

Subclass Bladesinger: Level 2 (Bard)

The Bladesinger is fueled by their audience, and gains power the greater its
size.  Being a great showman bestows upon the Bladesinger a 5% damage bonus
per PC in the room and group.

This is a passive damage multiplier that is always applied, but only to combat
damage. This caps at a 200% bonus, or a 100% bonus if affected by rage, or a
50% bonus if affected by fury (3x dmg).

See Also: SUBCLASSES BLADESINGER BARD
#
REJUVENATION

Usage       : song 'there is no heart'
            : song 'forever young'
Level       : 46
Duration    : Instantaneous
Mana        : 80

This song will heal all of the bard's group members for 400 hit points.

See Also: SONGS
#
"WAR CHANT"

Usage       : song 'something takes a part of me'
            : song 'war'
Level       : Chanter SC2
Duration    : 5
Mana        : 60

This song has three effects.  First, it increases all group member saving throws
by 2.  Second, it reduces all other character's hitrolls by 4.  The victim has
a save vs. magic on the hitroll deduction.  Third, Chanters receive a 20% bonus
to their combat damage while affected by War Chant, and this increases to a 30%
if the victim is affected by War Chant as well.
The duration of the affect is 5, the mana cost is 60.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CHANTER
#
CAMARADERIE

Usage       : song 'we are family'
Level       : Chanter SC5
Duration    : 5
Mana        : 150

This song binds the fate of the affected characters to one another. Whenever
any character affected by Camaraderie (in a room with others affected by
Camaraderie) takes damage, they instead take only 60% of that damage. The
other 40% of incoming damage is split amongst their other comrades-in-arms,
with a penalty (2.5x) on the transfer due to complexities of the entanglement.
This results in total incoming damage 1.6x original across comrades.
The duration of the affect is 5, the mana cost is 150.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CHANTER
#
LUCK

Usage       : song 'if i could change the world'
            : song 'lucky'
Level       : Chanter SC3
Duration    : 5
Mana        : 100

This song increases the party regen by 75 hit points and 15 mana each tick for
5 ticks.  Additionally, characters affected by luck have a 20% chance to avoid
death on an otherwise killing blow.

See Also: SUBCLASSES CHANTER
#
AID

Usage       : song 'hero of the day'
              song 'power of love'
Level       : Chanter SC4
Duration    : 5
Mana        : 150

This song increases the damage of all characters in the room by 10%, applied
as an enchantment with the Chanter's name; e.g. "Ranger's Aid"
This allows the effect to stack from multiple Chanters, and it applies to all
damage types (spell, song, combat, skill, spec, etc.)

See Also: SUBCLASSES CHANTER
#
"DIVINE WIND"

Usage       : cast 'divine wind' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 40 Ninja
Save        : None
Mana Cost   : 65
Damage Done : 300

This spell will inflict 300 damage to the victim with no saving throw
and will also put the victim in the resting position.

Divine Wind is a direct translation of the phrase "kamikaze."
#
RONIN

Ronin is one of the Ninja subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At each
level, the Ronin receives a new or improved skill or spell.  For help on each
skill or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>.

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           BLUR
  2           BACKFIST
  3           COMBAT ZEN
  4           BANZAI
  5           SENTO KATA

See Also: SUBCLASSES MYSTIC NINJA
#
MYSTIC

Mystic is one of the Ninja subclasses and is broken up into 5 levels.  At each
level, the Mystic receives a new or improved skill or spell.  For help on each
skill or spell, just type HELP <skill/spell name>

Level         Skill/Spell
  1           DEBILITATE
  2           INNER PEACE
  3           TIGERKICK
  4           MANTRA
  5           TRANQUILITY

See Also: SUBCLASSES RONIN NINJA
#
BLUR

Subclass Ronin: Level 1 (Ninja)

Usage       : cast 'blur' (self only)
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level / 5
Mana Cost   : 80

The Ronin blurs out of reality, making them not only harder to hit, but harder
to defend against. While under the effects of Blur, the Ronin gains the
following benefits:

  -(Level / 2) to the Ronin's armor class (this is a benefit).
  +(Level) to Dodge skill checks.
  +(Level / 7) to all other skill checks (+7 at level 48+).

See Also: SUBCLASSES RONIN
#
BACKFIST

Subclass Ronin: Level 2 (Ninja)

Usage: backfist <victim>

With this attack, the Ronin drives the back of their fist into the victim with
deadly force.  This skill inflicts damage equivalent to 1.50 to 1.75 times the
Ronin's level, and knocks the victim into a stunned state.

Backfist is not subject to the effects of Invulnerability.

This skill causes a 2 round input lag for the Ronin, regardless of success or
failure.  A successful Backfist will stun the victim for 2 rounds.

The success of Backfist is dependent on how well the skill is practiced.

See Also: SUBCLASSES RONIN
#
"COMBAT ZEN"

Subclass Ronin: Level 3 (Ninja)

Usage: Passive Skill

The Ronin has become a weapon of war, an instrument of combat. If they
miss their first attack, the second attack is still attempted as it
normally would be, as is the third if affected by Mystic Swiftness.
This also ability applies to attacks that are dodged, parried or
otherwise avoided.

The Ronin also will inflict significant barehand damage to victims
when disarmed or not wielding a weapon (this applies to either or both
hands).

Additionally, the Ronin has the uncanny ability to rely on his/her
other senses when the sense of sight is lost. While blind, the Ronin
will not have any hit/damage penalties.

Finally, the Ronin has a higher resistance to poison damage, and has a
chance to move while affected by paralysis.

See Also: SUBCLASSES RONIN
#
BANZAI

Subclass Ronin: Level 4 (Ninja)
 
Usage       : banzai <victim>
Mana Cost   : 75
Damage      : 200 to 300

Banzai is a skill that acts in some ways like a spell. This means the
skill can be used in a no-magic room, but the skill also costs mana to
use. Half the mana cost is consumed on a failure, just like a miscast
spell. Banzai is unaffected by the standard concentration rate and is
instead improved by the Ronin's dexterity modifier.

The Ronin will hurl him/herself at his/her target in mystic fury,
unleashing a flurry of attacks and a blast of mystic energy. The first
component of this skill will inflict 200 to 300 damage to a target,
with no saving throw. If a separate skill check successful, the ninja
will also gain an extra round of attacks against the target, attacking
with both weapons, with a chance for a third attack if affected by
Mystic Swiftness.  Banzai switches the Ronin's opponent to the target it
is used on, similar to Flank and Smite.

This skill causes a 1 round input lag for the Ronin, regardless of
success or failure.

The success of Banzai is dependent on how well the skill is practiced.

See Also: SUBCLASSES RONIN
#
"SENTO KATA"

Subclass Ronin: Level 5 (Ninja)

Sento Kata, translated roughly as "Combat Form", reinforces a Ronin's mastery
of combat in several ways.

First, the Ronin now will re-roll an attack roll of 1 (automatic miss) and use
the second result; if the second roll is a natural 20, this will result in an
automatic success, but not a critical hit.

Next, the Ronin inflicts a critical hit for double damage if they roll an attack
roll of 17 or higher, as long as this attack would hit the target, or if they
roll a natural 20.

Finally, the Ronin's mastery of martial arts and weaponry allows their attacks
with certain weapons to automatically choose the best attack type for use
against their opponent (e.g. to avoid damage resistance or immunity). The way
this works is as follows:

Weapon attack types for which Sento Kata applies:
* hit (bare hands), chop, hack, pierce, slash, slice

Eligible alternate attack types:
* hit (bare hands): claw, whip
* chop, hack: crush, slash
* pierce: hack, slice
* slash, slice: bludgeon, pierce

If an opponent is more likely to be damaged by a possible alternate attack
type, that type will be chosen; if not, the original attack type will be used.

See Also: SUBCLASSES RONIN
#
DEBILITATE

Subclass Mystic: Level 1 (Ninja)

Usage       : cast 'debilitate' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 5
Save        : None
Mana Cost   : 20

Anything affected by this spell has its hitroll reduced by 5, and its
armor increased by 10, making it miss more often and easier to hit.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MYSTIC
#
"INNER PEACE"

Subclass Mystic: Level 2 (Ninja)

The winds of the gods blow through the Mystic's spirit, imparting a sense of
Zen and tranquility upon their being.  A Mystic that has attained inner peace
is unaffected by the visual impairment imposed by blindness.

Inner Peace also provides the Mystic with +10 mana regeneration at all times.
In addition, the Mystic's in-combat mana regeneration limit by 10, to a maximum
of 100.  Finally, this ability increases the Mystic's concentration rate by 5%.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MYSTIC REGENERATION
#
TIGERKICK

Subclass Mystic: Level 3 (Ninja)

Usage: tigerkick <victim>

The Mystic's powerful tigerkick causes a large amount of damage to the victim
and knocks them into a stunned position.  A successful tigerkick allows the
mystic to draw some of the target's life-force, restoring a small portion of
their mana.  The greater the maximum health potential of the target, the
greater the restoration.

Tigerkick inflicts 1.75 times the Mystic's level in damage.  The maximum amount
of mana that can be restored per successful kick is 10.

This skill causes a 2 round input lag for the Mystic, regardless of success or
failure.  A successful Tigerkick will stun the victim for 2 rounds.

The success of Tigerkick is dependent on how well the skill is practiced.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MYSTIC
#
MANTRA

Subclass Mystic: Level 4 (Ninja)

Usage       : mantra <target>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous + 100 seconds
Mana Cost   : 120

The Mystic channels his/her spiritual energy into a target, which
will regenerate the target's wounds for a period of time.

The immediate amount healed will be 500 hit points.

The target will become affected by the "Mantra" enchantment.  If the
target is already affected by the enchantment, the duration will be
extended to the maximum duration of 100 seconds.

If a more powerful Mystic applies mantra to a target already affected
by the enchantment it will be replaced by the higher level
enchantment and the duration will be refreshed.

While affected by the "Mantra" enchantment, the character regains
"(Level + Wisdom modifier) * 1.5" hit points every 10 seconds for a
duration of 100 seconds (there will be 10 healing "pulses").  At 25
Wisdom, the total amount of healing over time is 1400.

Additionally, during each healing "pulse", there is a 25% chance to
dispel any one of the following status ailments from the target:
blindness, poison, or paralysis.

See Also: SUBCLASSES MYSTIC
#
TRANQUILITY

Subclass Mystic: Level 5 (Ninja)

Usage       : cast 'tranquility'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : 6
Mana Cost   : 150

This is a group-wide spell that affects all members of the Mystic's
group.  While under the effects of this spell, the Mystic channels
their own enlightenment to others, radiating an aura of tranquility
that increases the focus of those affected.

Subsequent casts of this spell will reset the duration of its effects
to the maximum.

Each character affected by Tranquility will be immune to the effects
of fear and will gain the following benefits while the spell is
active:

  +25% HP Regeneration Rate
  +25% Mantra Regeneration Rate (HELP MANTRA)
  +3 Hitroll
  +3 Damroll

See Also: SUBCLASSES MYSTIC REGENERATION MANTRA HITROLL DAMROLL
#
"AC Apply"

A positive AC apply will improve your armor. Items worn on body will improve
your armor with 3x the items AC apply. Items worn as shields will provide 2x
its AC apply. Items worn on other body parts will improve your armor with its
AC apply.

#
DECAY

Some items might have a decay flag. With time these items will weaken and in the
end fall apart.  Note that the time frame is quite long though.
#
WIZLIST

Usage:  wizlist
        wizlist inactive

Displays the active or inactive gods on RoninMUD.

See also:  IMMORTAL, DEITY, TEMPORAL, WIZARD, ETERNAL, SUPREME, IMPLEMENTOR
           IMMORTING

#
EMAIL

This command allows you to assign an email address and turn on/off postcard
copying to that address.

  Usage: email yes/no - toggles postcard email copies
               show   - show current email address
               set <address> - sets email address
#
RECIPES

There are certain items around Ronin known as Recipes.  If
you come across one of these items, you may identify it to
find that it lists three items.  If you can manage to gather
all three of these items, and hold onto the recipe, there is
a strange gypsy that wanders the park south of Midgaard named
Donka.  You may place the recipe, and the three items into
Donka's stew pot, and then 'stir' the pot to produce a new
item.  Be careful!  If you do not put all the items in, or put
the wrong items in, there are consequences!

See Also: "SPELL IDENTIFY" IDENTIFY DONKA
#
DONKA

Donka is a crazy gypsy that lies in the parks south of Midgaard.
However, she is a very special NPC.  Donka owns a very magical
stew pot that she allows anybody to use.  With her stew pot,
players may find and complete recipes to form powerful items.

See Also: RECIPES
#
"DIVINE INTERVENTION"

Usage      : cast 'divine intervention' <victim>
Level      : level 50 cleric
Save       : none
Duration   : 8 ticks
Mana cost  : 500

The caster prays for divine protection for the target, while affected
if at any time the protected character would die, they are instead
immediately miracle'd and the spell affect is removed.
#
QUAD

Class: Warrior

A skill which gives an automatic forth attack during a fight. The chance of its
success depends on how well you learn it.

See Also: DUAL TRIPLE
#
"QUICK"

Usage      : cast 'quick' (self only)
Level      : level 50 mage
Save       : none
Duration   : 5 ticks
Mana cost  : 100

While affected by Quick, the caster can cast twice in the same combat round.
#
"RUSH"

Usage       : cast 'rush' (self only)
Level       : level 50 commando
Save        : -
Duration    : 3 ticks
Mana cost   : 100

When the Commando is affected by Rush, they will have their number of
successful Dual and Triple attacks increased.

This spell will also enhance the Commando's damroll by 5.

See Also: DUAL TRIPLE DAMROLL
#
"TWIST"

Class: Thief (Level 45, Automatic)

This skill gives the thief a chance to inflict 250 extra damage after a
successful Circle.

See Also: CIRCLE
#
"BLOOD LUST"

Usage      : cast 'blood lust' (self only)
Level      : level 45 anti-paladin
Save       : none
Duration   : 5
Mana cost  : 70

While affected by Blood Lust, the Anti-Paladin hungers for blood, and will
randomly bite their victims during combat.  Each bite has the chance to cause
damage, drain hit points, or drain mana.  This drain will cause the victim to
lose the inflicted amount of points and for the caster to gain them.

There is a 20% chance of increasing the blood level of the room by one when a
victim bitten.

Note: The effects of this spell are automatically applied to Anti-Paladin
characters when the Rage spell is successfully cast.

See Also: "BLOOD LEVEL" RAGE
#
"MYSTIC SWIFTNESS"

Usage      : cast 'mystic swiftness' (self only)
Level      : level 50 ninja
Save       : none
Duration   : 4 ticks
Mana cost  : 100

While affected by mystic swiftness the ninja has a chance of landing
a third hit on the target.
#
"WIND SLASH"

Usage      : cast 'wind slash' <victim>
Level      : level 30 ninja
Save       : none
Duration   : -
Mana cost  : 85
Damage     : level/2 + (140 to 180)

The caster strikes the air rapidly in all directions, creating magical waves
of force that blast all other victims in the room.
#
REMORT

The Remort system allows players to change their gender and class, but still
retain all or most of their collected progress. The character must be at least
level 6 before participating, and the system itself is facilitated through an
NPC named Immortalis who holds residence in Midgaard, 3n2w of Market Square.

Based on the total amount of experience points that a player has invested into
their character, a fee will be assessed and charged to them at the time of a
successful remort. This fee is determined against a scale of 8 billion
experience points, and is waived for players with 700 million experience points
or less. This fee is priced in quest and subclass points.

The amount of experience points a player has spent is calculated based on
average gains made during level-ups and hp/mana metas. Since there is a certain
luck factor involved, it is likely that the amount of experience a player is
calculated to have spent will vary slightly from what they have actually spent.
However, the amounts should even out over the course of a player's history, so
the amount presented should be rather accurate. Experience is returned from the
following:

* Levels
* Metas - str, dex, int, wis, con, hp, mana and move
* Ranks
* Core stat (str/dex/int/wis/con) rolls above average

In addition to experience points, any Quest Points spent on core stats above
18 will be returned to the player and added to any un-spent Quest Points the
player may already have. The same occurs with Subclass Points and all points
invested into subclass levels will be added to un-spent Subclass Points and
returned to the player at the time of remort. These returned points can also
be used to pay for the remort fee, in the case that the player does not have
enough un-spent Quest and Subclass points to cover the cost.

There are several commands available from Immortalis, and will facilitate the
remort process:

1) List - Will display a list of tokens available to remort candidates. These
   tokens are used to determine which gender and class the player wishes to
   remort into
2) Buy - Will allow the player to acquire the tokens of his/her choosing, and
   will be used to set the parameters of the player's remort
3) Appraise - Will show the player how much experience they have invested to
   date and the Quest/Subclass Point fee that will be assessed during remort
4) Remort Commit - Will confirm the player's intention to remort and process
   that request once the tokens have been purchased and the player has
   seen the fee that will be charged to them
5) Cancel - Will cancel the remort process, removing any tokens the player has
   acquired from their inventory and essentially erase any intention the
   player has to remort. This can be used to opt out of the remort process
   prior to committing the decison or to clean the slate of token choices the
   player has already made

Once a player has acquired the two tokens needed to remort and committed that
decision, the player is set back to level 1, with the gender and class of
their choice. Their core stats are set to 13 across the board and they are
given a pool of remort experience based on the valuation of their experience
point investments prior to remort. This pool of experience is spent
automatically as the player gains experience, and is returned to them at a
rate of 4 times the normal amount of experience the player gains. This
includes experience gained through killing a mob and dealing damage (also
known as hit experience).

Once a player has re-earned the entire pool of remort experience, the
process officially ends, and an announcement of such is made to the entire
MUD. However, it is possible to remort again, changing your gender and class
prior to the end of the remort process, at which point the fee is calculated
again based on how much experience the player currently has invested in
their character, not inclusive of the potential to be regained from their
pool of remort experience. If they decide to remort again while already in
the remort process, the experience they have currently spent is simply added
to the existing remort pool, and the process is started again from level 1.

In this way, a player could potentially use this process to experiment with
any number of combination of classes and genders, until they find the one
that best fits their style of play. Players are not penalized by changing
their mind post-remort, and are simply required to regain any experience
they had previously gathered in order to complete the process, restarting it
at any time they see fit.
#
CUNNING

Class: Thief (Level 50)

Usage: cunning (toggles on/off)

When affected by Cunning, the Thief is able to expend their energy (mana) in
order to grant them the ability to break through the Invulnerability
spell/affect with their Backstab and Circle skills.  Piercing through a
target's protective field has a cost of 10 mana points.

See Also: INVULNERABILITY CIRCLE BACKSTAB
#
PRESTIGE

Players looking for an enduring degree of fame and fortune can earn prestige.
By visiting Saga in the Grunting Boar Inn, a player can 'earn prestige' by
spending 100 million experience points and 20 million gold.  

Each level of prestige earned will increase a player's hit points by 8 and mana
by 4 (or 12 hit points for non spell-casting classes).  At the fifth level of
prestige, and every ten levels thereafter, players will also gain access to a
perk.  There are 255 levels of prestige available, for a total of 26 perks.

A complete list of Perks, and the amount of prestige required to unlock them,
can be viewed by visiting Saga and typing 'list'.

Prestige levels, stats, and perks are unaffected by the remort process; once
earned, prestige and its benefits are permanent.

See Also: REMORT
#
"IRON SKIN"

Usage       : cast 'iron skin' <target>
Level       : Level 40 commando
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 10
Save        : -
Mana Cost   : 50

When self-cast upon the Mercenary, this defensive spell will modify their AC by
-20, making them harder to hit.  If cast upon a different target, the spell is
less effective, granting only -10 AC instead.

See Also: SUBCLASSES COMMANDO
#~
